America's Children and the Environment Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses America's Children and the Environment Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses Second Edition EPA 240-R-03-001 February 2003 Foreword I am pleased to present the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency's second edition of America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses.
This report marks the progress we have made as a nation to reduce environmental risks faced by children.
The report contains good news for children including the continued decline in the number of children with elevated blood levels, a reduction in children's exposure to secondhand smoke, and decreases in exposures to air pollution and contaminants in drinking water.
Although we are encouraged by these findings, there is still much work to be done.
Asthma rates are increasing, too many children continue to have elevated blood lead levels, the potential for mercury exposure in the womb is of growing concern, and there is a disproportionate impact of childhood diseases on low-income and minority children.
America's Children and the Environment will help focus our efforts in addressing these problems and others.
Protecting children's health is an integral part of EPA's mission, and the Agency has taken great strides to improve the environment for children where they live, learn, and play, including: I Reducing emissions of diesel pollutants from trucks and buses, which will help prevent hundreds of thousands of asthma attacks in children each year.
I Adopting stringent restrictions on the use of the organophosphate pesticides azinphos-methyl, chlorpyrifos, methyl parathion, and diazinon on food crops and around the home.
I Taking preventive action to reduce risks of exposure from environmental contaminants, including our work with industry to ensure playground equipment is no longer made with wood treated with arsenic-containing preservatives.
I Establishing 12 Centers for Children's Environmental Health and Disease Prevention Research, in partnership with the Department of Health and Human Services, to enhance scientific understanding of the relationships between environmental contaminants and children's health.
I Launching a comprehensive schools initiative to create healthier classrooms.
I Implementing the Smoke-Free Home Pledge campaign, designed to protect millions of children from the risks of secondhand tobacco smoke at home.
I Working with other federal agencies to develop and implement the Interagency Asthma and Lead Strategies to reduce the disproportionate impact of asthma on minority and low-income children and to eliminate childhood lead poisoning by the year 2010.
I Developing the Clear Skies Initiative, to reduce emissions of sulfur dioxide, nitrogen oxides, and mercury from electric utilities by approximately 70 percent, which will help reduce asthma attacks and respiratory infections.
ii
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Foreword As we move forward, EPA is committed to monitoring the success of our children's health efforts.
The America's Children and the Environment report, based on the best data available at this time, is an important benchmark that EPA will use to guide our future actions and measure progress.
As our data and methods improve, we will work to develop increasingly reliable children's environmental health indicators that will help us in reaching our children's health goals.
I want to thank the many individuals who contributed to this report for their hard work and efforts.
By monitoring trends, identifying successes, and pinpointing areas of concern, we can continue to improve the health of our children and the health of all Americans.
Christine Todd Whitman Administrator
Foreword
iii
Table of Contents About This Report . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
5 Key Findings . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
11 Summary List of Measures . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
15 Part 1: Environmental Contaminants Outdoor Air Pollutants . . . . . . . . . .
Indoor Air Pollutants . . . . . . . . . . . .
Drinking Water Contaminants . . . . .
Pesticide Residues . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Land Contaminants . . . . . . . . . . . .
References . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Part 2: Body Burdens . . . . . . . . . . .
Concentrations of Lead in Blood . . .
Concentrations of Mercury in Blood Concentrations of Cotinine in Blood References . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Part 3: Childhood Illnesses . . .
Respiratory Diseases . . . . . . . .
Childhood Cancer . . . . . . . . . .
Neurodevelopmental Disorders References . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
Part 4: Emerging Issues . . . . . .
Mercury in Fish . . . . . . . . . . .
Attention-Deficit/Hyperactivity References . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
17 20 32 35 40 42 44 49 52 58 60 62 65 67 76 82 86 91 94 96 98
......
......
Disorder ...... . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
... ... .. ... . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
.
..
..
.. . . . . . . . . .
.
..
..
.. . . . . . . . . .
.
..
..
.. . . . . . . . . .
Part 5: Special Features . . . . .
Lead in California Schools . . . .
Pesticides in Minnesota Schools Birth Defects in California . . . .
References . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
. . . . .
. . . . .
101 103 111 114 116
Future Directions . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
119 Glossary of Terms . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
125 Appendix A: Data Tables . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
131 Appendix B: Data and Methods . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . .
147 Appendix C: Environmental Health Objectives in Healthy People 2010 . .
167 Appendix D: Environmental Health Objectives in EPA's Strategic Plan . . . .
169
Table of Contents
1
Authors Tracey J. Woodruff National Center for Environmental Economics Office of Policy, Economics and Innovation U.S. Environmental Protection Agency San Francisco, CA 94105
Daniel A. Axelrad National Center for Environmental Economics Office of Policy, Economics and Innovation U.S. Environmental Protection Agency Washington, DC 20460
Amy D. Kyle School of Public Health University of California Berkeley Berkeley, CA 94720
Onyemaechi Nweke National Center for Environmental Economics Office of Policy, Economics and Innovation U.S. Environmental Protection Agency Washington, DC 20460
Gregory G. Miller National Center for Environmental Economics Office of Policy, Economics and Innovation U.S. Environmental Protection Agency Washington, DC 20460
2
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Reviewers External Peer Reviewers*
Lara Akinbami, National Center for Health Statistics, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services Joel Bender, American Chemistry Council Elinor Blake, California Department of Health Services David Brown, Northeast States for Coordinated Air Use Management (NESCAUM) Patricia Buffler, School of Public Health, University of California, Berkeley Suzan Carmichael, March of Dimes/California Birth Defects Monitoring Program, California Department of Health Services Gwen Collman, National Institute of Environmental Health Sciences, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services Brenda Eskenazi, School of Public Health, University of California, Berkeley Paul Garbe, National Center for Environmental Health, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services Fernando Guerra, San Antonio Metropolitan Health District Nadia Juzych, Michigan Public Health Institute Linda Mazur, California Environmental Protection Agency Maria Morandi, University of Texas, Houston Swati Prakash, West Harlem Environmental Action, Inc.
Peggy Reynolds, California Department of Health Services Kristin Ryan, Division of Environmental Health, Alaska Department of Environmental Conservation Sam Sanchez, San Antonio Metropolitan Health District Ken Schoendorf, National Center for Health Statistics, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services Kirk Smith, School of Public Health, University of California, Berkeley Nancy H. Sutley, California Environmental Protection Agency Daniel Swartz, Children's Environmental Health Network Diane Wagener, Office of Public Health and Science, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services John Wargo, Yale School of Forestry and Environmental Studies Cynthia Warrick, Howard University Internal EPA Peer Reviewers
Reviewers for America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
David Bennett, Office of Solid Waste and Emergency Response John Bennett, Office of Water Jeff Bigler, Office of Water Ellen Brown, Office of Air and Radiation Doreen Cantor, Office of Prevention, Pesticides, and Toxic Substances * Each listed reviewer participated in one or more of three peer review meetings: October 5, 2000 in Washington, DC; March 28, 2001 in Berkeley, CA; November 15, 2001 in Washington, DC.
Reviewers 3
Reviewers Wayne Garfinkel, Region 4 Rafael Gonzalez, Office of Solid Waste and Emergency Response Dave Guinnup, Office of Air and Radiation Lee Kyle, Office of Water Karen Martin, Office of Air and Radiation Ellie McCann, Office of Prevention, Pesticides, and Toxic Substances David McKee, Office of Air and Radiation Deborah Rice, Office of Research and Development Ron Shafer, Office of Environmental Information Roy Smith, Office of Air and Radiation Carol Terris, Office of Prevention, Pesticides, and Toxic Substances David Topping, Office of Prevention, Pesticides, and Toxic Substances Glenn Williams, Office of Prevention, Pesticides, and Toxic Substances Lynda Wynn, Office of Water Federal Agency Contributors
Lara Akinbami, National Center for Health Statistics, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services Rebecca Allen, EPA Office of Water Thomas Bernert, National Center for Environmental Health, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services Barry Gilbert, EPA Office of Air and Radiation Brian Gregory, EPA Office of Air and Radiation James Hemby, EPA Office of Air and Radiation Lee Kyle, EPA Office of Water David Mintz, EPA Office of Air and Radiation Patricia Pastor, National Center for Health Statistics, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, U.S. Department of Health and Human Services Abraham Siegel, EPA Office of Water Philip Villanueva, EPA Office of Prevention, Pesticides, and Toxic Substances David Widawsky, EPA Office of Prevention, Pesticides, and Toxic Substances Special thanks to Brad Hurley of ICF Consulting for his extensive work in document preparation, formatting and editing the text and graphics, and logistical support in preparing the report.
4
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
About This Report merica's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses is the U.S. Environmental Protection Agency's second report on trends in environmental factors related to the health and well-being of children in the United States.
A
America's Children and the Environment brings together, in one place, quantitative information from a variety of sources to show trends in levels of environmental contaminants in air, water, food, and soil; concentrations of contaminants measured in the bodies of children and women; and childhood illnesses that may be influenced by exposure to environmental contaminants.
EPA's first report, America's Children and the Environment: A First View of Available Measures, published in December 2000, presented the results of EPA's initial effort to collect and analyze existing, readily available data on measures relevant to children's health and the environment.
This second report improves on the first edition by adding new measures for important contaminants, exposures, and childhood illnesses and by including data for additional years.
The report also includes more analysis of these measures by race/ethnicity of children and family income.
What are the purposes of this report? This report has three principal objectives.
First, it presents concrete, quantifiable measures for key factors relevant to the environment and children in the United States.
These measures offer a basis for understanding time trends for some factors and for further investigation of others.
Second, the report can inform discussions among policymakers and the public about how to improve federal data on children and the environment.
Third, America's Children and the Environment includes measures that can be used by policymakers and the public to track and understand the potential impacts of environmental contaminants on children's health and, ultimately, to identify and evaluate ways to minimize environmental impacts on children.
The authors and sponsors hope this report will contribute to the effort to integrate the environmental health needs of children into the nation's policy agenda.
What's new in this edition of the report? Most measures that were included in the first edition of America's Children and the Environment have been updated to include data for additional years.
Several new measures have been added for this edition, and analyses by race/ethnicity and family income are included where possible.
What's new in the section on environmental contaminants? G G
New measures of long-term exposures to outdoor air pollutants An improved measure of children's proximity to hazardous waste sites A new measure that shows the full current distribution of blood lead levels in children ages 1-5 A new measure of mercury in the blood of women of child-bearing age A new measure of cotinine (a marker of exposure to environmental tobacco smoke) in the blood of children New measures of respiratory diseases A new measure on mental retardation About This Report 5
What's new in the section on body burdens? G
G G
What's new in the section on childhood illnesses? G G
About This Report A new section on emerging issues presents information about important aspects of children's environmental health for which data recently have become available.
Topics covered in this section include mercury in fish, an important source of mercury exposure for people in the United States, and attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder, which recent research suggests may be associated in part with exposure to environmental contaminants.
Also new in this report is a special features section that presents important aspects of children's environmental health for which nationally representative data are not available.
The special features are based on data from single states, and include: G G G
Lead in paint, water, and soils in California schools Pesticide use in schools in Minnesota Birth defects trends in California
How is the report structured? The measures in the report focus on contaminants in the environment, contaminants in the bodies of children and women, and illnesses for which there is reason to believe that environmental exposures may play a role.
Measures show trends over time whenever possible.
The first part of the report presents measures reflecting trends in levels of environmental contaminants that are likely to affect children's health.
These measures show the percentages of children exposed to particular levels of contaminants in air, water, food, and soil.
Where data on actual environmental concentrations of contaminants are not available, the report presents surrogate measures.
The second part presents measures reflecting trends in concentrations of key contaminants measured in the bodies of children and women.
These data provide direct evidence of exposures.
The third part presents measures that reflect trends in key childhood illnesses, the frequency or severity of which may be related to exposure to environmental contaminants.
The fourth part presents information about emerging issues for which data recently have become available or that are new to this report.
The fifth part presents measures for important aspects of children's environmental health based on data from single states.
Ideally, it would be informative to include measures that reflect similar environmental health concerns for children in all three of the report's main topic areas--exposure to contaminants in the environment (Part 1), concentrations of the same contaminants in the bodies of children and women (Part 2), and illnesses for which these contaminants have been found to play a role (Part 3).
Although there are not sufficient data to fully accomplish this goal, relationships among some of the measures in the three sections are evident.
For example, Part 1 includes measures that reflect children's exposures to outdoor air pollutants over both the short and long term, while Part 3 includes measures for respiratory diseases, some of which are associated with air pollution.
Similarly, for environmental tobacco smoke, a key pollutant of indoor air, Part 1 includes measures reflecting the frequency of smoking in homes where children live; Part 2 includes a measure for concentrations of cotinine, a marker for exposure to environmental tobacco smoke, in the blood of children; and Part 3 includes a measure on respiratory-related health effects that
6
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
About This Report can in part be caused by exposure to environmental tobacco smoke.
In another example, Part 1 includes a measure on the percentage of children living in counties in which air quality standards for lead were exceeded; Part 2 includes measures on concentrations of lead in the blood of children; Part 3 includes a new measure for mental retardation in children, which may be due in part to exposure to lead; and Part 5 has information from California on lead in schools.
Appendix A provides tables showing the data on which the measures were based.
Appendix B describes the sources of the data used in this report and the methods for calculating the measures.
Appendix C has a list of health goals relevant to the topics in this report, developed by Healthy People 2010, a collaborative effort coordinated by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services to establish national health objectives.
Appendix D lists EPA's Government Performance and Results Act goals that are related to the measures in this report.
These goals are set to achieve EPA's overall objectives of clean air, clean and safe water, safe food, and the protection of America's land.
The report includes a discussion of future directions, including ways in which the existing measures could be improved and additional measures that may be included in future editions.
Why did EPA focus on measures for children? Environmental contaminants can affect children quite differently than adults, both because children may be more highly exposed to contaminants and because they may be more vulnerable to the toxic effects of contaminants.
Children generally eat more food, drink more water, and breathe more air relative to their size than adults do, and consequently may be exposed to relatively higher amounts of contaminants.
Children's normal activities, such as putting their hands in their mouths or playing on the ground, can result in exposures to contaminants that adults do not face.
In addition, environmental contaminants may affect children disproportionately because their immune defenses are not fully developed and their growing organs are more easily harmed.
How were the measures in this report selected? Three principal criteria were used to select measures for the report: 1) importance to the health of children, 2) availability of data for much or all of the United States, and 3) sufficient quality of data to generate a reliable measure.
For environmental contaminants, five important media were identified: outdoor air, indoor air, drinking water, food, and soil.
For each of these media, data available from federal environmental and health agencies were reviewed.
The most informative sources that provided national coverage (or close to it) and a reasonable assurance of reliability were selected.
If data about concentrations of key contaminants could be identified and were of adequate quality, they were used.
If not, the best available surrogate measure was selected.
The available data for concentrations of contaminants in the bodies of children and women were reviewed, and the report presents selected contaminants for which several years of data were available or for which health impacts had been well established.
These are lead, mercury, and cotinine (the latter of which reflects exposure to environmental tobacco smoke)--pollutants long recognized as having important impacts on children's health.
The report presents the best available information about the concentrations of lead and cotinine in the blood of children, and about the concentrations of mercury in the blood of women of child-bearing age.
About This Report
7
About This Report For childhood illnesses associated with environmental contaminants, the report presents measures of asthma and other respiratory conditions, childhood cancer, and neurodevelopmental disorders.
The best available data to assess the frequency of these illnesses in children were selected, with measures structured to portray changes over time, where possible.
In cases where data are not available for a sufficient number of years, measures are structured as snapshots; in future editions EPA expects to have data that can be used to portray trends for those measures.
In the special features section, the report presents measures that reflect important aspects of children's environmental health for which data were not available at the national level.
These were chosen based on recommendations from peer reviewers and others.
America's Children and the Environment is intended to convey information about trends in children's environmental health in the United States.
The key measures presented in this report are based on the best available data to provide the most complete picture possible at this time.
There are certain data limitations and assumptions in some of the measures, resulting in a degree of uncertainty for certain key measures and trends.
As data and methods improve, we aim to develop increasingly reliable indicators of children's environmental health.
The America's Children and the Environment report, and the key measures used in the report, should not be construed as a definitive basis for planning specific policies or projects.
Other technical information also will be used to inform the activities of EPA and other federal agencies concerning children's environmental health.
Emerging and ongoing research will help shape these activities for years to come.
What are the sources for the data in this report? Federal agencies provided the data for most of the measures.
The data on environmental contaminants generally are from data systems maintained by EPA and by state environmental agencies.
Data on contaminants in blood and on respiratory diseases and neurodevelopmental disorders are from the National Center for Health Statistics in the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
Cancer data are from the National Cancer Institute.
Population data from the Census Bureau were used to calculate the number of children potentially exposed to environmental contaminants.
Data for the special features section are from the states of California and Minnesota.
The data on lead in schools are from a survey of schools in California.
The data on pesticide use in schools are from a survey of Minnesota schools.
The data on birth defects are from California's birth defects monitoring program.
Detailed descriptions of the data sources are in Appendix B. What groups of children are included in this report? Most of the measures include all children in the United States under the age of 18, representing approximately 72 million individuals based on the 2000 census.
Exceptions are noted in Appendix B.
In response to suggestions from peer reviewers, the report presents (where possible) measures for groups of children of different races and ethnicities and for children living in households with various levels of income.
In some cases, these breakouts by race/ ethnicity and family income are shown in the graphs, while in other cases they are included in the data tables found in Appendix A.
8
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
About This Report The report uses five categories of race or ethnicity: White non-Hispanic, Black nonHispanic, Hispanic, American Indian/Alaska Native, and Asian or Pacific Islander.
In many cases, the data were insufficient to present results for the latter two categories.
The report uses three categories of family income: 1) below the poverty level (shown in graphs and tables as 
"Poverty level" is defined by the federal government and is based on income thresholds that vary by family size and composition.
The category of incomes between the poverty level and twice the poverty level represents households that have relatively low incomes but are not below the officially defined poverty level.
This category frequently is used by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention in its reporting of health data and was recommended by peer reviewers for use in this report.
What years are included in this report? The report includes data for each year from 1990 through 2000 whenever possible.
In many cases, data were available for only some of these years.
In other cases, data available before 1990 or after 2000 were included to provide an expanded depiction of trends.
Is this report available online? This report is available at www.epa.gov/envirohealth/children.
In addition, the Web site includes links to other information on children's environmental health, additional data tables, information by state where such data are available, and references.
How does the information in America's Children and the Environment differ from what is proposed to be included in EPA's forthcoming Report on the Environment? EPA is developing a report on the state of the environment in the United States, scheduled for publication in 2003.
The Report on the Environment is intended to be a broadbased collection of national data depicting progress in addressing environmental problems and identifying remaining challenges.
America's Children and the Environment focuses more specifically on data related to children and their related environmental conditions.
Both America's Children and the Environment and the forthcoming Report on the Environment rely on existing national data to describe current conditions and trends.
The forthcoming Report on the Environment will address a broader set of environmental conditions and human health concerns.
The Report on the Environment will be organized around five theme areas: 1) human health, 2) ecological health, 3) air, 4) water, and 5) land.
America's Children and the Environment is organized into three main sections: 1) environmental contaminants, 2) body burdens, and 3) childhood health.
A fourth section of special features presents important measures for which data are available from individual states but not for the nation.
What is the Office of Children's Health Protection at EPA? The Office of Children's Health Protection (OCHP) supports and facilitates EPA's efforts to protect children from environmental threats.
OCHP's mission is to make the protection of children's health a fundamental goal of public health and environmental protection in the United States.
OCHP reviews EPA proposals for their impact on children and funds work designed to improve the protection of children from environmental hazards.
About This Report
9
About This Report What are the Office of Policy, Economics, and Innovation and the National Center for Environmental Economics at EPA? The Office of Policy, Economics, and Innovation develops new approaches and provides analysis to enable EPA to better address emerging environmental challenges.
The office addresses cross-cutting environmental management strategies, identifies emerging issues, and serves as a catalyst for testing and institutionalizing integrative approaches to environmental protection.
Within the Office of Policy, Economics, and Innovation, EPA's National Center for Environmental Economics (NCEE) provides economic and health analysis of important environmental issues for the regulatory and policy process.
NCEE also conducts research that will improve our current understanding of the impacts of environmental contaminants on public health.
NCEE's staff includes specialists in air, water, solid waste, cross-media economics, and children's health risks.
The center's health scientists emphasize new methods for assessing previously unidentified risks, assessing relationships between exposures and disease, and developing tools to communicate this information to the public.
10
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Key Findings Outdoor Air Pollutants I In 1990, approximately 23 percent of children lived in counties in which the one-hour ozone standard was exceeded on at least one day per year.
In 2001, approximately 15 percent of children lived in such counties.
This value fluctuated during the intervening years, ranging from 13 to 28 percent.
(Page 23)
Part 1: Environmental Contaminants
I In 1996-2001, significantly more children lived in counties that exceeded the eight-hour ozone standard than in counties that exceeded the one-hour standard.
In 2001, nearly 40 percent of children lived in counties that exceeded the eight-hour standard.
(Page 23) I In 2000, approximately 27 percent of children lived in counties that exceeded the PM-2.5 particulate matter standard.
In 2001, approximately 25 percent of children lived in such counties.
(Page 23) I The percentage of days that were designated as having "unhealthy" air quality (including days that were unhealthy for everyone as well as those that were unhealthy for sensitive groups) decreased between 1990 and 1999, dropping from 3 percent in 1990 to less than 1 percent in 1999.
The percentage of days with "moderate" air quality remained around 20 percent between 1990 and 1999, although an upward trend is suggested by the fact that the percentage of moderate air quality days was higher in 1999 than for any other year in this analysis.
(Page 25) I In 1990, on average, children were exposed to 31.9 micrograms per cubic meter of PM-10, which represents 64 percent of the standard for the year.
By 1995, the concentration had fallen to 54 percent of the standard, and it has remained at about that level since.
(Page 27) I In 2000, about 1 million children experienced an average PM-10 concentration above the annual standard, down from about 2 million in 1990.
(Page 28) I In 1996, all children lived in counties in which the combined estimated concentrations of hazardous air pollutants exceeded the 1-in-100,000 cancer risk benchmark.
Approximately 95 percent of children lived in counties in which at least one hazardous air pollutant exceeded the benchmark for health effects other than cancer.
(Page 31) Indoor Air Pollutants I The percentage of homes with children under 7 in which someone smokes on a regular basis decreased from 29 percent in 1994 to 19 percent in 1999.
(Page 33) Drinking Water Contaminants I The percentage of children served by public water systems that reported exceeding a Maximum Contaminant Level or violated a treatment standard decreased from 20 percent in 1993 to 8 percent in 1999.
Every category of violation decreased between 1993 and 1999 except for nitrates and nitrites, which remained steady.
(Page 37)
I In 1993, approximately 22 percent of children lived in an area served by a public water system that had at least one major monitoring and reporting violation.
This figure decreased to about 10 percent in 1999.
The largest number of monitoring and reporting violations occurred for the lead and copper standards.
(Page 39)
Key Findings
11
Key Findings Pesticide Residues I From 1994 to 2001, the percentage of food samples with detectable organophosphate pesticide residues ranged between 19 percent and 29 percent.
The highest detection rates were observed during 1996 and 1997, while the lowest detection rate was observed in 2001.
(Page 41) Land Contaminants I As of September 2000, about 0.8 percent of children lived Superfund site listed on the National Priorities List (NPL) cleaned up or controlled, down from about 1.3 percent in 2000, about 1.3 percent of children lived within one mile listed on the Superfund NPL.
(Page 43)
within one mile of a that had not yet been 1990.
As of September of any Superfund site
Part 2: Body Burdens
Concentrations of Lead in Blood I The median (50th percentile) concentration of lead in the blood of children 5 years old and under dropped from 15 micrograms per deciliter (µg/dL) in 1976-1980 to 2.2 µg/dL in 1999-2000, a decline of 85 percent.
(Page 53)
I The concentration of lead in blood at the 90th percentile in children 5 years old and under, representing the most highly exposed 10 percent of children in that age group, dropped from 25 µg/dL in 1976-1980 to 4.8 µg/dL in 1999-2000.
(Page 53) I Concentrations of lead in children's blood differ by race/ethnicity and family income.
In 1999-2000, the median blood lead level in children ages 1-5 was 2.2 µg/dL.
The median blood lead level for children living in families with incomes below the poverty level was 2.8 µg/dL and for children living in families above the poverty level it was 1.9 µg/dL.
For all income levels, Black non-Hispanic children had a median blood lead level of 2.8 µg/dL.
White non-Hispanic children had a median blood lead level of 2.1 µg/dL and Hispanic children had a median blood level of 2.0 µg/dL.
(Page 55) I Approximately 430,000 children ages 1-5 (about 2 percent) had a blood lead level of 10 µg/dL or greater in 1999-2000.
(Page 57) Concentrations of Mercury in Blood I EPA has determined that children born to women with blood concentrations above 5.8 parts per billion are at some increased risk of adverse health effects.
About 8 percent of women of child-bearing age had at least 5.8 parts per billion of mercury in their blood in 1999-2000.
(Page 59) Concentrations of Cotinine in Blood I Cotinine is a marker of exposure to environmental tobacco smoke.
median (50th percentile) levels of cotinine measured in children were than they were in 1988-1991.
Cotinine values at the 90th percentile, most highly exposed 10 percent of children, declined by 18 percent 91 and 1999-2000.
(Page 61)
In 1999-2000, 56 percent lower representing the between 1988-
12
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Key Findings Respiratory Diseases I Between 1980 and 1995, the percentage of children with asthma doubled, rising from 3.6 percent in 1980 to 7.5 percent in 1995.
A decrease in the percentage of children with asthma occurred between 1995 and 1996, but interpreting single-year changes is difficult.
(Page 69)
Part 3: Childhood Illnesses
I In 2001, 8.7 percent (6.3 million) of all children had asthma.
(Page 69) I The percentage of children with asthma differs by race/ethnicity and family income.
In 1997-2000, more than 8 percent of Black non-Hispanic children living in families with incomes below the poverty level had an asthma attack in the previous 12 months.
Approximately 6 percent of White non-Hispanic children and 5 percent of Hispanic children living in families with incomes below the poverty level had an asthma attack in the previous 12 months.
(Page 71) I More than 6 percent of children living in families with incomes below the poverty level had an asthma attack in the previous 12 months.
About 5 percent of children living in families with incomes at the poverty level and higher had an asthma attack in the previous 12 months.
(Page 71) I Emergency room visits for asthma and other respiratory causes were 369 per 10,000 children in 1992 and 379 per 10,000 children in 1999.
(Page 73) I Hospital admissions for asthma and other respiratory causes were 55 per 10,000 children in 1980 and 66 per 10,000 children in 1999.
(Page 75) Childhood Cancer I The frequency of new childhood cancer cases has been fairly stable since 1990.
The age-adjusted annual incidence of cancer in children increased from 128 to 161 cases per million children between 1975 and 1998.
Cancer mortality decreased from 51 to 28 deaths per million children during the 1975-1998 period.
(Page 77)
I Leukemia was the most common cancer diagnosis for children from 1973-1998, representing about 20 percent of the total childhood cancer cases.
Incidence of acute lymphoblastic leukemia was 24 cases per million in 1974-1978 and approximately 28 cases per million in 1994-1998.
Incidence of acute myeloid leukemia was approximately 5 cases per million in 1974-98 and about the same in 1994-98.
(Page 79) Neurodevelopmental Disorders I In 1997-2000, about 6 children out of every 1,000 (0.6 percent) were reported to have been diagnosed with mental retardation.
(Page 85)
Key Findings
13
Key Findings Part 4: Emerging Issues Mercury in Fish I Since 1995, most states have issued one or more advisories to warn people about elevated concentrations of mercury in non-commercial fish.
In some cases, advisories tell people to avoid eating fish that they catch in particular areas or to avoid particular species.
In other cases, they tell people to limit the amount of fish that they consume.
Some advisories are directed at particularly susceptible groups, usually women of child-bearing age and children.
(Page 94) Attention-Deficit/Hyperactivity Disorder I In 1997-2000, 6.7 percent of children ages 5-17 were reported to have been diagnosed with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).
(Page 96)
Part 5: Special Features
Lead in California Schools I Thirty-two percent of all public elementary schools surveyed in California had both lead-based paint and some deterioration of paint.
(Page 105)
I Eighty-nine percent of all California schools studied had detectable levels of lead in soils.
Only 7 percent of the schools had lead levels in soil at or exceeding the EPA hazard standard.
(Page 107) I Approximately 15 percent of schools had lead levels in drinking water that exceeded EPA's drinking water standard on the first draw.
Drinking water from approximately 6.5 percent of schools remained above the standard on the second draw.
Second draw samples are more representative of the lead concentrations that children are exposed to during most of the day.
(Page 109) Pesticides in Minnesota Schools I Approximately 47 percent of responding school custodians in Minnesota reported that they sprayed pesticides "as needed" in the classroom.
Forty percent of the responding custodians reported that their schools provided no notification of pesticide use (such as notices in fumigated areas or pre- and postapplication letters to students and teachers).
(Page 113) Birth Defects in California I Heart defects are the most common birth defect in California, with 1.8 cases per 1,000 live births in 1997-99.
The rates of birth defects in California generally remained constant during the 1990s.
(Page 115)
14
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Summary List of Measures Summary List of Measures Included in this Report Name Environmental Contaminants Outdoor Air Pollutants Common Air Pollutants Percentage of children living in counties in which air quality standards were exceeded Percentage of children's days with good, moderate, or unhealthy air quality Long-term trends in annual average concentrations of criteria pollutants Number of children living in counties with high annual averages of PM-10 Hazardous Air Pollutants Percentage of children living in counties where estimated hazardous air pollutant concentrations were greater than health benchmarks 1990-2001 1990-1999 1990-2000 1990-2000 1996 Description of Measure Year(s)
Indoor Air Pollutants Environmental Tobacco Smoke Drinking Water Contaminants Drinking Water Contaminants Percentage of children living in areas served by public water systems that exceeded a drinking water standard or violated treatment requirements Percentage of children living in areas with major violations of drinking water monitoring and reporting requirements Percentage of fruits, vegetables, and grains with detectable residues of organophosphate pesticides Percentage of children residing within one mile of a Superfund site 1993-1999 Percentage of homes with children under 7 where someone smokes regularly 1994-1999
Monitoring and Reporting Pesticide Residues Land Contaminants Body Burdens Concentrations of Lead in Blood
1993-1999 1994-2001 1990-2000
Concentration of lead in blood of children ages 5 and under Median concentrations of lead in blood of children ages 1-5, by race/ethnicity and family income Distribution of concentrations of lead in blood of children ages 1-5
1976-2000 1999-2000 1999-2000 1999-2000 1988-2000
Concentrations of Mercury in Blood Concentrations of Cotinine in Blood
Distribution of concentrations of mercury in blood of women of child-bearing age Concentrations of cotinine in blood of children
Summary List of Measures
15
Summary List of Measures Name Childhood Illnesses Respiratory Diseases Percentage of children with asthma Percentage of children having an asthma attack in the previous 12 months, by race/ethnicity and family income Children's emergency room visits for asthma and other respiratory causes Children's hospital admissions for asthma and other respiratory causes Childhood Cancer Cancer incidence and mortality for children under 20 Cancer incidence for children under 20 by type Neurodevelopmental Disorders Children reported to have mental retardation, by race/ethnicity and family income 1980-2001 1997-2000 Description of Measure Year(s)
1992-1999 1980-1999 1975-1998 1974-1998 1997-2000
Special Features Lead in California Schools Percentage of California public elementary schools with lead paint and some deterioration of paint Percentage of California public elementary schools with lead in soils Percentage of California public elementary schools with lead in drinking water Pesticide Use in Minnesota Schools Birth Defects in California Frequency of application of pesticides in Minnesota K-12 schools Number of birth defects in California per 1,000 live births and fetal deaths 1994-1997 1994-1997 1994-1997 1999 1991-1999
16
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
PART I
Environmental Contaminants
Environmental Contaminants determining Environmental T racking environmental contaminants is an important step towardthe report preswhether environmental policies protect children.
This section of that can affect childr and disContaminants ents information about environmental contaminantsonment have changed enver time. cusses how levels of these contaminants in the envir o Pollutants or contaminants that can affect the health of children can be found in air, water, food, and soil.
This section includes measures for contaminants in these media.
Most of the measures show the percentages of children who may be at risk from exposure to critical concentrations of pollutants.
This second edition of America's Children and the Environment includes several new measures that reflect pollutants in environmental media.
The report adds a new measure that describes trends in long-term concentrations of pollutants in the air.
This measure builds on the report's first two measures for air pollution, which reflect daily exposures to air pollutants.
Research suggests that exposure to a few days of high concentrations of air pollutants or to many days of lower concentrations both can have adverse effects on health.
The report also includes a new measure concerning pesticide residues in foods.
Describing the significance of pollutants in soils is a difficult problem because contamination often is localized and difficult to capture in a national report.
To improve coverage of contaminants in soil, this report replaces an earlier measure that showed the percentages of children living in counties with a Superfund site with a new measure showing the percentage of children who live within a mile of a Superfund site.
This report does not assess quantitative relationships between the measures for environmental contaminants and childhood illnesses.
The report includes a qualitative discussion of the research that has looked at some of these relationships.
The measures in this section do not account for many environmental contaminants that are important for children but lack nationally representative data.
Such contaminants include those in dusts and soils in and near homes, and contaminants in soil from sources other than Superfund sites.
The measure on food contaminants addresses only a few of the contaminants found in foods: selected pesticides used on certain items of produce.
The measure does not account for pathways, other than the diet, by which children are exposed to pesticides.
For example, pesticides may be transported into homes from outdoors or from the workplace on skin, clothing, or shoes.
Children then may ingest pesticides when they put their hands in their mouths after touching contaminated surfaces or when they put objects in their mouths that have been contaminated with pesticides.
The data used to develop the measures within this section vary in coverage and completeness, as summarized in the chart on the next page.
18
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Environmental Contaminants Coverage of Environmental Contaminant Measures Topic Outdoor Air Pollutants Common Air Pollutants E1: Percentage of children living in counties in which air quality standards were exceeded 1990-2001 County-level data Measure includes five common (criteria) air pollutants.
Many counties monitored only some common air pollutants and some counties did not monitor any.
Measure includes five common air pollutants.
Measure includes three common air pollutants.
Data for one year only; measure is based on estimates of ambient concentrations of 33 of the 188 hazardous air pollutants identified in the Clean Air Act.
Measure is a surrogate for environmental tobacco smoke in the home.
Other indoor pollutants (e.g ., combustion products, volatile organic compounds) would be relevant to include if data could be identified.
Data on violations of standards are incomplete due to monitoring and reporting limitations.
Measure is a surrogate for concentrations of contaminants.
Measure shows percentage of children living in areas where no information on drinking water contaminants is available; children may or may not be at risk.
Surrogate for dietary exposure to residues of organophosphate pesticides.
Other contaminants in food, such as other pesticides and industrial chemicals that are relevant to children, are not included.
Does not reflect exposures from sites that may be hazardous but are not included on the Superfund National Priorities List.
Proximity to a Superfund site does not necessarily indicate that children are exposed to contaminants.
Description of Measure
Year(s)
Geographic Coverage
Notes
E2: Percentage of children's days with good, moderate, or unhealthy air quality E3: Long-term trends in annual average concentrations of criteria pollutants Hazardous Air Pollutants E4: Percentage of children living in counties where estimated hazardous air pollutant concentrations were greater than health benchmarks in 1996 E5: Percentage of homes with children under 7 where someone smokes regularly
1990-1999
County-level data County-level data County-level data
1990-2000
1996
Indoor Air Pollutants Environmental Tobacco Smoke 1994-1999 National-level data
Drinking Water Contaminants Drinking Water Contaminants E6: Percentage of children living in areas served by public water systems that exceeded a drinking water standard or violated treatment requirements E7: Percentage of children living in areas with major violations of drinking water monitoring and reporting requirements 1993-1999 County-level data
Monitoring and Reporting
1993-1999
County-level data
Food Contaminants Pesticide Residues E8: Percentage of fruits, vegetables, and grains with detectable residues of organophosphate pesticides 1994-2001 National-level data
Land Contaminants Hazardous Waste Sites E9: Percentage of children residing within one mile of a Superfund site 1990-2000 Site-specific locations
Part 1: Environmental Contaminants
19
Outdoor Air Pollutants Common ("Criteria") Air Pollutants Air pollution contributes to a wide variety of adverse health effects.
Six of the most common air pollutants--carbon monoxide, lead, ground-level ozone, particulate matter, nitrogen dioxide, and sulfur dioxide--are known as "criteria" pollutants because EPA uses health-based criteria as the basis for setting permissible levels of these pollutants in the atmosphere.
EPA periodically conducts comprehensive reviews of the scientific literature on health effects associated with exposure to the criteria air pollutants.
The resulting "criteria documents" critically assess the scientific literature and serve as the basis for making regulatory decisions about whether to retain or revise the National Ambient Air Quality Standards (NAAQS) that specify the allowable concentrations of each of these pollutants in the air.
The standards are set at a level that protects public health with an adequate margin of safety.
However, the standards are not "risk free."
Even in areas that meet the standards, there may be days when unusually sensitive individuals, including children, experience health effects related to air pollution.
This is especially the case for pollutants such as ozone and particulate matter that do not have discernible thresholds below which health effects are absent.
Some of the standards are designed to protect the public from adverse health effects that can occur after being exposed for a short time, such as one hour or one day.
Other standards are designed to protect people from health effects that can occur after being exposed for a much longer time, such as a year.
For example, current standards for carbon monoxide are for short-term periods of one hour and eight hours.
By contrast, the current standard for nitrogen dioxide is for one year.
The standards and the varying time periods for which they apply are shown in Table 1 in Appendix B. Some pollutants have both short-term and long-term standards.
Health effects that have been associated with each of these pollutants are summarized below.
This information is drawn from EPA's criteria documents as well as more recent studies.
Ground-level Ozone Short-term (also known as "acute") exposure to ground-level ozone can cause a variety of respiratory health effects, including inflammation of the lung, reduced lung function, and respiratory symptoms such as cough, chest pain, and shortness of breath.
It also can decrease the capacity to perform exercise.1 Exposure to ambient concentrations of ozone also has been associated with the exacerbation of asthma, bronchitis, and respiratory effects serious enough to require emergency room visits and hospital admissions.1 Some evidence suggests that high ozone concentrations may contribute to increased mortality.1
Health effects associated with long-term (also known as "chronic") exposure to ozone are not as well established and documented as health effects associated with short-term exposure, but long-term exposures also are of concern.
In 1996, EPA's criteria document for ozone concluded that there was insufficient evidence to determine whether health effects resulted directly from long-term exposure, although the evidence suggested that long-term ozone exposure, along with other environmental factors, could be responsible for health effects.1 Since 1996, a few studies suggest that long-term exposure to ozone is associated with decreases in lung function in humans,2 increased prevalence of asthma,3 increased development of asthma in children who exercise outdoors,4 and exacerbation of existing asthma.5
20
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Outdoor Air Pollutants Particulate Matter Particulate matter in the air (often called PM-10 or PM-2.5) has been found to cause increased risk of mortality (death), hospital admissions and emergency room visits for heart and lung diseases, respiratory effects, and decreases in lung function.6 Such health effects have been associated with both short-term and long-term exposure to particulate matter.
Children and adults with asthma are considered to be among the groups most sensitive to respiratory effects.6-10 Studies published since the release of EPA's criteria document for particulate matter have found further evidence of an association between particulate matter and increased respiratory disease and symptoms in children with asthma11 and increased hospitalizations or emergency room visits for persons with asthma.5, 12, 13 Studies also have confirmed that chronic exposure to particulate matter is associated with mortality in adults14-16 and suggest that it may be associated with mortality in infants.17 Also, recent studies suggest that chronic exposure to particulate matter may affect lung function and growth.18, 19
Prior to 1997, the National Ambient Air Quality Standard for particulate matter was based on particulate matter measuring 10 microns or less (PM-10).
In 1997, the standard was revised to address the health risks from particulate matter measuring 2.5 microns or less (PM-2.5).
Lead Lead accumulates in bones, blood, and soft tissues of the body.
Exposure to lead can affect development of the central nervous system in young children, resulting in neurobehavioral effects such as lowered IQ.20 Sulfur Dioxide Sulfur dioxide poses particular concerns for those with asthma, who are considered to be especially susceptible to its effects.21 Short-term exposures of asthmatic individuals to elevated levels of sulfur dioxide while exercising at a moderate level may result in breathing difficulties accompanied by symptoms such as wheezing, chest tightness, or shortness of breath.
Effects that have been associated with longer-term exposures to high concentrations of sulfur dioxide, in conjunction with high levels of particulate matter include respiratory illness, alterations in the lung's defenses, and aggravation of existing cardiovascular diseases.
Carbon Monoxide Exposure to carbon monoxide reduces the capacity of the blood to carry oxygen, thereby decreasing the supply of oxygen to tissues and organs such as the heart.
Short-term exposure can cause effects such as reduced time to onset of angina pain, neurobehavioral effects, and a reduction in exercise performance.22 Long-term exposure has not been studied adequately in humans to draw conclusions regarding possible chronic effects, though a recent study reported an association between long-term exposure to carbon monoxide and other traffic-related pollutants and respiratory symptoms in children.23 Nitrogen Dioxide Exposure to nitrogen dioxide has been associated with a variety of health effects.24 Effects include decreased lung function,23, 25, 26 increased respiratory symptoms or illness,7, 23, 27-29 and increased symptoms in children with asthma.11 Nitrogen dioxide also is a major contributor to the formation of ground-level ozone.1
Part 1: Environmental Contaminants
21
Outdoor Air Pollutants Exceedances of ShortTerm Air Quality Standards State agencies that monitor air quality report their findings to EPA.
In turn, EPA compares the measured values reported by states to the National Ambient Air Quality Standards in order to determine whether pollutants exceed the established standards.
EPA uses the term "exceedance" to refer to a case in which a reported measurement of a pollutant is higher than the standard.
Appendix B includes a description of the methods used to determine whether an exceedance has occurred.
This measure uses EPA data on exceedances of short-term air quality standards in counties in the United States.
This data source simply indicates whether each standard was exceeded at any time during a year.
This measure shows the percentage of children living in areas with any such exceedances, who thus may be exposed to poor daily air quality at some point during a year.
In addition, the measure includes exceedances of the new ozone and particulate matter standards adopted in 1997.
The ozone standard is based on an eight-hour average ozone value.
The new particulate matter standards are for PM-2.5 and have both annual and 24-hour averaging periods.
The annual PM-2.5 standard is intended to protect against both short-term and long-term health effects.
This measure does not differentiate between areas in which standards are exceeded frequently or by a large margin, and areas in which standards are exceeded only rarely or by a small margin.
The measure is based on exceedances of individual standards and does not reflect any combined effect of multiple pollutants.
Also, because the nature of health effects varies significantly and the averaging times associated with different standards vary widely, exceedances for different standards are not comparable.
For example, the ozone standard considers measured levels of ozone within a one-hour or eight-hour period and health effects such as lung function decrements, respiratory symptoms, and hospital admissions.
In contrast, the averaging time for the lead standard is three months and is based on health effects such as IQ decrements and hypertension.
The graph shows the percentage of children who live in counties with exceedances for any of four of the six criteria pollutants.
Nitrogen dioxide is not included, as there is no short-term standard for this compound.
Sulfur dioxide also is not shown, since few exceedances have been reported since 1993.
Healthy People 2010:
Objective 8-01 of Healthy People 2010 aims to reduce the proportion of persons exposed to air that exceeds the levels of U.S. Environmental Protection Agency 's health-based standards for harmful air pollutants.
See Appendix C for more information.
22
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Outdoor Air Pollutants
Measure E1
Percentage of children living in counties in which air quality standards were exceeded 50% Ozone eight-hour standard
40%
30% PM-2.5
20%
Ozone one-hour standard Carbon monoxide PM-10
10%
0% 1990
Lead
1992
1994
1996
1998
2000
2001
SOURCE: U.S. Environm ental Protection Agency, Office of Air and Radiation, Aerom e tric Inform ation Retrieva l System
I The highest number of exceedances is consistently reported for ozone.
In 1990, approximately 23 percent of children lived in counties in which the one-hour ozone standard was exceeded on at least one day per year.
In 2001, approximately 15 percent of children lived in such counties.
Exceedances of the eight-hour ozone standard are reported beginning in 1996.
In 1996-2001, significantly more children lived in counties that exceeded the eighthour ozone standard than in counties that exceeded the one-hour standard.
I In 2000, approximately 27 percent of children lived in counties that exceeded the annual PM-2.5 standard.
In 2001, approximately 25 percent of children lived in such counties.
(The standard is intended to protect against both short-term and long-term health effects and thus PM-2.5 is included in Measure E1.)
I In 1990, approximately 10 percent of children lived in counties in which the carbon monoxide standard was exceeded.
In 2001, approximately 0.2 percent of children lived in such counties.
I From 1990 to 2001, the percentage of children living in counties that exceeded the one-day standard for PM-10 fluctuated, but was as high as 10 percent in 1992 and 1995.
The percentage remained around 2 to 3 percent from 1996-2001.
I Since 1992, on average, 2 percent of children lived in counties that exceeded the three-month standard for lead.
In 2001, the three counties with reported lead exceedances were Madison County, Illinois; Jefferson County, Missouri; and Dallas County, Texas.
I Few exceedances of the sulfur dioxide standard have occurred since 1993.
Consequently, it was not included on the graph.
Childhood Illnesses Respiratory (D1-D4) Neurodevelopmental (D7) Lead in Schools (S1-S3)
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Criteria Air Pollutants (E1-E3)
Body Burdens
Special Features
Criteria Air Pollutants: lead (E1-E2) Lead in Blood (B1-B3) Drinking Water: lead (E6-E7)
Part 1: Environmental Contaminants
23
Outdoor Air Pollutants Daily Air Quality EPA provides an Air Quality Index (AQI) that represents air quality for specific days and is widely reported in newspapers and other media outlets in metropolitan areas.
The AQI is based on measurements of up to five of the six air quality criteria pollutants (carbon monoxide, ground-level ozone, nitrogen dioxide, particulate matter, and sulfur dioxide).
Lead is not included in the AQI.
The specific pollutants considered in the AQI for each metropolitan area depend on which pollutants are monitored in that area.
Each pollutant concentration is given a value on a scale that is related to the air quality standards for that pollutant.
An AQI value of 100 for a criteria pollutant generally corresponds to the short-term National Ambient Air Quality Standard for that pollutant, and is the level EPA has set to protect public health for a single day.
Above this level, pollutant-specific health advisories are issued.
The daily AQI is based on the pollutant with the highest index value on the scale that day.
It does not add up values for more than one pollutant.
Therefore, it does not reflect the possible effects of simultaneous exposure to high levels of multiple pollutants.
EPA has divided the AQI scale into categories.
Air quality is considered "good" if the AQI is between 0 and 50, posing little or no risk.
Air quality is considered "moderate" if the AQI is between 51 and 100.
Some pollutants at this level may present a moderate health concern for a small number of individuals.
Moreover, such a level may pose health risks if maintained over many days.
Air quality is considered "unhealthy for sensitive groups" if the AQI is between 101 and 150.
Members of sensitive groups such as children may experience health effects, but the general population is unlikely to be affected.
Air quality is considered "unhealthy" if the AQI is between 151 and 200.
The general population may begin to experience health effects, and members of sensitive groups may experience more serious health effects.
Measure E2 on the following page is based on the reported AQI for counties of the United States.
(Not all counties have air quality monitoring stations.)
This measure was developed by reviewing the air quality designation for each day for each county and weighting the daily designations by the number of children living in each county.
The overall measure reports the percentage of children's days of exposure considered to be of good, moderate, or unhealthy air quality.
The advantage of this approach, compared with that used in measure E1, is that it provides a sense of the intensity of pollution over the course of a year.
This method provides data on the air quality category for each day, rather than simply reporting whether a county ever exceeds any standard for any pollutant.
However, the method has some limitations.
The AQI is based on the single pollutant with the highest value for each day; it does not reflect any combined effect of multiple pollutants.
It reflects only short-term, daily pollution burdens.
It does not include lead.
The approach is influenced by the frequency of measurements.
Because the AQI is reported daily, pollutants that are measured daily--such as ozone--will appear to have more effect than those that are measured less frequently, such as PM-10, which typically is measured every six days.
Also, the AQI is not well-suited for reporting concentrations of nitrogen dioxide, because this pollutant does not have a short-term standard.
24
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Outdoor Air Pollutants Measure E2
Percentage of children's days with good, moderate, or unhealthy air quality 60%
50% Good
40% No Monitoring Data
30% Moderate
20%
10% Unhealthy
0% 1990 1992 1994 1996 1998 1999
SOURCE: U.S. Environm ental Protection Agency, Office of Air and Radiation, Aerom e tric Information Retrieva l System
I The percentage of days that were designated as having "unhealthy" air quality (including days that were unhealthy for everyone as well as those that were unhealthy for sensitive groups) decreased between 1990 and 1999, dropping from 3 percent in 1990 to less than 1 percent in 1999.
The percentage of days with "moderate" air quality remained around 20 percent between 1990 and 1999, although an upward trend is suggested by the fact that the percentage of moderate air quality days was higher in 1999 than for any other year in this analysis.
As the percentage of either unhealthy or good air days decreases, the percentage of moderate days would be expected to increase.
I The coverage of monitoring for this measure, in terms of area and percentage of days monitored, was largely unchanged between 1990 and 1999.
Approximately 30 percent of children's days of exposure to air pollutants were not monitored.
This percentage includes days for which no AQI was reported in counties where the AQI is sometimes reported, as well as counties in which the AQI is not reported at all.
On days that were monitored, in many cases only one or a few pollutants were monitored.
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Criteria Air Pollutants (E1-E3)
Body Burdens
Childhood Illnesses Respiratory (D1-D4)
Special Features
Part 1: Environmental Contaminants
25
Outdoor Air Pollutants Long-Term Exposure to Criteria Air Pollutants Most measures used to describe air pollution focus on days when pollutant levels are high.
This approach is appropriate because high pollution levels over short periods of time, even less than a day, can contribute to many adverse health effects.1 Accumulated exposures to criteria air pollutants over longer periods of time also may affect health.
As it has for short-term exposures, EPA has set standards for longer time periods for some pollutants.
The concentrations of air pollutants in the long-term air pollution standards established by EPA are not "risk-free."
Even in areas that meet the standards, unusually sensitive individuals, including children, may experience health effects related to air pollution.
This is especially true for pollutants, such as particulate matter, that do not have discernible thresholds below which health effects are absent.
Comparisons of pollutant concentrations with longer-term air quality standards can help identify the pollutants that pose the greatest concerns.
Such comparisons can provide a perspective on whether pollutants pose equal or different levels of concern with regard to long-term exposure.
Measure E3a presents trends in the long-term exposures of children to three of the six criteria pollutants that have long-term standards: particulate matter, sulfur dioxide, and nitrogen dioxide.
This measure reflects annual averages of pollutants.
It shows how the average exposure of children compares with the applicable long-term National Ambient Air Quality Standard, and how the long-term exposure has changed over the last several years.
The values shown in Measure E3a are all based on standards for individual pollutants, and do not reflect any combined effect of multiple pollutants.
For nitrogen dioxide and sulfur dioxide, data are available only for 1996-1999.
For PM-10, data are available for 1990-2000.
EPA adopted a new standard for PM-2.5 (finer particles) in 1997, but several years of data on PM-2.5 were not available for this report.
Measure E3b shows the number of children living in counties where long-term standards for PM-10 have been exceeded.
Exposure to particulate matter has increasingly been recognized as a health concern.
Health effects have been documented at concentrations that are experienced in the United States today.
In addition, as noted above, research suggests that there is no "safe" level of particulate matter and that any exposure poses some risk.6 It is therefore valuable to track the number of children who live in counties where particulate matter concentrations, while not exceeding the standard, are relatively high.
Measure E3b provides additional perspective on the concentrations of PM-10 to which children are exposed, by showing the number of children who live in counties that exceed 80 percent of the long-term standard.
This is a somewhat arbitrary cutoff, as a different value (such as 90 percent or 75 percent) could have been chosen.
However, the measure does provide an indication of the percentage of children who are living in areas where measured concentrations are fairly close to the standard and are of interest for tracking purposes.
26
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Outdoor Air Pollutants Measure E3a
Long-term trends in annual average concentrations of criteria pollutants 70% 60% PM-10, percent of annual standard
50% 40% Nitrogen dioxide, percent of annual standard
30% 20% 10% Sulfur dioxide, percent of annual standard
0% 1990 1992 1994 1996 1998 2000
SOURCE: U.S. Environm ental Protection Agency, Office of Air and Radiation, Aerom e tric Inform ation Retrieva l System
I In 1990, on average, children experienced a concentration of 31.9 µg/m3 of PM-10, which represents 64 percent of the standard for the year.
By 1995, the concentration had fallen to 54 percent of the standard, and it has remained at about that level since.
From 1990-2000, between 55 and 66 percent of children lived in counties with monitoring stations for PM-10.
I In 1996, on average, children experienced a concentration of 0.02 parts per million of nitrogen dioxide, which represents 37 percent of the standard for the year.
By 1999, this percentage had fallen to 34 percent of the standard on average.
During these years, between 45 and 47 percent of children lived in counties with monitoring stations for nitrogen dioxide.
I In 1996, on average, children living in counties with monitoring stations experienced a concentration of 0.002 parts per million of sulfur dioxide, which represents 6.5 percent of the standard for the year.
By 1999, this percentage had fallen to 5.2 percent of the standard on average.
During these years, between 31 and 36 percent of children lived in counties with monitoring stations for sulfur dioxide.
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Criteria Air Pollutants (E1-E3)
Body Burdens
Childhood Illnesses Respiratory (D1-D4)
Special Features
Part 1: Environmental Contaminants
27
Outdoor Air Pollutants
Measure E3b
Number of children living in counties with high annual averages of PM-10
6 Exceeding 80 percent of the long-term standard
Number of children (millions)
5
4 3 2 Exceeding the long-term standard
1
1990
1992
1994
1996
1998
2000
SOURCE: U.S. Environm ental Protection Agency, Office of Air and Radiation, Aerom e tric Inform ation Retrieva l System
I In 2000, about 1 million children experienced an average PM-10 concentration above the annual standard, down from about 2 million in 1990.
I In 2000, about 2 million children experienced a relatively high average concentration of PM-10 (greater than 80 percent of the annual standard), down from about 6 million children in 1990.
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Criteria Air Pollutants (E1-E3)
Body Burdens
Childhood Illnesses Respiratory (D1-D4)
Special Features
28
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Outdoor Air Pollutants Hazardous air pollutants, also known as air toxics, have been associated with a number of adverse human health effects, including cancers, asthma and other respiratory ailments, and neurological problems such as learning disabilities and hyperactivity.30-38 The Clean Air Act identifies 188 substances as hazardous air pollutants.
Examples include benzene, trichloroethylene, mercury, chromium, and dioxin.
EPA establishes standards for hazardous air pollutant emissions for separate source categories.
Hazardous pollutants are emitted from sources that are grouped into three general categories: major sources, area sources, and mobile sources.
Major sources typically are large industrial facilities such as chemical manufacturing plants, refineries, and waste incinerators.
These sources may release air toxics from equipment leaks, when materials are transferred from one location to another, or during discharge through emission stacks or vents.
Area sources typically are smaller stationary facilities such as dry cleaners.
Though emissions from individual area sources often are relatively small, collectively their emissions can be of concern--particularly where large numbers of sources are located in heavily populated areas.
Mobile sources include both on-road sources, such as cars, light trucks, large trucks and buses, and non-road sources such as farm and construction equipment, lawn and garden equipment, marine engines, aircraft, and locomotives.
Unlike the criteria air pollutants, hazardous air pollutants have no national air quality standards that can be used to construct a health-based measure.
Instead, the measure shown here compares estimates of ambient concentrations for 33 hazardous air pollutants with health benchmark concentrations derived from scientific assessments conducted by EPA and other environmental agencies.32, 38-40
Hazardous Air Pollutants
Part 1: Environmental Contaminants
29
Outdoor Air Pollutants Hazardous Air Pollutants and Health Benchmarks This analysis compares ambient concentrations of hazardous air pollutants with three health benchmark concentrations.
Two benchmarks reflect potential cancer risks, at levels of 1-in-100,000 risk and 1-in-10,000 risk.
If a particular hazardous air pollutant is present in ambient air at a 1-in-100,000 benchmark concentration, for example, one additional case of cancer would be expected in a population of 100,000 people exposed for a lifetime.
The third benchmark concentration corresponds to the level at which exposure to the hazardous air pollutant is judged to be of minimal risk; exposures above this benchmark may be associated with adverse health effects other than cancer.
The three benchmarks generally reflect health risks to adults, rather than potential risks to children or risks in adulthood stemming from childhood exposure.
Benchmarks are not available to reflect the latter concerns.
Further, the benchmarks reflect risks of continuous exposure over the course of a lifetime.
Potential risks from very high short-term exposures, or from elevated exposures that may be experienced during childhood, are not addressed by these benchmarks.
Therefore, this analysis does not represent a prediction of actual cancer rates in children.
The estimates of ambient concentrations of 33 air toxics for the year 1996 were generated as part of EPA's National Air Toxics Assessment.
A computer model provided estimates for every county in the continental United States.
The computer estimates generally are consistent with the limited set of actual measurements of ambient air toxics concentrations available for 1996, though at many locations the model estimates are lower than the measured concentrations.
Actual exposures may differ from ambient concentrations.
Indoor concentrations of hazardous air pollutants from outdoor sources may be slightly lower than ambient concentrations, though they can be significantly higher if any indoor sources are present.
Levels of some hazardous pollutants may be substantially higher inside cars and school buses, and those higher levels would increase the risks.
This measure only considers exposures to air toxics that occur by inhalation.
For many air toxics, dietary exposures also are important.
Air toxics that are persistent in the environment settle out of the atmosphere onto land and water, and then accumulate in fish and other animals in the food web.
For hazardous air pollutants that are persistent in the environment, exposures through food consumption typically are greater than inhalation exposures.
Hazardous air pollutants for which these food chain exposures are important include mercury, dioxins, and PCBs.41-43
Healthy People 2010:
Objective 8-04 of Healthy People 2010 focuses on reducing emissions of hazardous air pollutants.
See Appendix C for more information.
30
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Outdoor Air Pollutants
Measure E4
Percentage of children living in counties where estimated hazardous air pollutant concentrations were greater than health benchmarks in 1996 100% 90% 80% 70% 60% 50% 40% 30% 20% 10% 0% Cancer Benchmark: 1-in-100,000 Cancer Benchmark: 1-in-10,000 Benchmark for Other Health Effects
SOURCE: U.S. Environm ental Protection Agency, National Air To xics Assessm ent
I In 1996, all children lived in counties in which the combined estimated concentrations of hazardous air pollutant exceeded the 1-in-100,000 cancer risk benchmark.
I Eighteen percent of children lived in counties in which hazardous air pollutants combined to exceed the 1-in10,000 cancer risk benchmark.
The pollutants that contributed most to this result were formaldehyde (mostly from mobile sources) and chromium (mostly from chromium electroplating).
Formaldehyde is considered by EPA to be a "probable human carcinogen" and chromium is a "known human carcinogen."
I Approximately 95 percent of children lived in counties in which at least one hazardous air pollutant exceeded the benchmark for health effects other than cancer.
In almost all cases, this result was attributable to the pollutant acrolein, which is a respiratory irritant.
More than 75 percent of acrolein emissions are from mobile sources such as cars, trucks, buses, planes, and construction equipment.
I Exposures to diesel particulate matter are not included in this measure, because of uncertainty regarding the appropriate values to use as cancer benchmarks.
Some studies have found that cancer risks from diesel particulate matter exceed those of the hazardous air pollutants considered in this measure.44 Although EPA does not endorse any particular cancer benchmark value for diesel particulate matter, if the State of California's benchmark for diesel particulate matter were used in this analysis, 98 percent of children would live in counties where hazardous air pollutant estimates combined to exceed the 1-in-10,000 cancer risk benchmark.
Part 1: Environmental Contaminants
31
Indoor Air Pollutants Environmental Tobacco Smoke: Smoking in the Home Children can be exposed to a number of air pollutants that come from sources inside homes, schools, and other buildings.
Indoor sources include combustion sources such as gas stoves, fireplaces, and cigarettes; building materials such as treated wood and paints, furnishings, carpet, and fabrics; and consumer products such as sprays, pesticides, window cleaners, and laundry soap.
Indoor air pollutants also can come from outside, as air pollution penetrates indoors.
Information on the toxic effects of air pollutants from indoor sources indicates that they could pose health risks to children.45, 46 Children who are exposed to environmental tobacco smoke, also known as secondhand smoke, are at increased risk for a number of adverse health effects, including lower respiratory tract infections, bronchitis, pneumonia, fluid in the middle ear, asthma symptoms, and sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS).47-52 Exposure to environmental tobacco smoke also may be a risk factor contributing to the development of new cases of asthma.48, 53, 54 Young children appear to be more susceptible to the effects of environmental tobacco smoke than older children are.46, 48 Smoking in the home is an important source most of their time at home and indoors.
The shows the percentage of homes with children larly.
Most often the smoker in the home is a of exposure because young children spend measure for environmental tobacco smoke under 7 in which someone smokes reguparent.
This measure is a surrogate for the exposure of children to tobacco smoke.
The data come from a national survey and are available for 1994, 1996, and 1999.
The measure reflects the percentage of homes, rather than children, although it is expected that the two would track closely.
Healthy People 2010:
Objective 27-9 of Healthy People 2010 is to reduce the proportion of children who are regularly exposed to tobacco smoke at home.
See Appendix C for more information.
32
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Indoor Air Pollutants
Measure E5
Percentage of homes with children under 7 where someone smokes regularly 35% 30% 25% 20% 15% 10% 5% 0% 1994 1996 1999
SOURCE: U.S. Environm ental Protection Agency, Office of Air and Radiation, Indoor Environm ents Di vi sion, Su rveys on Radon Awareness and En vironmental Tobacco Issues
I The percentage of homes with children under 7 in which someone smokes on a regular basis decreased from 29 percent in 1994 to 19 percent in 1999.
I This measure shows the percentage of homes where a regular smoker lives.
However, some percentage of these regular smokers may not actually smoke inside the home.
The percentage of children who are exposed to secondhand smoke in the home thus may be smaller than suggested by the graph above.
I In 1999, an estimated 23.5 percent of adults were current smokers, down from 25.0 percent in 1993.
55
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Environmental Tobacco Smoke (E5)
Body Burdens Cotinine in Blood (B5)
Childhood Illnesses Respiratory (D1-D4)
Special Features
Part 1: Environmental Contaminants
33
34
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Drinking Water Contaminants The contaminants in drinking water are quite varied and may cause a range of diseases in children, including acute diseases such as gastrointestinal illness, developmental effects such as learning disorders, and cancer.56 Children are particularly sensitive to microbial contaminants because their immune systems are less developed than those of most adults.56 Children are sensitive to lead, which affects brain development,58-65 and to nitrates and nitrites, which can cause methemoglobinemia (blue baby syndrome).66-68 Fertilizer, livestock manures, and human sewage are significant contributors of nitrates and nitrites in groundwater sources used for drinking water.69-71 EPA sets drinking water standards for public water systems, referred to as Maximum Contaminant Levels (MCLs).72 These standards are designed to protect people against adverse health effects from contaminants in drinking water while taking into account the technical feasibility of meeting the standard and balancing costs and benefits.
EPA has set MCLs for more than 80 microbial contaminants, chemicals, and radionuclides.
EPA also has developed regulations to protect drinking water sources and to require treatment of drinking water.
An important treatment-related regulation, the Surface Water Treatment Rule, requires treatment of surface waters used for drinking water by filtration to remove microbial contaminants.
Drinking water rules often are added or modified.
For example, EPA established more stringent filter performance requirements in 1998 to further strengthen protection against microbial contaminants.
In the same year, EPA also established new drinking water standards for disinfection byproducts, exposure to which has been associated with bladder cancer73 and possible reproductive effects.74 In 2000, EPA finalized standards protecting against radionuclides in drinking water.75 In addition, EPA strengthened the existing standard for arsenic in 2001.
Changes in regulatory requirements may affect the outcome of the measures presented in this report, as the resulting trends sometimes may be related to changes in standards rather than changes in exposures.
Contaminants in Children's Drinking Water
Part 1: Environmental Contaminants
35
Drinking Water Contaminants Exceedances of Drinking Water Standards One way to measure children's risk of exposure to contaminated drinking water is to identify public water systems that contain contaminants at levels greater than those allowed by the drinking water standards.
Ideally, concentrations for all chemical and microbial contaminants in all drinking water systems would be available for analysis to identify areas of risk for children.
Currently this is not possible.
The Safe Drinking Water Information System (SDWIS) does not track concentrations of contaminants in drinking water, but instead tracks the frequency with which standards are exceeded.
Public water systems are required to monitor individual contaminants at specific time intervals to assess whether they have achieved compliance with drinking water standards.
When a violation of a drinking water standard is detected, the public water system is required to report the violation to state and federal governments.
Information about exceedances can be used as a surrogate for exposure to unacceptably high levels of drinking water contaminants.
The reported violations received by the federal government are highly accurate, but violations may be under-reported in some cases because some public water systems fail to fully monitor contaminants or report their monitoring results.
Data identifying public water systems that do not monitor or report their results are available.
A review of the federal SDWIS database published in October 2000 found that 68 percent of the microbial contaminant violations, 19 percent of violations for other contaminants, and 11 percent of treatment and filtration violations that should be included in the SDWIS database are reported.76 As a result of these findings, many states have taken corrective steps to improve their SDWIS data quality.
It also is important to consider information about water sources that are not included in the SDWIS database.
Because data are only available for public water systems, this measure does not include children served by private water sources, such as wells or bottled water.
Approximately 42 million people are served by private water systems that are not required to monitor and report the quality of drinking water.77 Many people served by private water supplies live in rural and agricultural areas, which may be at increased risk for nitrate and nitrite contamination.
Conversely, many children served by public water systems may not drink the tap water or may use a water filtration device to further purify the water.
Thus, the measure may overestimate the percentage of children exposed to contaminated drinking water.
A violation of "treatment and filtration" is defined as any failure in the treatment process, or in operation and maintenance activities, or both, that may affect water quality.78 The Surface Water Treatment Rule specifies the type of treatment and maintenance activities that systems must use to prevent microbial contamination of drinking water.
Healthy People 2010:
Objective 8-05 of Healthy People 2010 seeks to increase the number of people served by community water systems that meet the regulations of the Safe Drinking Water Act.
See Appendix C for more information.
36
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Drinking Water Contaminants Measure E6
Percentage of children living in areas served by public water systems that exceeded a drinking water standard or violated treatment requirements 25%
Any health-based violations
20%
15% Treatment and filtration
10% Microbial contaminants
5% Chemical and radiation Lead and copper Nitrate/nitrite
0% 1993 1994 1995 1996 1997 1998 1999
SOURCE: U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, Office of W ater, Safe Drinking W ater Information System (Percentages are estimated)
I The percentage of children served by public water systems that reported exceeding a Maximum Contaminant Level or violated a treatment standard decreased from 20 percent in 1993 to 8 percent in 1999.
I Every category of reported violation decreased between 1993 and 1999 except for nitrates and nitrites, which remained steady.
The largest decline was for violations of the treatment and filtration standards.
I From 1993-1999, approximately 0.2 percent of the children served by public water systems were served by systems that reported violations of the nitrate or nitrite standard.
I Between 1993 and 1999, fewer than 0.2 percent of all children served by public water systems were served by systems that had violations of the Total Trihalomethane (TTHM) standard.
Four recent epidemiological studies have found significant associations between elevated TTHM exposure and stillbirth or miscarriages, but more study is necessary before any definitive conclusion can be made.79-86
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants
Body Burdens
Childhood Illnesses Neurodevelopmental (D7)
Special Features Lead in Schools (S1-S3)
Criteria Air Pollutants: lead (E1-E2) Lead in Blood (B1-B3) Drinking Water: lead (E6-E7)
Part 1: Environmental Contaminants
37
Drinking Water Contaminants Monitoring and Reporting Public water systems are required to monitor for contaminants and to report violations of drinking water standards to EPA.
However, some public water systems do not conduct all of the required monitoring.
Not all systems report violations.
Such water systems violate monitoring and reporting requirements.
Some monitoring and reporting violations, such as late reporting, are minor.
However, many water systems have major violations.
For example, some water systems fail to collect any water samples during specified monitoring periods.
Children who live in areas that are not adequately monitoring for water contaminants or reporting violations may be at risk, but the extent of any possible exposures in violations of drinking water standards and their associated risks is unknown.
38
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Drinking Water Contaminants Measure E7
Percentage of children living in areas with major violations of drinking water monitoring and reporting requirements 25% Any major violation
20%
15% Lead and copper
10% Chemical and radiation Microbial contaminants Treatment and filtration
5%
0% 1993 1994 1995 1996 1997 1998 1999
SOURCE: U.S. Environmental Protection Agency, Office of W ater, Safe Drinking W ater Information System (Percentages are estimated)
I In 1993, approximately 22 percent of children lived in an area served by a public water system that had at least one major monitoring and reporting violation.
This figure decreased to about 10 percent in 1999.
I The largest number of monitoring and reporting violations occurred for the lead and copper standards.
Approximately 11 percent of children in 1993 were served by public water systems with monitoring and reporting violations for lead and copper, decreasing to about 5 percent in 1995.
The number has remained relatively constant since then.
I The percentage of children living in areas with a major chemical and radiation monitoring violation declined from approximately 8 percent in 1993 to about 3 percent in 1999.
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants
Body Burdens
Childhood Illnesses Neurodevelopmental (D7)
Special Features Lead in Schools (S1-S3)
Criteria Air Pollutants: lead (E1-E2) Lead in Blood (B1-B3) Drinking Water: lead (E6-E7)
Part 1: Environmental Contaminants
39
Pesticide Residues Pesticide Residues on Foods Frequently Consumed by Children Children may be exposed to pesticides and other contaminants in their food and through day-to-day activities around the home.
EPA regulates the amounts of pesticides in food, termed "residues," through standards called "food tolerances."
A tolerance is a legal limit on the amount of pesticide residue in a particular food.
Children's exposures to pesticides may be higher than the exposures of most adults.
Pound for pound, children generally eat more than adults, and they may be exposed more heavily to certain pesticides because they consume a diet different from that of adults.87 Among the agricultural commodities that are consumed by children in large amounts are apples, corn, oranges, rice, and wheat.
Organophosphate pesticides frequently are applied to many of the foods important in children's diets, and certain organophosphate pesticide residues can be detected in small quantities.
When exposure to organophosphate pesticides is sufficiently high, they interfere with the proper functioning of the nervous system.88 There are approximately 40 organophosphates, and as a group they account for approximately half of the insecticide use in the United States.
The majority of organophosphate use is on food crops--including corn, fruits, vegetables, and nuts.
In addition, organophosphate pesticides often have been used in and around the home.
Examples of organophosphate pesticides include chlorpyrifos, azinphos methyl, methyl parathion, and phosmet.
The U.S. Department of Agriculture (USDA) collects annual data on pesticide residues in food.
Among the foods sampled by the USDA's Pesticide Data Program in recent years are several that are important parts of children's diets, including apples, apple juice, bananas, carrots, green beans, orange juice, peaches, pears, potatoes, and tomatoes.
The chart on the following page displays the percentage of food samples with detectable organophosphate pesticide residues reported by the Pesticide Data Program from 1994 to 2001.
The 34 organophosphates that were sampled in each of these years are included; other organophosphates that have been added to the program in recent years are excluded so that the chart represents a consistent set of pesticides for all years shown.
This measure is a surrogate for children's exposure to pesticides in foods: If the frequency of detectable levels of pesticides in foods decreases, it is likely that exposures will decrease.
However, this measure does not account for many additional factors that affect the risk to children.
For example, some organophosphates pose greater risks to children than others do, and residues on some foods may pose greater risks than residues on other foods due to differences in amounts consumed.
In addition, year-toyear changes in the percentage of samples with detectable pesticide residues may be affected by changes in the selection of foods that are sampled each year.
In accordance with the Food Quality Protection Act (FQPA) of 1996, EPA currently is reassessing all food tolerances to assure that they comply with the FQPA's "reasonable certainty of no harm" standard, with a particular focus on protecting children's health.
EPA has concluded that a substantial portion of the existing tolerances for organophosphate pesticides meet the stringent safety standards of the FQPA and that a significant portion of the potential exposure to organophosphate pesticides is associated with only a small number of uses of these compounds.
Healthy People 2010:
Objective 8-24 of Healthy People 2010 addresses exposure to common pesticides.
See Appendix C for more information.
40
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Pesticide Residues Measure E8
Percentage of fruits, vegetables, and grains with detectable residues of organophosphate pesticides 35% 30% 25% 20% 15% 10% 5% 0% 1994 1995 1996 1997 1998 1999 2000 2001
SOURCE: U.S. Departm ent of Agriculture, Pesticide Data Program
I Between 1994 and 2001, the percentage of food samples with detectable organophosphate pesticide residues ranged between 19 percent and 29 percent.
The highest detection rates were observed during 1996 and 1997, while the lowest detection rate was observed in 2001.
I Between 1993 and 2001, the amount of organophosphate pesticides used on foods most frequently consumed by children declined by 44 percent, from 25 million pounds to 14 million pounds.89
I In 1999-2000, EPA imposed new restrictions on the use of the organophosphate pesticides azinphos methyl, chlorpyrifos, and methyl parathion on certain food crops and around the home, due largely to concerns about potential exposures of children.
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Pesticide Residues (E8)
Body Burdens
Childhood Illnesses
Special Features Pesticide Use in Schools (S4)
Part 1: Environmental Contaminants
41
Land Contaminants Hazardous Waste Sites Abandoned and uncontrolled hazardous waste sites may pose risks to children who play in or near them.90, 91 These sites also may cause pollution of drinking water, ambient air, and foods.
Superfund is the federal government's program to clean up hazardous sites.
EPA's principal mechanism for placing sites on Superfund's National Priorities List (NPL) is a scoring system that uses information from initial, limited investigations to assess the relative potential of sites to pose a threat to human health or the environment.
Sites with scores indicating a high risk potential are proposed for addition to the NPL. EPA then accepts public comments on sites, responds to comments, and finalizes the listing for those sites that continue to meet the requirements for addition to the list.
Sites on the NPL are studied in detail and cleaned up to the extent necessary to protect human health and the environment.
Cleanup has been completed at more than 250 of approximately 1,500 sites to date, and EPA has removed those sites from the NPL.
From 1990-2000, 294 sites were added to the NPL.
Because the addition and subtraction of sites on the NPL is a continuous process, the number of sites on the NPL stayed relatively constant during this period.
The removal of sites from the NPL indicates a decreased risk of exposure to hazardous contaminants.
Conversely, the addition of sites to the NPL in recent years does not necessarily reflect an increase in hazards to children.
Most of the newly listed sites have been contaminated for many years, many have had exposure restrictions (e.g., fences, or partial cleanups), and their addition to the NPL in the 1990s means only that EPA has recognized the contamination and that the administrative processes required for listing have been completed.
Sites at which substantial cleanup work has been completed may be designated as having reached "Construction Completion."
This means that any physical construction necessary to reduce potential exposures has been completed, and other controls are in place to prevent exposure while final cleanup levels are being achieved.
Sites with controlled pollution sources represent a level of site remediation at which potential exposures have been significantly reduced, although additional cleanup work remains.
Residence within a mile of a Superfund site is a surrogate measure for exposure to contaminants found at these sites.
This measure covers the entire nation and includes data for multiple years.
However, residence near a hazardous waste site does not directly represent risks of adverse health effects; the hazards posed to children may vary significantly across the different Superfund sites.
In particular, sites that have been controlled (those that have reached Construction Completion) are less likely to pose a hazard than those that are uncontrolled.
Some children living near an uncontrolled Superfund site may have relatively low exposure to contaminants originating from that site, while others may have high exposure.
This surrogate measure does not imply any specific relationship between childhood illness and a child's proximity to a Superfund site.
This measure may underestimate the number of children living near hazardous waste sites, since many hazardous sites are not included on the Superfund NPL.
For example, the NPL does not include contaminated sites managed by states or addressed as part of the Resource Conservation and Recovery Act corrective action program.
Also, this measure most likely underestimates the number of children residing within one mile of a Superfund site, as each site is represented by a single point even though many sites are spread over large areas.
Healthy People 2010:
Objective 8-12 of Healthy People 2010 addresses the mitigation of hazardous waste sites on the National Priority List.
See Appendix C for more information.
42
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Land Contaminants
Measure E9
Percentage of children residing within one mile of a Superfund site 5%
4%
3%
2% All Superfund sites
1% All Superfund sites not yet cleaned up or controlled
0% 1990 1992 1994 1996 1998 2000
SOURCE: U.S. Environm ental Protection Agency, Superfund NPL Assessm ent Program (SNAP) Database
I As of September 2000, about 0.8 percent of children lived within one mile of a Superfund site listed on the National Priorities List (NPL) that had not yet been cleaned up or controlled, down from about 1.3 percent in 1990.
As of September 2000, about 1.3 percent of children lived within one mile of any Superfund site listed on the Superfund NPL.
I More than 750 out of the approximately 1,500 sites on Superfund's NPL have reached Construction Completion, indicating that potential for exposure has been significantly reduced and controlled.
For these sites, any physical construction necessary to reduce potential exposures has been completed, and other controls are in place to prevent exposure while final cleanup levels are being achieved.
Final cleanup has been completed at more than 250 of these sites and they have been removed from the NPL.
I As of 2000, approximately 500,000 children lived within one mile of a Superfund site that had been cleaned up or controlled since 1990.
Part 1: Environmental Contaminants
43
References 1.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
1996.
Air Quality Criteria for Ozone and Related Photochemical Oxidants.
Washington, DC: National Center for Environmental Assessment, Office of Research and Development.
EPA/600/P-93/004aF. http://www.epa.gov/ttn/oarpg/t1cd.html.
2.
N. Kunzli, F. Lurmann, M. Segal, L. Ngo, J. Balmes and I. B. Tager.
1997.
Association between lifetime ambient ozone exposure and pulmonary function in college freshmen--results of a pilot study.
Environmental Research 72 (1):8-23.
3.
M. Ramadour, C. Burel, A. Lanteaume, D. Vervloet, D. Charpin, F. Brisse and H. Dutau.
2000.
Prevalence of asthma and rhinitis in relation to long-term exposure to gaseous air pollutants.
Allerg y 55 (12):1163-9.
4.
R. McConnell, K. Berhane, F. Gilliland, S. J. London, T. Islam, W. J. Gauderman, E. Avol, H. G. Margolis and J. M. Peters.
2002.
Asthma in exercising children exposed to ozone: a cohort study.
Lancet 359 (9304):386-91.
5.
P. E. Tolbert, J. A. Mulholland, D. L. MacIntosh, F. Xu, D. Daniels, O. J. Devine, B. P. Carlin, M. Klein, J. Dorley, A. J. Butler, D. F. Nordenberg, H. Frumkin, P. B. Ryan and M. C. White.
2000.
Air quality and pediatric emergency room visits for asthma in Atlanta, Georgia, USA.
American Journal of Epidemiolog y 151 (8):798-810.
6.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
1996.
Air Quality Criteria for Particulate Matter.
Washington, DC: National Center for Environmental Assessment, Office of Research and Development.
EPA/600/P-95/001aF. http://cfpub.epa.gov/ncea/cfm/archive/partmatt2.cfm.
7.
C. Braun-Fahrländer, U. Ackermann-Liebrich, J. Schwartz, H. P. Gnehm, M. Rutishauser and H. U. Wanner.
1992.
Air pollution and respiratory symptoms in preschool children.
American Review of Respiratory Disease 145 (1):42-7.
8.
J. H. Ware, B. G. Ferris, Jr., D. W. Dockery, J. D. Spengler, D. O. Stram and F. E. Speizer.
1986.
Effects of ambient sulfur oxides and suspended particles on respiratory health of preadolescent children.
American Review of Respiratory Disease 133 (5):834-42.
9.
D. W. Dockery, F. E. Speizer, D. O. Stram, J. H. Ware, J. D. Spengler and B. G. Ferris, Jr. 1989.
Effects of inhalable particles on respiratory health of children.
American Review of Respiratory Disease 139 (3):587-94.
10.
D. W. Dockery, J. Cunningham, A. I. Damokosh, L. M. Neas, J. D. Spengler, P. Koutrakis, J. H. Ware, M. Raizenne and F. E. Speizer.
1996.
Health effects of acid aerosols on North American children: respiratory symptoms.
Environmental Health Perspectives 104 (5):500-5.
11.
R. McConnell, K. Berhane, F. Gilliland, S. J. London, H. Vora, E. Avol, W. J. Gauderman, H. G. Margolis, F. Lurmann, D. C. Thomas and J. M. Peters.
1999.
Air pollution and bronchitic symptoms in Southern California children with asthma.
Environmental Health Perspectives 107 (9):757-60.
12.
G. Norris, S. N. YoungPong, J. Q. Koenig, T. V. Larson, L. Sheppard and J. W. Stout.
1999.
An association between fine particles and asthma emergency department visits for children in Seattle.
Environmental Health Perspectives 107 (6):489-93.
13.
M. Lipsett, S. Hurley and B. Ostro.
1997.
Air pollution and emergency room visits for asthma in Santa Clara County, California.
Environmental Health Perspectives 105 (2):216-22.
14.
C. A. Pope 3rd, M. J. Thun, M. M. Namboodiri, D. W. Dockery, J. S. Evans, F. E. Speizer and C. W. Heath, Jr. 1995.
Particulate air pollution as a predictor of mortality in a prospective study of U.S. adults.
American Journal of Respiratory and Critical Care Medicine 151 (3 Pt 1):669-74.
15.
C. A. Pope 3rd, R. T. Burnett, M. J. Thun, E. E. Calle, D. Krewski, K. Ito and G. D. Thurston.
2002.
Lung cancer, cardiopulmonary mortality, and long-term exposure to fine particulate air pollution.
Journal of the American Medical Association 287 (9):1132-41.
16.
D. E. Abbey, N. Nishino, W. F. McDonnell, R. J. Burchette, S. F. Knutsen, W. Lawrence Beeson and J. X. Yang.
1999.
Long-term inhalable particles and other air pollutants related to mortality in nonsmokers.
American Journal of Respiratory and Critical Care Medicine 159 (2):373-82.
17.
T. J. Woodruff, J. Grillo and K. C. Schoendorf.
1997.
The relationship between selected causes of postneonatal infant mortality and particulate air pollution in the United States.
Environmental Health Perspectives 105 (6):608-12.
44
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
References 18.
E. L. Avol, W. J. Gauderman, S. M. Tan, S. J. London and J. M. Peters.
2001.
Respiratory effects of relocating to areas of differing air pollution levels.
American Journal of Respiratory and Critical Care Medicine 164 (11):2067-72.
19.
W. J. Gauderman, G. F. Gilliland, H. Vora, E. Avol, D. Stram, R. McConnell, D. Thomas, F. Lurmann, H. G. Margolis, E. B. Rappaport, K. Berhane and J. M. Peters.
2002.
Association between air pollution and lung function growth in southern California children: results from a second cohort.
American Journal of Respiratory and Critical Care Medicine 166 (1):76-84.
20.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
1990.
Air Quality Criteria for Lead: Supplement to the 1986 Addendum.
Washington, DC: Office of Research and Development.
EPA 6000/8-89/049F.
21.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
1994.
Supplement to the Second Addendum (1986) to Air Quality Criteria for Particulate Matter and Sulfur Oxides: Assessment of New Findings on Sulfur Dioxide Acute Exposure Health Effects in Asthmatic Individuals.
Research Triangle Park, NC: Office of Research and Development.
EPA 600/FP-93/002.
22.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
2000.
Air Quality Criteria for Carbon Monoxide.
Washington, DC: National Center for Environmental Assessment, Office of Research and Development.
EPA/600/P-99/001F. http://www.epa.gov/ncea/coabstract.htm.
23.
T. Hirsch, S. K. Weiland, E. von Mutius, A. F. Safeca, H. Gräfe, E. Csaplovics, H. Duhme, U. Keil and W. Leupold.
1999.
Inner city air pollution and respiratory health and atopy in children.
European Respiratory Journal 14 (3):669-77.
24.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
1993.
Air Quality Criteria for Oxides of Nitrogen.
Research Triangle Park, NC: Environmental Criteria and Assessment Office, Office of Health and Environmental Assessment.
EPA-600/8-91/049aF. http://www.epa.gov/iris/subst/0080.htm.
25.
J. Schwartz.
1989.
Lung function and chronic exposure to air pollution: a cross-sectional analysis of NHANES II.
Environmental Research 50 (2):309-21.
26.
R. Schmitzberger, K. Rhomberg, H. Büchele, R. Puchegger, D. Schmitzberger-Natzmer, G. Kemmler and B. Panosch.
1993.
Effects of air pollution on the respiratory tract of children.
Pediatric Pulmonolog y 15 (2):68-74.
27.
J. M. Peters, E. Avol, W. Navidi, S. J. London, W. J. Gauderman, F. Lurmann, W. S. Linn, H. Margolis, E. Rappaport, H. Gong and D. C. Thomas.
1999.
A study of twelve Southern California communities with differing levels and types of air pollution.
I. Prevalence of respiratory morbidity.
American Journal of Respiratory and Critical Care Medicine 159 (3):760-7.
28.
M. Studnicka, E. Hackl, J. Pischinger, C. Fangmeyer, N. Haschke, J. Kühr, R. Urbanek, M. Neumann and T. Frischer.
1997.
Traffic-related nitrogen dioxide and the prevalence of asthma and respiratory symptoms in seven year olds.
European Respiratory Journal 10 (10):2275-8.
29.
S. Walters, M. Phupinyokul and J. Ayres.
1995.
Hospital admission rates for asthma and respiratory disease in the West Midlands: their relationship to air pollution levels.
Thorax 50 (9):948-54.
30.
J. H. Ware, J. D. Spengler, L. M. Neas, J. M. Samet, G. R. Wagner, D. Coultas, H. Ozkaynak and M. Schwab.
1993.
Respiratory and irritant health effects of ambient volatile organic compounds.
The Kanawha County Health Study.
American Journal of Epidemiolog y 137 (12):1287-1301.
31.
T. J. Woodruff, J. C. Caldwell, V. J. Cogliano and D. A. Axelrad.
2000.
Estimating cancer risk from outdoor concentrations of hazardous air pollutants in 1990.
Environmental Research 82:194-206.
32.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
Integrated Risk Information System.
http://www.epa.gov/iris/index.html.
33.
G. D. Leikauf, S. Kline, R. E. Albert, C. S. Baxter, D. I. Bernstein and C. R. Buncher.
1995.
Evaluation of a possible association of urban air toxics and asthma.
Environmental Health Perspectives 103 (Suppl.
6):253-71.
34.
P. Grandjean, E. Budtz-Jorgensen, R. F. White, P. J. Jorgensen, P. Weihe, F. Debes and N. Keiding.
1999.
Methylmercury exposure biomarkers as indicators of neurotoxicity in children aged 7 years.
American Journal of Epidemiolog y 150 (3):301-5.
Part 1: Environmental Contaminants
45
References 35.
J. L. Jacobson and S. W. Jacobson.
1997.
Teratogen update: polychlorinated biphenyls.
Teratolog y 55:338-347.
36.
H. L. Needleman, A. Schell, D. C. Bellinger, A. Leviton and E. N. Allred.
1990.
The long term effects of exposure to low doses of lead in childhood, an 11-year follow-up report.
New England Journal of Medicine 322 (2):83-8.
37.
M. Marlowe, A. Cossairt, C. Moon, J. Errera, A. MacNeel, R. Peak, J. Ray and C. Schroeder.
1985.
Main and interaction effects of metallic toxins on classroom behavior.
Journal of Abnormal Child Psycholog y 13 (2):185-98.
38.
J. C. Caldwell, T. J. Woodruff, R. Morello-Frosch and D. A. Axelrad.
1998.
Application of health information to hazardous air pollutants modeled in EPA's cumulative exposure project.
Toxicolog y and Industrial Health 14 (3):429-454.
39.
California Environmental Protection Agency.
Hot Spots Unit Risk and Cancer Potency Values.
California Environmental Protection Agency, Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, 1999.
http://www.oehha.ca.gov/air/cancer_guide/hsca2.html.
40.
California Environmental Protection Agency.
All Chronic Reference Exposure Levels Adopted by OEHHA as of May 2000.
California Environmental Protection Agency, Office of Environmental Health Hazard Assessment, 2000.
http://www.oehha.ca.gov/air/chronic_rels/AllChrels.html.
41.
National Research Council.
2000.
Toxicological Effects of Methylmercury.
Washington, DC: National Academy Press.
http://books.nap.edu/catalog/9899.html?onpi_newsdoc071100.
42.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
1996.
Mercury Study Report to Congress, Volumes I to VII.
Washington, DC: Office of Air Quality Planning and Standards.
http://www.epa.gov/oar/mercury.html.
43.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
2000.
Deposition of Air Pollutants to the Great Waters: Third Report to Congress.
Washington, DC. http://www.epa.gov/oar/oaqps/gr8water/.
44.
South Coast Air Quality Management District.
1999.
Multiple Air Toxics Exposure Study II. http://www.aqmd.gov/matesiidf/matestoc.htm.
45.
U. Diez, T. Kroessner, M. Rehwagen, M. Richter, H. Wetzig, R. Schulz, M. Borter, G. Metzner, P. Krumbiegel and O. Herbarth.
2000.
Effects of indoor painting and smoking on airway symptoms in atopy risk children in the first year of life: results of the Leipzig Allergy High-Risk Children Study.
International Journal of Hygiene and Environmental Health 203:23-28.
46.
National Academy of Sciences.
2000.
Clearing the Air: Asthma and Indoor Air Exposures.
Washington, DC: National Academy Press.
http://books.nap.edu/catalog/9610.html.
47.
E. Dybing and T. Sanner.
1999.
Passive smoking, sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS) and childhood infections.
Human and Experimental Toxicolog y 18:202-205.
48.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
1992.
Respiratory Health Effects of Passive Smoking: Lung Cancer and Other Disorders.
Washington, DC. EPA/600/6-90/006F. http://cfpub.epa.gov/ncea/cfm/ets/etsindex.cfm.
49.
M. S. Benninger.
1999.
The impact of cigarette smoking and environmental tobacco smoke on nasal and sinus disease: a review of the literature.
American Journal of Rhinolog y 13:435-438.
50.
B. P. Lanphear, C. A. Aligne, P. Auinger, M. Weitzman and R. S. Byrd.
2001.
Residential exposures associated with asthma in U.S. children.
Pediatrics 107 (3):505-11.
51.
D. M. Mannino, J. E. Moorman, B. Kingsley, D. Rose and J. Repace.
2001.
Health effects related to environmental tobacco smoke exposure in children in the United States: data from the Third National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey.
Archives of Pediatrics and Adolescent Medicine 155 (1):36-41.
52.
P. J. Gergen, J. A. Fowler, K. R. Maurer, W. W. Davis and M. D. Overpeck.
1998.
The burden of environmental tobacco smoke exposure on the respiratory health of children 2 months through 5 years of age in the United States: Third National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey, 1988 to 1994.
Pediatrics 101 (2):E8.
53.
D. R. Wahlgren, M. F. Hovell, E. O. Meltzer and S. B. Meltzer.
2000.
Involuntary smoking and asthma.
Current Opinions in Pulmonary Medicine 6:31-6.
46 America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
References 54.
A. Lindfors, M. V. Hage-Hamsten, H. Rietz, M. Wickman and S. L. Nordvall.
1999.
Influence of interaction of environmental risk factors and sensitization in young asthmatic children.
Journal of Allerg y and Clinical Immunolog y 104:755-62.
55.
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
2001.
Cigarette smoking among adults--United States, 1999.
Morbidity and Mortality Weekly Report 50 (40):869-73.
56.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
Drinking Water Contaminants.
EPA Office of Water, 2001.
http://www.epa.gov/safewater/hfacts.html#Inorganic.
57.
A. M. Garcia, S. A. Fadel, S. Cao and M. Sarzotti.
2001.
T cell immunity in neonates.
Immunologic Research 22 (2-3):177-90.
58.
D. Bellinger, A. Leviton, C. Waternaux, H. Needleman and M. Rabinowitz.
1987.
Longitudinal analyses of prenatal and postnatal lead exposure and early cognitive development.
New England Journal of Medicine 316 (17):1037-43.
59.
R. W. Tuthill.
1996.
Hair lead levels related to children's classroom attention-deficit behavior.
Archives of Environmental Health 51 (3):214-20.
60.
H. L. Needleman, J. A. Riess, M. J. Tobin, G. E. Biesecker and J. B. Greenhouse.
1996.
Bone lead levels and delinquent behavior.
Journal of the American Medical Association 275 (5):363-9.
61.
H. L. Needleman, A. Schell, D. Bellinger, A. Leviton and E. N. Allred.
1990.
The long-term effects of exposure to low doses of lead in childhood.
An 11-year follow-up report.
New England Journal of Medicine 322 (2):83-8.
62.
H. L. Needleman.
1990.
What can the study of lead teach us about other toxicants? Environmental Health Perspectives 86:183-9.
63.
B. Minder, E. A. Das-Smaal, E. F. Brand and J. F. Orlebeke.
1994.
Exposure to lead and specific attentional problems in schoolchildren.
Journal of Learning Disabilities 27 (6):393-9.
64.
A. L. Mendelsohn, B. P. Dreyer, A. H. Fierman, C. M. Rosen, L. A. Legano, H. A. Kruger, S. W. Lim and C. D. Courtlandt.
1998.
Low-level lead exposure and behavior in early childhood.
Pediatrics 101 (3):E10.
65.
J. Calderon, M. E. Navarro, M. E. Jimenez-Capdeville, M. A. Santos-Diaz, A. Golden, I. Rodriguez-Leyva, V. Borja-Aburto and F. Diaz-Barriga.
2001.
Exposure to arsenic and lead and neuropsychological development in Mexican children.
Environmental Research 85 (2):69-76.
66.
L. Knobeloch, B. Salna, A. Hogan, J. Postle and H. Anderson.
2000.
Blue babies and nitrate-contaminated well water.
Environmental Health Perspectives 108 (7):675-8.
67.
S. K. Gupta, R. C. Gupta, A. K. Seth, A. B. Gupta, J. K. Bassin and A. Gupta.
2000.
Methaemoglobinaemia in areas with high nitrate concentration in drinking water.
National Medical Journal of India 13 (2):58-61.
68.
T. Saito, S. Takeichi, M. Osawa, N. Yukawa and X. L. Huang.
2000.
A case of fatal methemoglobinemia of unknown origin but presumably due to ingestion of nitrate.
International Journal of Legal Medicine 113 (3):164-7.
69.
M. Nugent, Kamrin, M.A., Wolfson, L., D'Itri, F.M. Nitrate - A Drinking Water Concern, 1993.
http://www.gem.msu.edu/pubs/msue/wq19p1.html.
70.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
National Primary Drinking Water Regulations: Consumer Factsheet on NITRATES/NITRITES.
EPA Office of Water, 2001.
http://www.epa.gov/safewater/dwh/c-ioc/nitrates.html.
71.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
Ground Water and Drinking Water: Appendix D glossary.
EPA Office of Water, 2001.
http://www.epa.gov/safewater/wot/appd.html.
72.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
Current Drinking Water Standards.
EPA Office of Water, 2001.
http://www.epa.gov/safewater/mcl.html.
73.
G. A. Boorman.
1999.
Drinking water disinfection byproducts: review and approach to toxicity evaluation.
Environmental Health Perspectives 107 (Suppl.
1):207-17.
Part 1: Environmental Contaminants
47
References 74.
M. J. Nieuwenhuijsen, M. B. Toledano, N. E. Eaton, J. Fawell and P. Elliott.
2000.
Chlorination disinfection byproducts in water and their association with adverse reproductive outcomes: A review.
Occupational and Environmental Medicine 57 (2):73-85.
75.
National Primary Drinking Water Regulations and National Primary Drinking Water Regulations Implementation.
40 CFR Parts 141 and 142.
http://www.access.gpo.gov/nara/cfr/waisidx_01/40cfrv19_01.html.
76.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
2000.
Data Reliability Analysis of the EPA Safe Drinking Water Information System/Federal Version (SDWIS/FED).
Washington, DC: EPA Office of Water.
EPA 816-R-00-0200.
77.
U.S. Geological Survey.
1998.
Estimated Use of Water in the United States in 1995.
Denver, CO. USGS Circular 1200.
http://water.usgs.gov/watuse/pdf1995/html/.
78.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
Fact Sheet: Surface Water Treatment Rule.
EPA Office of Water, 2001.
http://www.epa.gov/ogwdw000/smallsys/ndwac/surface.html.
79.
F. Bove, Y.
Shim and P. Zeitz.
2002.
Drinking water contaminants and adverse pregnancy outcomes: a review.
Environmental Health Perspectives 110 (Suppl.
1):61-74.
80.
L. Dodds, W. King, C. Woolcott and J. Pole.
1999.
Trihalomethanes in public water supplies and adverse birth outcomes.
Epidemiolog y 10 (3):233-7.
81.
L. Dodds and W. D. King.
2001.
Relation between trihalomethane compounds and birth defects.
Occupational and Environmental Medicine 58 (7):443-6.
82.
W. D. King, L. Dodds and A. C. Allen.
2000.
Relation between stillbirth and specific chlorination by-products in public water supplies.
Environmental Health Perspectives 108 (9):883-6.
83.
D. A. Savitz, K. W. Andrews and L. M. Pastore.
1995.
Drinking water and pregnancy outcome in central North Carolina: source, amount, and trihalomethane levels.
Environmental Health Perspectives 103 (6):592-6.
84.
S. H. Swan, K. Waller, B. Hopkins, G. Windham, L. Fenster, C. Schaefer and R. R. Neutra.
1998.
A prospective study of spontaneous abortion: relation to amount and source of drinking water consumed in early pregnancy.
Epidemiolog y 9 (2):126-33.
85.
K. Waller, S. H. Swan, G. DeLorenze and B. Hopkins.
1998.
Trihalomethanes in drinking water and spontaneous abortion.
Epidemiolog y 9 (2):134-40.
86.
K. Waller, S. H. Swan, G. C. Windham and L. Fenster.
2001.
Influence of exposure assessment methods on risk estimates in an epidemiologic study of total trihalomethane exposure and spontaneous abortion.
Journal of Exposure Analysis and Environmental Epidemiolog y 11 (6):522-31.
87.
National Research Council.
1993.
Pesticides in the Diets of Infants and Children.
Washington, DC: National Academy Press.
http://www.nap.edu/catalog/2126.html?se_side.
88.
B. Eskenazi, A. Bradman and R. Castorina.
1999.
Exposures of children to organophosphate pesticides and their potential adverse health effects.
Environmental Health Perspectives 107 (Suppl.
3):409-19.
89.
Doane Marketing Research.
AgroTrack Row and Specialty Crop Studies, 1993-2001.
http://www.doanemr.com/row-specialty-turf/agrotrak.html.
90.
E. J. Stanek, 3rd and E. J. Calabrese.
2000.
Daily soil ingestion estimates for children at a Superfund site.
Risk Analysis 20 (5):627-35.
91.
P. J. Landrigan, W. A. Suk and R. W. Amler.
1999.
Chemical wastes, children's health, and the Superfund Basic Research Program.
Environmental Health Perspectives 107 (6):423-7.
48
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
PART 2
Body Burdens: Contaminants in the Bodies of Women and Children
50
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Body Burdens: Contaminants in the Bodies of Women and Children easurements of the levels of pollutants in children's bodies provide direct information about exposures to environmental contaminants.
Also, measurements in women who may become pregnant, currently are pregnant, or currently are breastfeeding provide information about exposures that potentially can affect conception, the fetus, and/or the developing child.
These "body burden" measurements most often are taken from blood samples, but also can come from urine or hair.
M
Body Burdens
This edition of America's Children and the Environment includes new body burden measurements for mercury and cotinine.
The first new measure shows concentrations of mercury in the blood of women of child-bearing age, defined as between the ages of 16 and 49.
This measure is important because studies have shown that prenatal exposure to mercury can cause adverse neurological and developmental effects in children.
The second new measure shows levels of cotinine in the blood of children.
Cotinine is a breakdown product of nicotine.
Children who have been exposed to environmental tobacco smoke (ETS) have cotinine in their blood.
Exposure to ETS increases the risk of a number of adverse health effects, including lower respiratory tract infections, bronchitis, pneumonia, ear infections, asthma symptoms, and sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS).
This report also includes updated data on lead in the blood of children.
This measure is directly related to adverse neurological and developmental effects in children.
The data on concentrations of lead in blood (called "blood lead") depict a trend over 25 years.
One limitation of body burden measures is that they reveal few clues to the source(s) of exposure.
For example, lead in children's blood may come from exposure to airborne sources, contaminated water or food, or contaminated soil or dust.
The measures in this section do not account for many environmental contaminants that are important to children but for which data are not available on a national scale, or for which information is lacking to evaluate health significance.
For example, data are now available for a number of other environmental contaminants--such as pesticides and heavy metals--in children's blood and urine.
However, no information is available to show how these concentrations relate to health risks.
Also, it is not currently possible to show trends for these contaminants because data are available for only one year.
Part 2: Body Burdens
51
Concentrations of Lead in Blood Lead in the Blood of Children Lead is a major environmental health hazard for young children.
Childhood exposure to lead contributes to learning problems such as reduced intelligence and cognitive development.1-3 Studies also have found that childhood exposure to lead contributes to attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder4 and hyperactivity and distractibility;5-7 increases the likelihood of dropping out of high school, having a reading disability, lower vocabulary, and lower class standing in high school;8 and increases the risk for antisocial and delinquent behavior.9 A blood lead level of 10 micrograms per deciliter (µg/dL) or greater is considered elevated,10, 11 but there is no demonstrated safe concentration of lead in blood.12 Adverse health effects can occur at lower concentrations.2, 13, 14 In the past, ambient concentrations of lead from leaded gasoline were a major contributor to blood lead levels in children.14 Today, elevated blood lead levels are due mostly to ingestion of contaminated dust, paint and soil.10 Soil and dust that are contaminated with lead are important sources of exposure because children play outside, and very small children frequently put their hands in their mouths.15, 17 Deterioration of lead-based paint can generate contaminated dust and soil, and past emissions of lead in gasoline that subsequently were deposited in the soil also contribute to lead-contaminated soil and house dust.15-17 As of 1998-2000, lead-based paint was present in 40 percent of U.S. homes.18 16 percent of homes had dust lead hazards, and 7 percent of homes had soil lead hazards.18 Some small fraction of children also are exposed through direct ingestion of lead-containing paint chips.19 Although the concentration of lead in blood is an important indicator of risk, it reflects only current exposures.
Lead also accumulates in bone.
Recent research suggests that concentrations of lead in bone may be more related to adverse health outcomes in children than are concentrations in blood.20 This finding suggests that concentrations in bone may better reflect the net burden of exposure.
However, methods for measuring lead in bone are more time-consuming and expensive than those for measuring lead in blood, and nationally representative data are not available.
Healthy People 2010:
Objective 8-11 of Healthy People 2010 aims to totally eliminate elevated blood lead levels in children.
See Appendix C for more information.
52
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Concentrations of Lead in Blood
Measure B1
Concentration of lead in blood of children ages 5 and under 30 Micrograms of Lead per Deciliter of Blood (µg/dL) 90th percentile (10 percent of children have this blood lead level or greater)
25
20
15
10*
Median value (50 percent of children have this blood lead level or greater)
5
0 1976-1980 1988-1991 1992-1994 1999-2000
SOURCE: Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, National Center for Health Statistics, National Health and Nutrition Examination Su rvey
I The median dren 5 years per deciliter 1999-2000,
concentration of lead in the blood of chilold and under dropped from 15 micrograms (µg/dL) in 1976-1980 to 2.2 µg/dL in a decline of 85 percent.
I The concentration of lead in blood at the 90th percentile in children 5 years old and under dropped from 25 µg/dL in 1976-1980 to 4.8 µg/dL in 1999-2000.
I In 1978, about 4.7 million children ages 1-5 had blood lead levels at or greater than 10 µg/dL, which is considered elevated.
By 1999-2000, this number had declined to about 430,000.
I The decline in blood lead levels is due largely to the phasing out of lead in gasoline between 1973 and 199521 and to the reduction in the number of homes with leadbased paint from 64 million in 1990 to 38 million in 2000.18 Some decline also was a result of EPA regulations reducing lead levels in drinking water, as well as legislation banning lead from paint and restricting the content of lead in solder, faucets, pipes, and plumbing.
Lead also has been eliminated or reduced in food and beverage containers and ceramic ware, and in products such as toys, mini-blinds, and playground equipment.
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Criteria Air Pollutants: lead (E1-E2) Drinking Water: lead (E6-E7)
Body Burdens Lead in Blood (B1-B3)
Childhood Illnesses Neurodevelopmental (D7)
Special Features Lead in Schools (S1-S3)
* 10 µg/dL of blood lead has been identified by CDC as elevated, which indicates need for intervention.22 There is no demonstrated safe concentration of lead in blood.12 Adverse health effects can occur at lower concentrations.2,13,14
Part 2: Body Burdens
53
Concentrations of Lead in Blood Blood Lead by Race/Ethnicity and Family Income Concentrations of lead in children's blood differ by race/ethnicity and family income.
This measure presents blood lead levels by race/ethnicity and family income for children ages 1-5, a period when lead is particularly harmful to the developing brain and nervous system.22 Measures of blood lead by race/ethnicity and income can help identify the groups that are at greatest risk.
Blood lead levels are highest for younger children, because their exposure per pound of body weight is greater due to their smaller size.
In addition, young children play in certain ways that can increase their exposure to lead.
For example, they play and crawl on the ground and frequently put their hands in their mouths.
Blood lead levels tend to reflect more recent exposures.
54
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Concentrations of Lead in Blood Measure B2
Median concentrations of lead in blood of children ages 1-5, by race/ethnicity and family income, 1999-2000 
Hispanic
Black nonHispanic
100-200% of Poverty Level 
White nonHispanic
>
All Races/ Ethnicities 0
100-200% of Poverty Level 
2 3 4 Median concentrations of lead in blood (µg/dL) SOURCE: Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, National Center for Health Statistics, National Health and Nutrition Examination Su rvey
1
5
I In 1999-2000 the median blood lead level in children ages 1-5 was 2.2 µg/dL.
The median blood lead level for children living in families with incomes below the poverty level was 2.8 µg/dL and for children living in families above the poverty level it was 1.9 µg/dL.
I In 1999-2000, White non-Hispanic children ages 1-5 had a median blood lead level of about 2 µg/dL, unchanged from the level in 1992-1994.
I In 1992-1994, Black non-Hispanic children ages 1-5 had a median blood lead level of 3.9 µg/dL and in 19992000 they had a median blood lead level of 2.8 µg/dL.
I In 1992-1994, Hispanic children ages 1-5 had a median blood lead level of 2.6 µg/dL and in 1999-2000 they had a median blood lead level of 2.0 µg/dL.
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Criteria Air Pollutants: lead (E1-E2) Drinking Water: lead (E6-E7)
Body Burdens Lead in Blood (B1-B3)
Childhood Illnesses Neurodevelopmental (D7)
Special Features Lead in Schools (S1-S3)
Part 2: Body Burdens
55
Concentrations of Lead in Blood Distribution of Concentrations of Lead in Blood in Children Ages 1-5 A blood lead level of 10 micrograms per deciliter (µg/dL) or greater is considered elevated, but there is no demonstrated safe concentration of lead in blood.
Adverse health effects can occur at lower concentrations.
A growing body of research has shown that there are measurable adverse neurological effects in children at blood lead concentrations as low as 1 µg/dL.2, 13, 23 EPA believes that effects may occur at blood lead levels so low that there is essentially no "safe" level of lead.12 This measure shows the distribution of blood lead levels among children ages 1-5 for the years 1999-2000, the most current years for which data are available.
56
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Concentrations of Lead in Blood
Measure B3
Distribution of concentrations of lead in blood of children ages 1-5, 1999-2000 35% 30% 25% 20% 15% 10% 5% 0% 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 Concentration of lead in blood (µg/dL) 7 
Percentage of children
SOURCE: Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, National Center for Health Statistics, National Health and Nutrition Examination Su rvey
I In 1999-2000, the concentration of lead in blood at the 90th percentile in children ages 1-5 was 4.8 µg/dL, meaning that 10 percent of children had blood lead levels above this concentration and 90 percent had blood lead levels below it.
I In 1999-2000, the median blood lead level of children ages 1-5 was 2.2 µg/dL, meaning that 50 percent of children had blood lead levels above this concentration and 50 percent had blood lead levels below it.
I Approximately 430,000 children ages 1-5 (about 2 percent) had a blood lead level of 10 µg/dL or greater in 1999-2000.
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Criteria Air Pollutants: lead (E1-E2) Drinking Water: lead (E6-E7)
Body Burdens Lead in Blood (B1-B3)
Childhood Illnesses Neurodevelopmental (D7)
Special Features Lead in Schools (S1-S3)
Part 2: Body Burdens
57
Concentrations of Mercury in Blood Prenatal Exposure to Methylmercury Prenatal exposure to methylmercury can cause adverse developmental and cognitive effects in children, even at low doses that do not result in effects in the mother.24-26 Infants and children are particularly sensitive to the effects of neurotoxic agents such as methylmercury.27 Children who are exposed to low concentrations of methylmercury prenatally are at increased risk of poor performance on neurobehavioral tests, such as those measuring attention, fine motor function, language skills, visual-spatial abilities (like drawing), and verbal memory.26, 28 There is some evidence that exposure to methylmercury also can affect the cardiovascular,29 immune,30, 31 and reproductive systems.32 The measure presented here shows blood mercury concentrations in women of childbearing age (16-49 years).
Monitoring the concentrations of mercury in the blood of women of child-bearing age can help identify the proportion of children who may be at risk.
Based on recent studies of children born to women who consumed fish that contained mercury, EPA has determined that children born to women with blood mercury concentrations above 5.8 parts per billion are at some increased risk of adverse health effects.33 EPA's reference dose (RfD) for methylmercury is 0.1 micrograms per kilogram body weight per day.
This dose is approximately equal to a concentration of 5.8 parts per billion mercury in blood.
Although the prenatal period is the most sensitive period of exposure, exposure to mercury during childhood also could pose a potential health risk.32 People are exposed to methylmercury mainly through eating fish contaminated with methylmercury.
Mercury that ends up in fish may originate as emissions to the air.
Mercury released into the atmosphere can travel long distances on global air currents and be deposited in areas far from its original source.35, 36 The largest human-generated source of mercury emissions in the United States is the burning of coal.
Other sources include the combustion of waste and industrial processes that use mercury.36 Mercury usually is released in an elemental form and later converted into methylmercury by bacteria.
Methylmercury is more toxic to humans than other forms of mercury, in part because it is more easily absorbed in the body.36 Methylmercury accumulates through the food chain: fish that live a long time and that eat other fish can accumulate high levels of methylmercury.
People also can be exposed to inorganic mercury at work, through ritualistic uses of mercury, and from dental restorations with mercury-silver amalgams.36 Inorganic mercury is less readily absorbed than methylmercury and is not known to cause the types of health effects discussed in this section.
Healthy People 2010:
Objective 8-10 of Healthy People 2010 addresses the reduction of contaminants (such as mercury) in fish.
See Appendix C for more information.
58
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Concentrations of Mercury in Blood Measure B4
Distribution of concentrations of mercury in blood of women of child-bearing age, 1999-2000 60% Percentage of women of child-bearing age
50%
40%
30%
20%
10%
0% 0 3 4 5 6 7 
Th is is approximately equal to a concentration of 5.8 parts per billion mercury in blood.
1
2
I EPA has determined that children born to women with blood concentrations of mercury above 5.8 parts per billion are at some increased risk of adverse health effects.33 About 8 percent of women of child-bearing age had at least 5.8 parts per billion of mercury in their blood in 1999-2000.
I Current research indicates that there is no safe level of methylmercury in the blood within the range of exposures measured in the human studies of the health effects of mercury, which were as low as 1 part per billion.33 About 50 percent of the women of child-bearing age in the United States have at least 1 part per billion of mercury in their blood.
I The graph shows reported concentrations of mercury in blood from the National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey.
These figures are for total mercury, which includes methylmercury and other forms of mercury.
However, most of the mercury in the blood Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Body Burdens
of participants in the survey was methylmercury, so the measured concentrations are a good indication of methylmercury concentrations.37 I The National Academy of Sciences (NAS) and EPA have determined that 58 parts per billion of mercury in the blood of pregnant women corresponds to approximately a doubling in the risk of poor performance on a specific neurodevelopmental test.32-34 The NAS and EPA also have concluded that 32 parts per billion of mercury in the blood of pregnant women corresponds to approximately a doubling in the risk of abnormal performance on a range of neurodevelopmental tests.32-34 Data from the National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey showed no measured blood mercury concentrations greater than or equal to 58 parts per billion in women of child-bearing age.
A small percentage of women (less than 1 percent) have blood mercury concentrations greater than 30 parts per billion.
Childhood Illnesses Neurodevelopmental (D7)
EPA's Reference Dose
Special Features
Mercur y in Blood (B4)
Part 2: Body Burdens
59
Concentrations of Cotinine in Blood Cotinine in the Blood of Children Exposure to environmental tobacco smoke (ETS) is an important health risk for children.
Children who are exposed to environmental tobacco smoke are at increased risk for a number of adverse health outcomes, including lower respiratory tract infections, bronchitis, pneumonia, fluid in the middle ear, and sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS).38-40 ETS also can play a role in the development and exacerbation of asthma, particularly for children under 6 years old.41-46 Young children appear to be more susceptible to the effects of environmental tobacco smoke than are older children.40, 44 Cotinine is a breakdown product of nicotine in blood.
Measurements of cotinine in blood serum are a marker for exposure to environmental tobacco smoke in the previous 1 to 2 days.47 Children can be exposed to ETS in their homes or in places where people are allowed to smoke, such as some restaurants.
This measure presents cotinine levels for non-tobacco-users only.
Children who smoke were excluded from these statistics.
Healthy People 2010:
Objective 27-9 of Healthy People 2010 is to reduce the proportion of children who are regularly exposed to tobacco smoke at home.
See Appendix C for more information.
60
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Concentrations of Cotinine in Blood Measure B5
Concentrations of cotinine in blood of children 3.0
Serum cotinine concentrations (ng/mL)
2.5
90th percentile (10 percent of children have this serum cotinine level or greater)
2.0
1.5
1.0 50th percentile (50 percent of children have this serum cotinine level or greater)
0.5
0.0 1988-1991 1999-2000
SOURCE: Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, National Center for Health Statistics, National Health and Nutrition Examination Su rvey
I In 1999-2000, median (50th percentile) levels of cotinine measured in children were 56 percent lower than they were in 1988-1991.
I Cotinine values at the 90th percentile, representing the most highly exposed 10 percent of children, showed a smaller relative decline (18 percent) from 1988-1991 to 1999-2000.
I Eighty-five percent of children had detectable levels of cotinine in 1988-1991;41 between 50 and 75 percent of children had detectable levels of cotinine in 1999-2000 (data not shown).
I The reduction in children's cotinine levels is in part attributable to a decline in the percentage of adults who smoke.
In 1999, an estimated 23.5 percent of adults were current smokers, down from 25.0 percent in 1993.48 I In 1988-91, median concentrations of cotinine in blood were about 0.6 nanograms per milliliter (ng/mL) for Black non-Hispanic children and about 0.2 ng/mL for White non-Hispanic children and Hispanic children.
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants
Body Burdens
Childhood Illnesses Respiratory (D1-D4)
Special Features
Environmental Tobacco Smoke (E5) Cotinine in Blood (B5)
Part 2: Body Burdens
61
References 1.
D. Bellinger, A. Leviton and C. Waternaux.
1987.
Longitudinal analyses of prenatal and postnatal lead exposure and early cognitive development.
New England Journal of Medicine 316 (17):1037-43.
2.
A. J. McMichael, P. A. Baghurst, N. R. Wigg, G. V. Vimpani, E. F. Robertson and R. J. Roberts.
1988.
Port Pirie Cohort Study: environmental exposure to lead and children's abilities at the age of four years.
New England Journal of Medicine 319 (8):468-75.
3.
B. P. Lanphear, K. Dietrich, P. Auinger and C. Cox.
2000.
Cognitive deficits associated with blood lead concentrations 
Public Health Reports 115 (6):521-9.
4.
R. W. Tuthill.
1996.
Hair lead levels related to children's classroom attention-deficit behavior.
Archives of Environmental Health 51 (3):214-20.
5.
J. Calderon, M. E. Navarro, M. E. Jimenez-Capdeville, M. A. Santos-Diaz, A. Golden, I. Rodriguez-Leyva, V. Borja-Aburto and F. Diaz-Barriga.
2001.
Exposure to arsenic and lead and neuropsychological development in Mexican children.
Environmental Research 85 (2):69-76.
6.
A. L. Mendelsohn, B. P. Dreyer, A. H. Fierman, C. M. Rosen, L. A. Legano, H. A. Kruger, S. W. Lim and C. D. Courtlandt.
1998.
Low-level lead exposure and behavior in early childhood.
Pediatrics 101 (3):E10.
7.
B. Minder, E. A. Das-Smaal, E. F. Brand and J. F. Orlebeke.
1994.
Exposure to lead and specific attentional problems in schoolchildren.
Journal of Learning Disabilities 27 (6):393-9.
8.
H. L. Needleman, A. Schell, D. C. Bellinger, A. Leviton and E. N. Allred.
1990.
The long term effects of exposure to low doses of lead in childhood, an 11-year follow-up report.
New England Journal of Medicine 322 (2):83-8.
9.
H. L. Needleman, J. A. Riess, M. J. Tobin, G. E. Biesecker and J. B. Greenhouse.
1996.
Bone lead levels and delinquent behavior.
Journal of the American Medical Association 275 (5):363-9.
10.
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
1997.
Screening Young Children for Lead Poisoning: Guidance for State and Local Public Health Officials.
Atlanta, GA. http://www.cdc.gov/nceh/lead/guide/guide97.htm.
11.
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
2002.
Managing Elevated Blood Lead Levels Among Young Children: Recommendations from the Advisory Committee on Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention.
Atlanta, GA. http://www.cdc.gov/nceh/lead/CaseManagement/caseManage_main.htm.
12.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
1997.
Integrated Risk Information System (IRIS) Risk Information for Lead and Compounds (Inorganic).
Washington, DC: National Center for Environmental Assessment.
http://www.epa.gov/iris/subst/0277.htm#reforal.
13.
B. P. Lanphear, K. Dietrich, P. Auinger and C. Cox.
2000.
Cognitive deficits associated with blood lead concentrations 
Public Health Reports 115 (6):521-9.
14.
E. K. Silbergeld.
1997.
Preventing lead poisoning in children.
Annual Review of Public Health 18:187-210.
15.
H. Mielke and P. Reagan.
1998.
Soil is an important pathway of human lead exposure.
Environmental Health Perspectives 106 (Suppl.
1):217-229.
16.
H. W. Mielke.
1999.
Lead in the inner cities.
American Scientist 87:62-73.
17.
President's Task Force on Environmental Health Risks and Safety Risks to Children.
2000.
Eliminating Childhood Lead Poisoning: A Federal Strateg y Targeting Lead Paint Hazards. http://www.hud.gov/offices/lead/reports/fedstrategy2000.pdf.
18.
D. E. Jacobs, R. P. Clickner, J. Y.
Zhou, S. M. Viet, D. A. Marker, J. W. Rogers, D. C. Zeldin, P. Broene and W. Friedman.
2002.
The prevalence of lead-based paint hazards in U.S. housing.
Environmental Health Perspectives 110 (10):A599-606.
62
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
References 19.
M. D. McElvaine, E. G. DeUngria, T. D. Matte, C. G. Copley and S. Binder.
1992.
Prevalence of radiographic evidence of paint chip ingestion among children with moderate to severe lead poisoning, St Louis, Missouri, 1989 through 1990.
Pediatrics 89 (4 Pt 2):740-2.
20.
H. Hu. 1998.
Bone lead as a new biologic marker of lead dose: recent findings and implications for public health.
Environmental Health Perspectives 106 (Suppl.
4):961-7.
21.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
2000.
National Air Quality and Emissions Trends Report, 1998.
Research Triangle Park, North Carolina: EPA Office of Air Quality Planning and Standards.
454/R-00-003. http://www.epa.gov/oar/aqtrnd98/toc.html.
22.
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
1991.
Preventing Lead Poisoning in Young Children.
Atlanta, GA. http://www.cdc.gov/nceh/lead/publications/pub_Reas.htm.
23.
J. Schwartz.
1994.
Low-level lead exposure and children's IQ: a meta-analysis and search for a threshold.
Environmental Research 65 (1):42-55.
24.
P. Grandjean, R. F. White, A. Nielsen, D. Cleary and E. C. de Oliveira Santos.
1999.
Methylmercury neurotoxicity in Amazonian children downstream from gold mining.
Environmental Health Perspectives 107 (7):587-91.
25.
P. Grandjean, P. Weihe, R. F. White and F. Debes.
1998.
Cognitive performance of children prenatally exposed to "safe" levels of methylmercury.
Environmental Research 77 (2):165-72.
26.
P. Grandjean, P. Weihe, R. F. White, F. Debes, S. Araki, K. Yokoyama, K. Murata, N. Sorensen, R. Dahl and P. J. Jorgensen.
1997.
Cognitive deficit in 7-year-old children with prenatal exposure to methylmercury.
Neurotoxicolog y and Teratolog y 19 (6):417-28.
27.
P. M. Rodier.
1995.
Developing brain as a target of toxicity.
Environmental Health Perspectives 103 Suppl 6:73-6.
28.
T. Kjellstrom, P. Kennedy, S. Wallis and C. Mantell.
1986.
Physical and mental development of children with prenatal exposure to mercury from fish.
Stage 1: Preliminary tests at age 4.
Sweden: Swedish National Environmental Protection Board.
29.
N. Sørensen, K. Murata, E. Budtz-Jørgensen, P. Weihe and P. Grandjean.
1999.
Prenatal methylmercury exposure as a cardiovascular risk factor at seven years of age.
Epidemiolog y 10 (4):370-5.
30.
L. I. Sweet and J. T. Zelikoff.
2001.
Toxicology and immunotoxicology of mercury: a comparative review in fish and humans.
Journal of Toxicolog y and Environmental Health.
Part B, Critical Reviews 4 (2):161-205.
31.
N. Brenden, H. Rabbani and M. Abedi-Valugerdi.
2001.
Analysis of mercury-induced immune activation in nonobese diabetic (NOD) mice.
Clinical and Experimental Immunolog y 125 (2):202-10.
32.
National Academy of Sciences.
2000.
Toxicological Effects of Methylmercury.
Washington, DC: National Academy Press.
http://books.nap.edu/catalog/9899.html?onpi_newsdoc071100.
33.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
2001.
Integrated Risk Information System (IRIS) Risk Information for Methylmercury (MeHg).
Washington, DC: National Center for Environmental Assessment.
http://www.epa.gov/iris/subst/0073.htm.
34.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
2001.
Water Quality Criterion for the Protection of Human Health: Methylmercury.
Washington, DC. http://www.epa.gov/waterscience/criteria/methylmercury/merctitl.pdf 35.
W. F. Fitzgerald, D. R. Engstrom, R. P. Mason and E. A. Nater.
1998.
The case for atmospheric mercury contamination in remote areas.
Environmental Science and Technolog y 32 (1):1-7.
36.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
1996.
Mercury Study Report to Congress Volumes I to VII.
Washington, DC: Office of Air Quality Planning and Standards.
EPA-452-R-96-001b. http://www.epa.gov/oar/mercury.html.
Part 2: Body Burdens
63
References 37.
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
2001.
National Report on Human Exposure to Environmental Chemicals.
Atlanta, GA: Department of Health and Human Services.
01-0379.
http://www.cdc.gov/nceh/dls/report.
38.
M. S. Benninger.
1999.
The impact of cigarette smoking and environmental tobacco smoke on nasal and sinus disease: a review of the literature.
American Journal of Rhinolog y 13 (6):435-8.
39.
E. Dybing and T. Sanner.
1999.
Passive smoking, sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS) and childhood infections.
Human and Experimental Toxicolog y 18 (4):202-5.
40.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
1992.
Respiratory Health Effects of Passive Smoking: Lung Cancer and Other Disorders.
Washington, DC: EPA Office of Research and Development.
http://cfpub.epa.gov/ncea/cfm/ets/etsindex.cfm.
41.
D. M. Mannino, J. E. Moorman, B. Kingsley, D. Rose and J. Repace.
2001.
Health effects related to environmental tobacco smoke exposure in children in the United States: data from the Third National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey.
Archives of Pediatrics and Adolescent Medicine 155 (1):36-41.
42.
B. P. Lanphear, C. A. Aligne, P. Auinger, M. Weitzman and R. S. Byrd.
2001.
Residential exposures associated with asthma in U.S. children.
Pediatrics 107 (3):505-11.
43.
P. J. Gergen, J. A. Fowler, K. R. Maurer, W. W. Davis and M. D. Overpeck.
1998.
The burden of environmental tobacco smoke exposure on the respiratory health of children 2 months through 5 years of age in the United States: Third National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey, 1988 to 1994.
Pediatrics 101 (2):E8.
44.
National Academy of Sciences.
2000.
Clearing the Air: Asthma and Indoor Air Exposures.
Washington, DC: National Academy Press.
http://books.nap.edu/catalog/9610.html.
45.
A. Lindfors, M. V. Hage-Hamsten, H. Rietz, M. Wickman and S. L. Nordvall.
1999.
Influence of interaction of environmental risk factors and sensitization in young asthmatic children.
Journal of Allerg y and Clinical Immunolog y 104:755-62.
46.
D. R. Wahlgren, M. F. Hovell, E. O. Meltzer and S. B. Meltzer.
2000.
Involuntary smoking and asthma.
Current Opinions in Pulmonary Medicine 6:31-6.
47.
J. L. Pirkle, K. M. Flegal, J. T. Bernert, D. J. Brody, R. A. Etzel and K. R. Maurer.
1996.
Exposure of the U.S. population to environmental tobacco smoke: the Third National Health and Nutrition Examination Survey, 1988 to 1991.
Journal of the American Medical Association 275 (16):1233-40.
48.
Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
2001.
Cigarette smoking among adults--United States, 1999.
Morbidity and Mortality Weekly Report 50 (40):869-73.
64
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
PART 3
Childhood Illnesses
Childhood Illnesses on trends in and tant information Childhood D ata successes andchildhood diseases effordisorders provide imporhealth.
Many on shortcomings in ts to protect children's tant diseases affect children.
of many of Illnesses imporconditions areand other health disorderssome cases envirThe causescontaminants these not well established.
In onmental are known to play a role.
In other cases clues suggest that environmental factors are important, but definitive proof is lacking.
This section of the report focuses on important childhood diseases and disorders for which evidence or clues indicate or suggest some influence by environmental contaminants, and for which nationally representative data are available.
These diseases and disorders are asthma, acute bronchitis and acute upper respiratory infections, cancer, and--new for this edition--neurodevelopmental disorders.
Other diseases and disorders that may be influenced partially by environmental contaminants include other respiratory diseases, waterborne diseases, methemoglobinemia, and birth defects.
It is very difficult to develop conclusive evidence that environmental contaminants cause or contribute to the incidence of childhood health effects, particularly those effects occurring in a relatively small proportion of children or effects with multiple causes.
In cases where exposure to an environmental contaminant results in a relatively modest increase in the incidence of a disease or disorder, many children would need to be included in a study in order to detect a true relationship.
In addition, there may be factors that are related to both the exposure and the health effect (like socioeconomic status) that can make it difficult to detect a relationship between exposure to environmental contaminants and disease.
There may, however, be suggestive (rather than conclusive) evidence from studies in humans and/or laboratory animals to suggest that exposures to environmental contaminants contribute to the incidence of a childhood health effect.
Tracking childhood diseases and disorders is an important element of research on potential links between health effects and exposure to environmental contaminants.
Tracking establishes a basis for comparison so that increases or decreases in the incidence of a disease or disorder can be detected, often yielding important clues to its causes.
Tracking helps researchers determine whether past and current actions have been effective in reducing the incidence of a disease or disorder.
It also helps to identify opportunities for further action.
It can be difficult to assess the contribution of environmental exposures to childhood illnesses.
Even though environmental exposures can contribute to some childhood illnesses, other factors may be more important, such as family history, nutrition, and socioeconomic factors.
In addition, there can be interactions between environmental and genetic factors.
This report does not address illnesses that may result from childhood exposures to environmental contaminants but do not manifest themselves until adulthood.
66
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Respiratory Diseases Respiratory diseases can greatly impair a child's ability to function, and are an important cause of missed school days and limitations to activities.
Important respiratory diseases in children include asthma, bronchitis, and upper respiratory infections.
In 1994-96, 24 percent of children with asthma had to limit their activities due to their asthma, and the disease caused children to miss 14 million days of school.1 Studies have shown that outdoor and indoor air pollution cause some respiratory symptoms and increase the frequency or severity of asthma attacks.2-15 Two types of measures of respiratory diseases are presented here.
The first set of measures (D1 and D2) focuses on the percentage of children who have asthma.
The second set (D3 and D4) reports on cases of respiratory illness severe enough to require a visit to the emergency room or admission to the hospital.
Respiratory Diseases in Children
Part 3: Childhood Illnesses
67
Respiratory Diseases Asthma Asthma is a disease of the lungs that can cause wheezing, difficulty in breathing, and chest pain.
It is the most common chronic disease among children and is costly in both human and monetary terms.15 Asthma varies greatly in severity.
Some children who have been diagnosed with asthma may not experience any serious respiratory effects.
Other children may have mild symptoms or may respond well to management of their asthma, typically through use of medication.
Some children with asthma may suffer serious attacks that greatly limit their activities, result in visits to emergency rooms or hospitals, or, in rare cases, cause death.
Asthma among children is increasing in the United States.
Researchers do not understand completely why children develop asthma.
The tendency to develop asthma can be inherited, but genetic factors alone are unlikely to explain the significant increases that have occurred in the last 20 years.15 Research on environmental factors that exacerbate or may contribute to causing asthma has focused on environmental agents found outdoors and indoors.
The Institute of Medicine concluded that exposure to dust mites causes asthma in susceptible children.15 Cockroaches and tobacco smoke are likely to cause asthma in young children.15 Other studies have evaluated the role of indoor air pollutants such as nitrogen dioxide, pesticides, plasticizers, and volatile organic pollutants.
Some of these pollutants may play a role in asthma.15 One recent study suggests that chronic exposure to ozone may be associated with the development of asthma in children who exercise outside,16 and two other studies suggest that chronic exposure to particulate matter may affect lung function and growth.17, 18 Environmental factors may increase the severity or frequency of asthma attacks in children who have the disease.
Children with asthma are particularly sensitive to outdoor air pollutants, including ozone, particulate matter, and sulfur dioxide.2-14, 19 These pollutants can exacerbate asthma, leading to difficulty in breathing, an increased use of medication, visits to doctors' offices, trips to emergency rooms, and admissions to the hospital.
In addition, one study reported a relationship between exposure to hazardous air pollutants and increases in chronic respiratory symptoms that are characteristic of asthma.20 Data from the National Health Interview Survey were used to estimate the prevalence of childhood asthma.
For 1980 to 1996, the percentage of children reported to have asthma in the preceding 12 months is shown.
In 1997, the survey's method for measuring childhood asthma changed.
For 1997 to 2001, the measure shows the percentage of children who had ever been told by a doctor or health professional that they have asthma, as well as the percentage of children who were ever diagnosed with asthma and who had an asthma attack in the preceding 12 months.
Some children may have asthma when they are young and outgrow it as they get older, or their asthma may be wellcontrolled through medication and by avoiding triggers of asthma attacks.
In such cases, children may have asthma but may not have experienced any attacks in a long time.
68
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Respiratory Diseases
Measure D1
Percentage of children with asthma 14% 12% 10% 8% 6% 4% 2% 0% Children ever diagnosed with asthma
Children with asthma in the past 12 months Children ever diagnosed with asthma and having an asthma attack in the past 12 months
1980
1982
1984
1986
1988
1990
1992
1994
1996
1998
2001
SOURCE: Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, National Center for Health Statistics, Na tional Health Interview Su rvey Note: The survey questions for asthma changed in 1997; data before 1997 cannot be directly compared to data in 1997 and later.
I Between 1980 and 1995, the percentage of children with asthma doubled, from 3.6 percent in 1980 to 7.5 percent in 1995.
A decrease in the percentage of children with asthma occurred between 1995 and 1996, but it is difficult to interpret single-year changes.
I It is difficult to obtain an accurate measurement of how many children have asthma, because asthma is a complex disease that can be difficult to differentiate from other wheezing disorders, especially in children under the age of 6 years.
Prior to 1997, the percentage of children with asthma was measured by asking parents if a child in their family had asthma during the previous 12 months.
In 1997-2001, a parent was asked if his or her child had ever been diagnosed with asthma by a health professional.
If
the parent answered yes, then he or she was asked if the child had an asthma attack or episode in the last 12 months.
The percentage of children with an asthma attack in the last 12 months measures the population with incomplete control of asthma.
For 1997-2000, available data do not distinguish between those children who may no longer have active asthma and those whose asthma is well controlled.
I Starting in 2001, the National Health Interview Survey included a question that allows the estimation of the percentage of children who currently have asthma.
The results indicate that 8.7 percent (6.3 million) of children had asthma in 2001.
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Criteria Air Pollutants (E1-E3)
Body Burdens
Childhood Illnesses Respirator y (D1-D4) Respirator y (D1-D4)
Special Features
Environmental Tobacco Smoke (E5) Cotinine in Blood (B5)
Part 3: Childhood Illnesses
69
Respiratory Diseases Percentage of Children Having an Asthma Attack in the Previous 12 Months, by Race/Ethnicity and Family Income Children of lower-income families and children of color are more likely to have had an asthma attack in the previous 12 months.
These children may face barriers to medical care, or they may have less access to routine medical care and instructions for asthma management than other children do.
These factors can increase the severity and impact of the illness.21-24 Data for 1997-2000 show that the percentage of children with asthma having an asthma attack in the last 12 months differs by racial and ethnic groups and by family income.
The Institute of Medicine concluded that exposure to dust mites causes asthma in susceptible children.15 Cockroaches and tobacco smoke are likely to cause asthma in young children.15 Research suggests that lower income children are more likely to live in homes with higher exposure to cockroach allergens.25, 26 The first nationally representative survey of allergens in U.S. housing reported higher levels of dust mite allergen in bedding from lower income families.27 Although some studies found higher dust mite allergen levels in the homes of higher income families, those studies were conducted in smaller geographic areas.25, 26
70
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Respiratory Diseases Measure D2
Percentage of children having an asthma attack in the previous 12 months, by race/ethnicity and family income, 1997-2000 Hispanic 
Black nonHispanic
White nonHispanic
All Races/ Ethnicities 0%
2%
4%
6%
8%
10%
SOURCE: Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, National Center for Health Statistics, Na tional Health Interview Su rvey
I In 1997-2000, 5.5 percent of all children had an asthma attack in the previous 12 months.
I More than 8 percent of Black non-Hispanic children living in families with incomes below the poverty level had an asthma attack in the previous 12 months.
I Approximately 6 percent of White non-Hispanic children and 5 percent of Hispanic children living in families with incomes below the poverty level had an asthma attack in the previous 12 months.
I More than 6 percent of children living in families with incomes below the poverty level had an asthma attack in the previous 12 months.
About 5 percent of children living in families with incomes at the poverty level and higher had an asthma attack in the previous 12 months.
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Criteria Air Pollutants (E1-E3)
Body Burdens
Childhood Illnesses Respirator y (D1-D4) Respirator y (D1-D4)
Special Features
Environmental Tobacco Smoke (E5) Cotinine in Blood (B5)
Part 3: Childhood Illnesses
71
Respiratory Diseases Emergency Room Visits and Hospitalizations for Respiratory Diseases Children who visit emergency rooms or are hospitalized for respiratory diseases--such as asthma, upper respiratory infections, and acute bronchitis--represent the most severe cases of respiratory effects.
Only a fraction of children with respiratory diseases are admitted to the hospital.
Hospital admissions and emergency room visits for respiratory diseases can be related to a number of factors besides air pollution, such as lack of access to primary health care and instructions for asthma management.
Changes in hospital admissions and emergency room visits over time may reflect changes in medical practices, asthma therapy, and access to and use of care.28, 29 There is extensive scientific evidence that exposure to air pollution from outdoor and indoor sources can exacerbate existing respiratory conditions.12-14 For children with these conditions, exposure to air pollution can lead to difficulty in breathing, increased use of medication, visits to the doctor's office, trips to the emergency room, and in some cases admission to the hospital.30-33 For example, outdoor air pollution can cause asthma attacks in children, which can lead to emergency room visits.8, 9, 34, 35 A recent study found that increased ozone concentrations in the summer were related to increased respiratory-related hospital and emergency room visits for children under the age of two.19 Studies conducted in the northeastern United States indicate that air pollution during the summer was associated with approximately 6-24 percent of all hospital admissions for asthma.36 Recent analyses also have suggested that exacerbation of asthma from exposure to air pollution can be more severe among lower-income people than in other populations.37, 38
72
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Respiratory Diseases
Measure D3
Children's emergency room visits for asthma and other respiratory causes 500 All asthma and other respiratory causes
400 Visits per 10,000 children
300
Acute upper respiratory infections
200
Asthma
100 Acute bronchitis
0 1992 1993 1994 1995 1996 1997 1998 1999
SOURCE: Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, National Center for Health Statistics, Na tional Hospital Am bulatory Medical Ca re Su rvey
I Emergency room visits for asthma and other respiratory causes were 369 per 10,000 children in 1992 and 379 per 10,000 children in 1999.
I Trends in individual causes of emergency room visits remained fairly stable between 1992 and 1999.
In 1999, hospitals reported 239 emergency room visits per 10,000 children for acute upper respiratory infections, 104 visits per 10,000 children for asthma, and 35 visits per 10,000 children for acute bronchitis.
I Data on children's emergency room visits for asthma and other respiratory causes by race and ethnicity are shown in the data tables in Appendix A.
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Criteria Air Pollutants (E1-E3)
Body Burdens
Childhood Illnesses Respirator y (D1-D4) Respirator y (D1-D4)
Special Features
Environmental Tobacco Smoke (E5) Cotinine in Blood (B5)
Part 3: Childhood Illnesses
73
74
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Respiratory Diseases
Measure D4
Children's hospital admissions for asthma and other respiratory causes 80 70 All asthma and other respiratory causes
Admissions per 10,000 children
60 50 40 30 Asthma
20 10 0 1980
Acute bronchitis
Acute upper respiratory infections
1985
1990
1995
1999
SOURCE: Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, National Center for Health Statistics, Na tional Hospital Di scharge Su rvey
I Hospital admissions for asthma and other respiratory causes were 55 per 10,000 children in 1980 and 66 per 10,000 children in 1999.
I Hospital admissions for asthma alone increased from 21 per 10,000 children in 1980 to 29 per 10,000 children in 1999.
Hospital admissions for acute bronchitis increased from 16 per 10,000 children in 1980 to 29 per 10,000 children in 1999.
Hospital admissions decreased for acute upper respiratory infections from 18 per 10,000 children in 1980 to 8 per 10,000 children in 1999.
I Asthma hospitalizations accounted for about 7 percent of all hospitalizations for children aged 0-14 in 1999, and asthma was the fourth leading cause of non-injuryrelated hospital admissions in that year.39
I Acute bronchitis accounted for about 8 percent of all hospitalizations for children aged 0-14 in 1999.
Acute bronchitis was the third leading cause of non-injury related hospital admissions in that year.39 I Children aged 0-14 represented 40 percent of asthma hospitalizations for all ages (children and adults) during 1999.39 I Children's access to primary and preventive care also plays a role in the number of hospitalizations.
I Data on children's hospital admissions for asthma and other respiratory causes by race and ethnicity are shown in the data tables in Appendix A.
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Criteria Air Pollutants (E1-E3)
Body Burdens
Childhood Illnesses Respirator y (D1-D4) Respirator y (D1-D4)
Special Features
Environmental Tobacco Smoke (E5) Cotinine in Blood (B5)
Part 3: Childhood Illnesses
75
Childhood Cancer Cancer Incidence and Mortality Cancer in childhood is quite rare compared with cancer in adults, but it still causes more deaths than any factor, other than injuries and accidents, among children 1-19 years of age.40 Childhood cancer is not a single disease, but includes a variety of malignancies.
The forms of cancer that are most common vary according to age.
The annual incidence of childhood cancer increased from 1975 until about 1990.
The frequency of the disease appears to have become fairly stable overall since 1990.
Mortality has declined substantially during the last 25 years, due largely to improvements in treatment.
The causes of cancer in children are poorly understood, though in general it is thought that different forms of cancer have different causes.
Established risk factors for the development of childhood cancer include family history, specific genetic syndromes, radiation, and certain pharmaceutical agents used in chemotherapy.40 Evidence from epidemiological studies suggests that environmental contaminants such as pesticides and certain chemicals, in addition to radiation, may contribute to an increased frequency of some childhood cancers.40, 41 Some studies have found that children born to parents who work with or use such chemicals are more likely to have cancer in childhood.40, 42 It may be that the chemicals cause mutations in parents' germ cells that increase the risk of their children developing certain cancers, or perhaps the parental exposure is passed on to the child while in utero, affecting the child directly.
Children's direct exposures to such chemicals also may contribute to cancer.
76
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Childhood Cancer Measure D5
Cancer incidence and mortality for children under 20 200
Cases per million children
150
Incidence
100
50 Mortality
0 1975 1980 1985 1990 1995 1998 SOURCE: Incidence data from National Cancer Institute, Surveillance, Epidemiology, and End Results Program; mortality data from Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, National Center for Health Statistics, National Vital Statistics System
I The frequency of new cancer cases has been fairly stable since 1990.
The age-adjusted annual incidence of cancer in children increased from 128 to 161 cases per million children between 1975 and 1998.
Cancer mortality decreased from 51 to 28 deaths per million children during the 1975-1998 period.
I Rates of cancer incidence vary by age.
Rates are highest among infants, decline until age 9, and then rise again with increasing age.
Between 1986 and 1995, children under 5 and those aged 15-19 experienced the highest incidence rates of cancer at approximately 180 cases per million.
Children aged 5-9 and 10-14 had lower incidence rates at approximately 100 and 110 cases per million respectively.
I Between 1994 and 1998, incidence rates of cancer were highest among White non-Hispanics at 172 per million for boys and 156 per million for girls.
Hispanics were next highest at 150 per million for boys and 141 per million for girls.
Asians and Pacific Islanders had an incidence rate of 150 per million for boys and 132 per million for girls.
Black non-Hispanic children had a rate of 133 per million for boys and 117 per million for girls.
American Indians and Alaska Natives had the lowest rate at 82 per million for boys and 62 per million for girls.
Data on childhood cancer incidence and mortality by race and ethnicity are shown in the data tables in Appendix A.
Part 3: Childhood Illnesses
77
Childhood Cancer Types of Childhood Cancer Trends in the total incidence of childhood cancer are useful indicators for assessing the overall burden of cancer among children.
However, broad trends mask changes in the frequency of individual cancers.
Individual cancers often have patterns that diverge from the overall trend.
Moreover, environmental factors may be more likely to contribute to some childhood cancers than to others.
Ionizing radiation, such as from x-rays, is a known cause of leukemia and brain tumors.43, There is suggestive--but not conclusive--evidence that parental exposures to certain chemicals may be a cause of leukemia, brain cancer, non-Hodgkin's lymphoma, and Wilms' tumor in children.40, 42, 45 44
A number of studies have evaluated the relationship between pesticide exposure and certain types of childhood cancer.
Although the evidence is suggestive of a link, it is not conclusive.40 Most studies of the relationship between pesticide exposure and leukemia and brain cancer show increased risks for children whose parents used pesticides at home or work, as well as for children who may be exposed to pesticides in the home.46-49 Evidence is limited but suggestive that non-Hodgkin's lymphoma in children may be linked to parental pesticide exposure and exposure to pesticides in the home.47 There is some evidence linking pesticide use to Wilms' tumor and Ewing's sarcoma.47 There is also suggestive, though not conclusive, evidence that maternal and paternal exposure to solvents may increase the risk of childhood cancers.
A recent review found that there is strong evidence for an association between paternal exposure to solvents-- including benzene, carbon tetrachloride, and trichloroethylene--and childhood leukemias.42 A number of studies also find a link between childhood cancer and paternal employment in occupations related to motor vehicles or involving exposure to exhaust gas.42 In addition, a recent study found an association between living close to areas with heavy traffic and childhood leukemia.50 The authors of these studies suggest that the link in these cases may be benzene, which is associated with leukemia in adults.42, 50
78
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Childhood Cancer Measure D6a
Cancer incidence for children under 20 by type 35 1974-1978 1979-1983 1984-1988 1989-1993 1994-1998
30 25 20 15 10 5 0
Cases per million children
Acute lymphoblastic
Acute myeloid
Leukemias
Central nervous system tumors
Hodgkin's lymphoma
Non-Hodgkin's lymphoma
Thyroid carcinoma
Malignant melanoma
Lymphomas
Carcinomas and other epithelial neoplasms
SOURCE: National Cancer Institute, Surveilliance, Epidem iology, and End Results Program
I Leukemia was the most common cancer diagnosis for children from 1973-1998, representing about 20 percent of total cancer cases.
Incidence of acute lymphoblastic leukemia was 24 cases per million in 1974-1978 and approximately 28 cases per million in 1994-1998.
Rates of acute myeloid leukemia were approximately 5 cases per million in 1974-98 and about the same in 1994-98.
I Central percent nervous million nervous system tumors represented about 17 of childhood cancers.
The incidence of central system tumors was approximately 23 cases per in 1974-1978 and 27 per million in 1994-1998.
I Lymphomas, which include Hodgkin's disease and nonHodgkin's lymphoma, represent approximately 15 percent of childhood cancers.
Incidence of Hodgkin's disease was roughly 14 cases per million in 1974-1978 and 13 per million in 1994-1998.
There were approximately 9 cases of non-Hodgkin's lymphomas per million children in 1974-1978 and 11 per million in 1994-1998.
Part 3: Childhood Illnesses
79
Childhood Cancer
Measure D6b
Cancer incidence for children under 20 by type 35 1974-1978 1979-1983 1984-1988 1989-1993 1994-1998
30 25 20 15 10 5 0 Germ cell tumors Soft tissue sarcomas Osteosarcoma Ewing's sarcoma
Cases per million children
Malignant Bone Tumors
Neuroblastoma
Wilms' tumor
Hepatoblastoma
SOURCE: National Cancer Institute, Surveilliance, Epidem iology, and End Results Program
I Different types of cancer affect children at different ages.
Neuroblastomas and Wilms' tumor (tumors of the kidney) are usually found only in very young children.
Nervous system cancers and leukemias are most common through age 14 (leukemias being highest among 0-4 year olds); lymphomas, carcinomas, and germ cell and other gonadal tumors are more common in those 15-19 years old.40
80
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Part 3: Childhood Illnesses
81
Neurodevelopmental Disorders Neurodevelopmental Disorders in Children Researchers estimate that between 3 and 8 percent of the babies born in the United States each year will be affected by neurodevelopmental disorders such as attention-deficit/ hyperactivity disorder or mental retardation.51 Neurodevelopmental disorders are disabilities in the functioning of the brain that affect a child's behavior, memory, or ability to learn.
These effects may result from exposure of the fetus or young child to certain environmental contaminants, though current data do not indicate the extent to which environmental contaminants contribute to overall rates of neurodevelopmental disorders in children.
A child's brain and nervous system are vulnerable to adverse impacts from pollutants because they go through a long developmental process beginning shortly after conception and continuing through adolescence.52, 53 Studies have found that several widespread environmental contaminants can damage children's developing brain and nervous system.
Childhood exposure to lead contributes to learning problems such as reduced intelligence and cognitive development.54-56 Studies also have found that childhood exposure to lead contributes to attention-deficit/ hyperactivity disorder57 and hyperactivity and distractibility;58-60 increases the likelihood of dropping out of high school, having a reading disability, lower vocabulary, and lower class standing in high school;61 and increases the risk for antisocial and delinquent behavior.62 Methylmercury also has negative impacts on children's neurological development.
Studies of children whose mothers had high intakes of mercury-contaminated seafood prior to conception found adverse impacts on intelligence63, 64 and decreased functioning in the areas of language, attention, and memory.65 Particularly high levels of exposure to mercury in the womb have been found to cause mental retardation.66, 67 Several studies of children exposed to elevated levels of polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs) have linked these contaminants to neurodevelopmental effects, including lowered intelligence and behavioral deficits such as inattention and excessive reaction to stimulation.
Most of these studies find that the effects are associated with exposure in the womb resulting from the mother having eaten food contaminated with PCBs.68-73 Adverse effects on intelligence and behavior also have been found in children of women who were highly exposed to mixtures of PCBs, chlorinated dibenzofurans, and other pollutants prior to conception.74-76 Human studies also suggest that exposures to other metals such as cadmium and arsenic may have adverse effects on neurological development.58, 77-79 Other types of pollutants also have been associated in animal studies with neurodevelopmental effects.
Numerous toxicological studies link both prenatal and postnatal exposure to organophosphate pesticides to neurodevelopmental effects.80 A recent study of brominated flame retardants found that two of these compounds caused adverse effects on behavior, learning, and memory in animals.81
Healthy People 2010:
Objective 16-14 of Healthy People 2010 calls for a reduction in the occurrence of developmental disabilities.
See Appendix C for more information.
82
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Neurodevelopmental Disorders Mental retardation is a neurodevelopmental disorder that, in some cases, is related to exposures to environmental contaminants such as lead.
A measure of mental retardation in children is presented here.
A second neurodevelopmental disorder, attention-deficit/ hyperactivity disorder, is discussed in the Emerging Issues section of this report.
Although the studies described above have related lead, PCBs, mercury, and perhaps other contaminants to adverse neurodevelopmental effects in humans, it is not currently possible to determine the extent to which environmental contaminants contribute to developmental disorders.
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Criteria Air Pollutants: lead (E1-E2) Drinking Water: lead (E6-E7)
Body Burdens Lead in Blood (B1-B3) Mercury in Blood (B4)
Childhood Illnesses Neurodevelopmental (D7)
Special Features Lead in Schools (S1-S3)
Part 3: Childhood Illnesses
83
Neurodevelopmental Disorders Mental Retardation The most commonly used definitions of mental retardation emphasize subaverage intellectual functioning before the age of 18, usually defined as an intelligence quotient (IQ) less than 70 and impairments in life skills such as communication, self-care, home living, and social or interpersonal skills.
Different severity categories, ranging from mild retardation to severe retardation, are defined on the basis of IQ scores.82 Researchers have identified many causes of mental retardation, including genetic disorders, traumatic accidents, and prenatal events such as maternal infection or exposure to alcohol.82, 83 Exposure to lead and exposure to particularly high levels of mercury also have been shown to cause mental retardation.66-67, 84 Furthermore, lead, mercury, and PCBs all have been found to have adverse effects on intelligence and cognitive functioning in children.
Exposure to these environmental contaminants therefore has the potential to increase the proportion of the population with IQ less than 70, thus increasing the incidence of mental retardation in an exposed population.85 The causes of mental retardation are unknown in 30 to 50 percent of all cases.83 The causes are more frequently identified for cases of severe retardation (IQ less than 50).
The cause of mild retardation (IQ between 50 and 70) is unknown in more than 75 percent of cases.86, 87 This measure on the prevalence of mental retardation among U.S. children presents data obtained from the National Health Interview Survey (NHIS).
Although the NHIS provides the best national-level data available, NHIS data likely underestimate the prevalence of mental retardation.
Reasons for this understatement may include late identification of affected children and the exclusion of institutionalized children from the NHIS survey population.
Further, the NHIS relies on parents reporting that their child has been diagnosed with mental retardation, and accuracy of parental responses could be affected by cultural and other factors.
84
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Neurodevelopmental Disorders Measure D7
Children reported to have mental retardation, by race/ethnicity and family income, 1997-2000 14 12 10 8 6 4 2 0
Cases per 1,000 children
All
W hite nonHispanic
Black nonHispanic
Hispanic
<
>
SOURCE: Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, National Center for Health Statistics, Na tional Health Interview Su rvey
I In 1997-2000, about 6 children out of every 1,000 were reported to have been diagnosed with mental retardation.
I Reported rates of mental retardation were 10 per 1,000 Black non-Hispanic children, 6 per 1,000 White nonHispanic children, and 5 per 1,000 Hispanic children.
I 12 children out of every 1,000 living in families with incomes below the poverty level were reported to have mental retardation.
Reported rates of mental retardation were lowest for children living in families with higher incomes.
Part 3: Childhood Illnesses
85
References 1.
D. M. Mannino, D. M. Homa, L. J. Akinbami, J. E. Moorman, C. Gwynn and S. C. Redd. 2002.
Surveillance for asthma--United States, 1980-1999.
Morbidity and Mortality Weekly Report 51 (SS01):1-13.
2.
B. Fauroux, M. Sampil, P. Quénel and Y.
Lemoullec.
2000.
Ozone: a trigger for hospital pediatric asthma emergency room visits.
Pediatric Pulmonolog y 30 (1):41-6.
3.
T. Hirsch, S. K. Weiland, E. von Mutius, A. F. Safeca, H. Gräfe, E. Csaplovics, H. Duhme, U. Keil and W. Leupold.
1999.
Inner city air pollution and respiratory health and atopy in children.
European Respiratory Journal 14 (3):669-77.
4.
F. Hrubá, E. Fabiánová, K. Koppová and J. J. Vandenberg.
2001.
Childhood respiratory symptoms, hospital admissions, and long-term exposure to airborne particulate matter.
Journal of Exposure Analysis and Environmental Epidemiolog y 11 (1):33-40.
5.
J. Q. Koenig.
1999.
Air pollution and asthma.
Journal of Allerg y and Clinical Immunolog y 104 (4 Pt 1):717-22.
6.
S. van der Zee, G. Hoek, H. M. Boezen, J. P. Schouten, J. H. van Wijnen and B. Brunekreef.
1999.
Acute effects of urban air pollution on respiratory health of children with and without chronic respiratory symptoms.
Occupational and Environmental Medicine 56 (12):802-12.
7.
W. Roemer, G. Hoek and B. Brunekreef.
2000.
Pollution effects on asthmatic children in Europe, the PEACE study.
Clinical and Experimental Allerg y 30 (8):1067-75.
8.
M. Lipsett, S. Hurley and B. Ostro.
1997.
Air pollution and emergency room visits for asthma in Santa Clara County, California.
Environmental Health Perspectives 105 (2):216-22.
9.
G. Norris, S. N. YoungPong, J. Q. Koenig, T. V. Larson, L. Sheppard and J. W. Stout.
1999.
An association between fine particles and asthma emergency department visits for children in Seattle.
Environmental Health Perspectives 107 (6):489-93.
10.
R. McConnell, K. Berhane, F. Gilliland, S. J. London, H. Vora, E. Avol, W. J. Gauderman, H. G. Margolis, F. Lurmann, D. C. Thomas and J. M. Peters.
1999.
Air pollution and bronchitic symptoms in Southern California children with asthma.
Environmental Health Perspectives 107 (9):757-60.
11.
A. Peters, D. W. Dockery, J. Heinrich and H. E. Wichmann.
1997.
Short-term effects of particulate air pollution on respiratory morbidity in asthmatic children.
European Respiratory Journal 10 (4):872-9.
12.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
1994.
Supplement to the Second Addendum (1986) to Air Quality Criteria for Particulate Matter and Sulfur Oxides: Assessment of New Findings on Sulfur Dioxide Acute Exposure Health Effects in Asthmatic Individuals.
Research Triangle Park, NC: Office of Research and Development.
EPA 600/FP-93/002.
13.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
1996.
Air Quality Criteria for Ozone and Related Photochemical Oxidants.
Washington, DC: National Center for Environmental Assessment, Office of Research and Development.
EPA/600/P-93/004aF. http://www.epa.gov/ttn/oarpg/t1cd.html.
14.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
1996.
Air Quality Criteria for Particulate Matter.
Washington, DC: National Center for Environmental Assessment, Office of Research and Development.
EPA/600/P-95/001aF. http://cfpub.epa.gov/ncea/cfm/archive/partmatt2.cfm.
15.
National Academy of Sciences.
2000.
Clearing the Air: Asthma and Indoor Air Exposures.
Washington DC: National Academy Press.
http://books.nap.edu/catalog/9610.html.
16.
R. McConnell, K. Berhane, F. Gilliland, S. J. London, T. Islam, W. J. Gauderman, E. Avol, H. G. Margolis and J. M. Peters.
2002.
Asthma in exercising children exposed to ozone: a cohort study.
Lancet 359 (9304):386-91.
17.
E. L. Avol, W. J. Gauderman, S. M. Tan, S. J. London and J. M. Peters.
2001.
Respiratory effects of relocating to areas of differing air pollution levels.
American Journal of Respiratory and Critical Care Medicine 164 (11):2067-72.
86
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
References 18.
W. J. Gauderman, G. F. Gilliland, H. Vora, E. Avol, D. Stram, R. McConnell, D. Thomas, F. Lurmann, H. G. Margolis, E. B. Rappaport, K. Berhane and J. M. Peters.
2002.
Association between air pollution and lung function growth in southern California children: results from a second cohort.
American Journal of Respiratory and Critical Care Medicine 166 (1):76-84.
19.
R. T. Burnett, M. Smith-Doiron, D. Stieb, M. E. Raizenne, J. R. Brook, R. E. Dales, J. A. Leech, S. Cakmak and D. Krewski.
2001.
Association between ozone and hospitalization for acute respiratory diseases in children less than 2 years of age.
American Journal of Epidemiolog y 153 (5):444-52.
20.
J. H. Ware, J. D. Spengler, L. M. Neas, J. M. Samet, G. R. Wagner, D. Coultas, H. Ozkaynak and M. Schwab.
1993.
Respiratory and irritant health effects of ambient volatile organic compounds.
The Kanawha County Health Study.
American Journal of Epidemiolog y 137 (12):1287-301.
21.
M. L. Rosenbach, C. Irvin and R. F. Coulam.
1999.
Access for low-income children: is health insurance enough? Pediatrics 103 (6 Pt 1):1167-74.
22.
H. J. Farber, C. Johnson and R. C. Beckerman.
1998.
Young inner-city children visiting the emergency room (ER) for asthma: risk factors and chronic care behaviors.
Journal of Asthma 35 (7):547-52.
23.
N. Halfon and P. W. Newacheck.
1993.
Childhood asthma and poverty: differential impacts and utilization of health services.
Pediatrics 91 (1):56-61.
24.
M. R. Price, J. M. Norris, B. Bucher Bartleson, L. A. Gavin and M. D. Klinnert.
1999.
An investigation of the medical care utilization of children with severe asthma according to their type of insurance.
Journal of Asthma 36 (3):271-9.
25.
B. T. Kitch, G. Chew, H. A. Burge, M. L. Muilenberg, S. T. Weiss, T. A. Platts-Mills, G. O'Connor and D. R. Gold.
2000.
Socioeconomic predictors of high allergen levels in homes in the greater Boston area.
Environmental Health Perspectives 108 (4):301-7.
26.
B. P. Leaderer, K. Belanger, E. Triche, T. Holford, D. R. Gold, Y.
Kim, T. Jankun, P. Ren, J. E. M. Jr., T. A. PlattsMills, M. D. Chapman and M. B. Bracken.
2002.
Dust mite, cockroach, cat, and dog allergen concentrations in homes of asthmatic children in the northeastern United States: impact of socioeconomic factors and population density.
Environmental Health Perspectives 110 (4):419-25.
27.
S. J. Arbes, R.D.Cohn, M. Yin, M. L. Muilenberg, H. A. Burge, W. Friedman and D. C. Zeldin.
In press.
House dust mite allergen in U.S. beds: results from the first national survey of lead and allergens in housing.
Journal of Allerg y and Clinical Immunolog y. 28.
C. J. Homer, P. Szilagyi, L. Rodewald, S. R. Bloom, P. Greenspan, S. Yazdgerdi, J. M. Leventhal, D. Finkelstein and J. M. Perrin.
1996.
Does quality of care affect rates of hospitalization for childhood asthma? Pediatrics 98 (1):18-23.
29.
M. J. Russo, K. M. McConnochie, J. T. McBride, P. G. Szilagyi, A. M. Brooks and K. J. Roghmann.
1999.
Increase in admission threshold explains stable asthma hospitalization rates.
Pediatrics 104 (3 Pt. 1):454-62.
30.
R. T. Burnett, S. Cakmak, J. R. Brook and D. Krewski.
1997.
The role of particulate size and chemistry in the association between summertime ambient air pollution and hospitalization for cardiorespiratory diseases.
Environmental Health Perspectives 105 (6):614-20.
31.
R. T. Burnett, M. Smith-Doiron, D. Stieb, S. Cakmak and J. R. Brook.
1999.
Effects of particulate and gaseous air pollution on cardiorespiratory hospitalizations.
Archives of Environmental Health 54 (2):130-9.
32.
R. C. Gwynn, R. T. Burnett and G. D. Thurston.
2000.
A time-series analysis of acidic particulate matter and daily mortality and morbidity in the Buffalo, New York, region.
Environmental Health Perspectives 108 (2):125-33.
33.
G. Thurston, I. Kazuhiko, C. Hayes, D. Bates and M. Lippmann.
1994.
Respiratory Hospital Admissions and Summertime Haze Air Pollution in Toronto, Ontario; Consideration of the Role of Acid Aerosols.
Journal of Exposure Analysis and Environmental Epidemiolog y 2:429-450.
Part 3: Childhood Illnesses
87
References 34.
P. E. Tolbert, J. A. Mulholland, D. L. MacIntosh, F. Xu, D. Daniels, O. J. Devine, B. P. Carlin, M. Klein, J. Dorley, A. J. Butler, D. F. Nordenberg, H. Frumkin, P. B. Ryan and M. C. White.
2000.
Air quality and pediatric emergency room visits for asthma in Atlanta, Georgia, USA.
American Journal of Epidemiolog y 151 (8):798-810.
35.
J. Schwartz, D. Slater, T. V. Larson, W. E. Pierson and J. Q. Koenig.
1993.
Particulate air pollution and hospital emergency room visits for asthma in Seattle.
American Review of Respiratory Disease 147 (4):826-31.
36.
G. Thurston, K. Ito, P. Kinney and M. Lippmann.
1992.
A multi-year study of air pollution and respiratory hospital admissions in three results for 1988 and 1989 summers.
Journal of Exposure Analysis and Environmental Epidemiolog y 2:429-450.
37.
R. C. Gwynn and G. D. Thurston.
2001.
The burden of air pollution: impacts among racial minorities.
Environmental Health Perspectives 109 (Suppl.
4):501-6.
38.
E. Nauenberg and K. Basu. 1999.
Effect of insurance coverage on the relationship between asthma hospitalizations and exposure to air pollution.
Public Health Reports 114 (2):135-48.
39.
J. R. Popovic.
2001.
1999 National Hospital Discharge Survey: Annual Summary with Detailed Diagnosis and Procedure Data.
Vital Health Statistics 13 (151).
40.
L. A. G. Reis, M. A. Smith, J. G. Gurney, M. Linet, T. Tamra, J. L. Young and G. R. Bunin.
1999.
Cancer Incidence and Survival among Children and Adolescents: United States SEER Program 1975-1995.
Bethesda, MD: National Cancer Institute, SEER Program.
NIH Pub. No. 99-4649.
http://www.seer.ims.nci.nih.gov/Publications/PedMono.
41.
S. H. Zahm and S. S. Devesa.
1995.
Childhood cancer: overview of incidence trends and environmental carcinogens.
Environmental Health Perspectives 103 (Suppl.
6):177-184.
42.
J. S. Colt and A. Blair.
1998.
Parental occupational exposures and risk of childhood cancer.
Environmental Health Perspectives 106 (Suppl.
3):909-925.
43.
J. Boice, J.D. and R. W. Miller.
1999.
Childhood and adult cancer after intrauterine exposure to ionizing radiation.
Teratolog y 59 (227-233).
44.
R. Doll and R. Wakeford.
1997.
Risk of childhood cancer from fetal irradiation.
British Journal of Radiolog y 70:130-139.
45.
S. H. Zahm. 1999.
Childhood leukemia and pesticides.
Epidemiolog y 10:473-475.
46.
J. D. Buckley, L. L. Robison, R. Swotinsky, D. H. Garabrant, M. LeBeau, P. Manchester, M. E. Nesbit, L. Odom, J. M. Peters and W. G. Woods.
1989.
Occupational exposures of parents of children with acute nonlymphocytic leukemia: a report from the Children's Cancer Study Group.
Cancer Research 49 (4030-4037).
47.
S. H. Zahm and M. H. Ward.
1998.
Pesticides and childhood cancer.
Environmental Health Perspectives 106 (Suppl.
3):893-908.
48.
M. Feychting, N. Plato, G. Nise and A. Ahlbom.
2001.
Paternal occupational exposures and childhood cancer.
Environmental Health Perspectives 109 (2):193-6.
49.
X. Ma, P. A. Buffler, R. B. Gunier, G. Dahl, M. T. Smith, K. Reinier and P. Reynolds.
2002.
Critical windows of exposure to household pesticides and risk of childhood leukemia.
Environmental Health Perspectives 110 (9):95560.
50.
R. L. Pearson, H. Wachtel and K. L. Ebi. 2000.
Distance-weighted traffic density in proximity to a home is a risk factor for leukemia and other childhood cancers.
Journal of the Air and Waste Management Association 50 (2):175-80.
51.
B. Weiss and P. J. Landrigan.
2000.
The developing brain and the environment: an introduction.
Environmental Health Perspectives 108 Suppl.
3:373-4.
52.
D. Rice and S. Barone, Jr. 2000.
Critical periods of vulnerability for the developing nervous system: evidence from humans and animal models.
Environmental Health Perspectives 108 Suppl.
3:511-33.
53.
P. M. Rodier.
1995.
Developing brain as a target of toxicity.
Environmental Health Perspectives 103 Suppl.
6:73-6.
88 America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
References 54.
D. C. Bellinger, A. Leviton and C. Waternaux.
1987.
Longitudinal analyses of prenatal and postnatal lead exposure and early cognitive development.
New England Journal of Medicine 316 (17):1037-43.
55.
A. J. McMichael, P. A. Baghurst, N. R. Wigg, G. V. Vimpani, E. F. Robertson and R. J. Roberts.
1988.
Port Pirie Cohort Study: environmental exposure to lead and children's abilities at the age of four years.
New England Journal of Medicine 319 (8):468-75.
56.
B. P. Lanphear, K. Dietrich, P. Auinger and C. Cox.
2000.
Cognitive deficits associated with blood lead concentrations 
Public Health Reports 115 (6):521-9.
57.
R. W. Tuthill.
1996.
Hair lead levels related to children's classroom attention-deficit behavior.
Archives of Environmental Health 51 (3):214-20.
58.
J. Calderon, M. E. Navarro, M. E. Jimenez-Capdeville, M. A. Santos-Diaz, A. Golden, I. Rodriguez-Leyva, V. Borja-Aburto and F. Diaz-Barriga.
2001.
Exposure to arsenic and lead and neuropsychological development in Mexican children.
Environmental Research 85 (2):69-76.
59.
A. L. Mendelsohn, B. P. Dreyer, A. H. Fierman, C. M. Rosen, L. A. Legano, H. A. Kruger, S. W. Lim and C. D. Courtlandt.
1998.
Low-level lead exposure and behavior in early childhood.
Pediatrics 101 (3):E10.
60.
B. Minder, E. A. Das-Smaal, E. F. Brand and J. F. Orlebeke.
1994.
Exposure to lead and specific attentional problems in schoolchildren.
Journal of Learning Disabilities 27 (6):393-9.
61.
H. L. Needleman, A. Schell, D. C. Bellinger, A. Leviton and E. N. Allred.
1990.
The long term effects of exposure to low doses of lead in childhood, an 11-year follow-up report.
New England Journal of Medicine 322 (2):83-8.
62.
H. L. Needleman, J. A. Riess, M. J. Tobin, G. E. Biesecker and J. B. Greenhouse.
1996.
Bone lead levels and delinquent behavior.
Journal of the American Medical Association 275 (5):363-9.
63.
T. Kjellstrom, P. Kennedy, P. Wallis and C. Mantell.
1989.
Physical and mental development of children with prenatal exposure to mercury from fish.
Stage 2: Interviews and psychological tests at age 6.
Solna, Sweden: National Swedish Environmental Protection Board.
3642.
64.
K. S. Crump, T. Kjellstrom, A. M. Shipp, A. Silvers and A. Stewart.
1998.
Influence of prenatal mercury exposure upon scholastic and psychological test performance: benchmark analysis of a New Zealand cohort.
Risk Analysis 18 (6):701-13.
65.
P. Grandjean, P. Weihe, R. F. White, F. Debes, S. Araki, K. Yokoyama, K. Murata, N. Sorensen, R. Dahl and P. J. Jorgensen.
1997.
Cognitive deficit in 7-year-old children with prenatal exposure to methylmercury.
Neurotoxicolog y and Teratolog y 19 (6):417-28.
66.
M. Harada, H. Akagi, T. Tsuda, T. Kizaki and H. Ohno. 1999.
Methylmercury level in umbilical cords from patients with congenital Minamata disease.
Science of the Total Environment 234 (1-3):59-62.
67.
F. Bakir, H. Rustam, S. Tikriti, S. F. Al-Damluji and H. Shihristani.
1980.
Clinical and epidemiological aspects of methylmercury poisoning.
Postgraduate Medical Journal 56 (651):1-10.
68.
T. Darvill, E. Lonky, J. Reihman, P. Stewart and J. Pagano.
2000.
Prenatal exposure to PCBs and infant performance on the Fagan test of infant intelligence.
Neurotoxicolog y 21 (6):1029-38.
69.
J. L. Jacobson and S. W. Jacobson.
1996.
Intellectual impairment in children exposed to polychlorinated biphenyls in utero.
New England Journal of Medicine 335 (11):783-9.
70.
J. L. Jacobson and S. W. Jacobson.
1997.
Teratogen Update: Polychlorinated Biphenyls.
Teratolog y 55:338-347.
71.
S. Patandin, C. I. Lanting, P. G. Mulder, E. R. Boersma, P. J. Sauer and N. Weisglas-Kuperus.
1999.
Effects of environmental exposure to polychlorinated biphenyls and dioxins on cognitive abilities in Dutch children at 42 months of age.
Journal of Pediatrics 134 (1):33-41.
72.
P. Stewart, J. Reihman, E. Lonky, T. Darvill and J. Pagano.
2000.
Prenatal PCB exposure and neonatal behavioral assessment scale (NBAS) performance.
Neurotoxicolog y and Teratolog y 22 (1):21-9.
Part 3: Childhood Illnesses
89
References 73.
J. Walkowiak, J. A. Wiener, A. Fastabend, B. Heinzow, U. Kramer, E. Schmidt, H. J. Steingruber, S. Wundram and G. Winneke.
2001.
Environmental exposure to polychlorinated biphenyls and quality of the home environment: effects on psychodevelopment in early childhood.
Lancet 358 (9293):1602-7.
74.
W. J. Rogan, B. C. Gladen, K. L. Hung, S. L. Koong, L. Y.
Shih, J. S. Taylor, Y. C. Wu, D. Yang, N. B. Ragan and C. C. Hsu.
1988.
Congenital poisoning by polychlorinated biphenyls and their contaminants in Taiwan.
Science 241 (4863):334-6.
75.
Y. C. Chen, Y. L. Guo, C. C. Hsu and W. J. Rogan.
1992.
Cognitive development of Yu-Cheng ("oil disease") children prenatally exposed to heat-degraded PCBs.
Journal of the American Medical Association 268 (22):3213-8.
76.
Y. C. Chen, M. L. Yu, W. J. Rogan, B. C. Gladen and C. C. Hsu.
1994.
A 6-year follow-up of behavior and activity disorders in the Taiwan Yu-cheng children.
American Journal of Public Health 84 (3):415-21.
77.
M. Marlowe, A. Cossairt, C. Moon, J. Errera, A. MacNeel, R. Peak, J. Ray and C. Schroeder.
1985.
Main and interaction effects of metallic toxins on classroom behavior.
Journal of Abnormal Child Psycholog y 13 (2):185-98.
78.
S. M. Stewart-Pinkham.
1989.
The effect of ambient cadmium air pollution on the hair mineral content of children.
Science of the Total Environment 78:289-96.
79.
R. W. Thatcher, M. L. Lester, R. McAlaster and R. Horst.
1982.
Effects of low levels of cadmium and lead on cognitive functioning in children.
Archives of Environmental Health 37 (3):159-66.
80.
B. Eskenazi, A. Bradman and R. Castorina.
1999.
Exposures of children to organophosphate pesticides and their potential adverse health effects.
Environmental Health Perspectives 107 (Suppl.
3):409-19.
81.
P. Eriksson, E. Jakobsson and A. Fredriksson.
2001.
Brominated flame retardants: a novel class of developmental neurotoxicants in our environment? Environmental Health Perspectives 109 (9):903-908.
82.
S. R. Schroeder.
2000.
Mental retardation and developmental disabilities influenced by environmental neurotoxic insults.
Environmental Health Perspectives 108 (Suppl.
3):395-9.
83.
D. K. Daily, H. H. Ardinger and G. E. Holmes.
2000.
Identification and evaluation of mental retardation.
American Family Physician 61 (4):1059-67, 1070.
84.
O. David, S. Hoffman, B. McGann, J. Sverd and J. Clark.
1976.
Low lead levels and mental retardation.
Lancet 2 (8000):1376-9.
85.
B. Weiss.
2000.
Vulnerability of children and the developing brain to neurotoxic hazards.
Environmental Health Perspectives 108 (Suppl.
3):375-81.
86.
C. Murphy, C. Boyle, D. Schendel, P. Decouflé and M. Yeargin-Allsopp.
1998.
Epidemiology of mental retardation in children.
Mental Retardation and Developmental Disabilities Research Reviews 4 (1):6-13.
87.
J. Flint and A. O. Wilkie.
1996.
The genetics of mental retardation.
British Medical Bulletin 52 (3):453-64.
90
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
PART 4
Emerging Issues
92
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Emerging Issues he links between environmental contaminants and childhood diseases and disorders are receiving increasing attention and research.
We can expect that our understanding of how children's health may be influenced by environmental factors will continue to improve with more research and better data about both environmental contaminants and health outcomes.
T
Emerging Issues
This section presents information about important aspects of children's environmental health for which data recently have become available.
Additional research in these areas will be useful to better determine how particular exposures to environmental contaminants might contribute to these particular health areas.
It is important to identify emerging issues and new data sources in order to continue to expand our understanding of children's environmental health.
This section includes two emerging issues: mercury concentrations in fish, and attentiondeficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).
Part 4: Emerging Issues
93
Emerging Issues Mercury in Fish Some pollutants build up in the bodies of fish and other animals, reaching high concentrations at upper levels of the food chain.
For mercury, this "bioaccumulation" process occurs primarily in aquatic systems such as lakes or oceans.
Mercury that is deposited from air currents or released to water bodies tends to become attached to particles and deposited into sediments.
There, under certain conditions, bacteria convert metallic or elemental forms of mercury into methylmercury.1 Methylmercury can be absorbed in particles or from the water by small creatures such as shrimp or other invertebrates, which then are consumed by predators including fish.2 As each organism builds up methylmercury in its own tissues, and as smaller fish are eaten by larger fish, concentrations of methylmercury can accumulate, particularly in those of large fish that live a relatively long time.3-6 Examples of other chemicals that bioaccumulate include dioxins, PCBs, and chlorinated pesticides such as DDT or chlordane.
Some of these chemicals also may pose risks to children.
Fish are the most common source of exposure to methylmercury for most people in the United States7, 8 and in many countries around the world.9 As noted in Part 2 of this report, about 8 percent of women of child-bearing age have blood mercury concentrations greater than 5.8 parts per billion (equivalent to EPA's reference dose) based on data from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
EPA has determined that children born to such women may be at some increased risk of potential adverse health effects.10 Chemicals accumulated by women may pass through the umbilical cord, contributing to prenatal exposure in children.
Prenatal exposure to such levels of methylmercury may cause developmental and cognitive effects in children, even at doses that do not result in effects in women who are or may become pregnant.11-13 Some proportion of mercury that ends up in fish originates as emissions to the air.
Mercury released into the atmosphere can travel long distances on global air currents and be deposited in areas far from its original source.14, 15 The largest human-generated source of mercury emissions in the United States is the burning of coal, which is roughly one percent of mercury in the global pool.
Other sources include the combustion of waste and industrial processes that use mercury.14 Information regarding warnings to the public about elevated concentrations of methylmercury in fish provides some indication of the likelihood of exposure to mercury from fish that people catch for their own use.
Fish advisory information is not a surrogate for exposure to the general population, because most people eat only commercial fish that they purchase in stores or restaurants.
However, there are subpopulations who do consume fish they have caught from waters covered by fish advisories, and fish advisory information is an indirect surrogate for exposure to these populations.
The scope of the warnings issued by states varies considerably.
States typically advise people to reduce their consumption of contaminated fish by switching to less-contaminated species or to smaller fish that have not accumulated as much mercury.
For methylmercury, which accumulates in muscle tissue, changes in cooking practices such as trimming fat or cooking over a grill do not reduce exposure.
States often provide guidance about the maximum number of meals of fish that can be safely consumed.
Some warnings apply to entire states, others are issued for individual lakes or streams.
States also issue warnings for other contaminants besides mercury.
94
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Emerging Issues A review of fish advisories for mercury indicates the following: I Most states issue advisories to warn people about elevated concentrations of mercury in non-commercial fish.
In 2001, 44 states had advisories in effect for mercury in non-commercial fish.
In some cases, advisories tell people to avoid eating fish from a particular area or a particular species.
In other cases, they tell people to limit the amount of fish that they consume in general from a specified body of water.
Some advisories are directed at protecting particularly susceptible groups, usually women of child-bearing age and children.
I Statewide advisories have shown the greatest increase.
In 2001, statewide advisories were in effect for 17 states--Connecticut, Indiana, Kentucky, Maine, Maryland, Massachusetts, Michigan, Minnesota, Missouri, New Hampshire, New Jersey, North Carolina, North Dakota, Ohio, Pennsylvania, Vermont and Wisconsin--up from five states in 1995.
Another nine states have statewide advisories for mercury in their coastal waters.
Increased public health concerns have led to increased monitoring and this may explain, in part, the observed increase in statewide advisories.
I State programs for monitoring contaminants in fish and issuing advisories vary greatly.
The absence of a state advisory does not necessarily indicate that there is no risk of exposure to unsafe levels of mercury in recreationally caught fish.
Likewise, the presence of a state advisory does not indicate that there is a risk of exposure to unsafe levels of mercury in recreationally caught fish, unless people consume these fish at levels greater than those recommended by the fish advisory.
I Although some states monitor fish in a large number of water bodies, other states monitor few or none.
The relationship between monitoring, setting of fishing advisories, and frequency of fishing has not been evaluated by EPA.
Also, the concentration of mercury that triggers an advisory varies from state to state.
As a result, the number of advisories does not directly represent the severity of contaminants in recreationally caught fish.
It also reflects the extent of monitoring and the way that states assess risk.
EPA will work with other agencies to evaluate the feasibility of developing a measure more closely related to exposures that reflect mercury concentrations in fish intended for human consumption, for inclusion in future reports.
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants
Body Burdens Mercury in Blood (B4)
Childhood Illnesses Neurodevelopmental (D7)
Special Features
Part 4: Emerging Issues
95
Emerging Issues AttentionDeficit/Hyperactivity Disorder Attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD) is a disruptive behavior disorder characterized by ongoing inattention and/or hyperactivity-impulsivity occurring in several settings and more frequently and severely than is typical for individuals in the same stage of development.17 ADHD can make family and peer relationships difficult, diminish academic performance, and reduce vocational development.
A diagnosis of ADHD considers whether a child is hyperactive, inattentive, or impulsive, at levels that are higher than expected for a child's developmental stage, and whether the behaviors occur on a continual basis in different settings (for example, both at school and at home) and whether the behaviors interfere with the child's ability to function in those settings.17, 18 As the medical profession has developed a greater understanding of ADHD through the years, the name of this condition has changed.
The American Psychiatric Association adopted the name "attention deficit disorder" in the early 1980s and revised it to "attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder" in 1987.19 Research on this disorder is ongoing and extensive, and new findings are frequently reported, but the causes of ADHD are unknown.
Research indicates that there are genetic influences on the incidence of ADHD.18, 20-22 The role of environmental contaminants in contributing to ADHD is unknown, as few studies have looked explicitly at the relationship between ADHD and exposures to environmental contaminants.
However, many of the behaviors that are observed in children with ADHD also have been associated with elevated exposures to certain environmental contaminants.
Several studies have found relationships between attention problems, hyperactivity, and impulsivity, which are the common behaviors of ADHD, and exposures to lead23-28 and PCBs.29-32 Animal studies provide supporting evidence that exposures to PCBs and lead may contribute to ADHD.28, 33 Data on the prevalence of ADHD among U.S. children are available from the National Health Interview Survey (NHIS), conducted by the National Center for Health Statistics of the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention, for the years 1997-2000.
Although the NHIS provides the best data available, it is difficult to develop estimates of the prevalence of ADHD for a variety of reasons.
Diagnosis of ADHD relies on recognition of various types of behaviors in different combinations, and therefore requires a certain amount of judgment on the part of a doctor, similar to other psychiatric disorders.
Many other problems, including anxiety disorders, depression, and learning disabilities, can be expressed with signs and symptoms that resemble those of ADHD.
As many as half of those with ADHD also have other mental disorders, which can make it harder to diagnose and treat ADHD.34 A diagnosis of ADHD depends not only on the presence of particular symptoms and behaviors in a child, but on concerns being raised by a parent or teacher about the child's behavior and on the child's access to a doctor to make the diagnosis.
Further, the NHIS relies on parents reporting that their child has been diagnosed with ADHD.
It is unclear whether the percentage of children with ADHD has increased in recent years.
Although recently more children have been diagnosed with and treated for ADHD, this increase may not reflect an increase in incidence, but rather greater awareness of the condition due to media attention, development of effective treatments, or other factors.
Continued tracking of ADHD in the coming years should be useful for evaluating trends in diagnosis of ADHD.
96
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Emerging Issues It is most informative to focus on ADHD statistics for children 5-17 years old, because it is difficult to diagnose ADHD in younger children.
Data from the NHIS indicate that: I In 1997-2000, 6.7 percent of children ages 5-17 were reported to have been diagnosed with attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder (ADHD).
I Eight percent of White non-Hispanic children, 5 percent of Black non-Hispanic children, and nearly 4 percent of Hispanic children were reported to have ADHD.
I Almost 14 percent of White non-Hispanic children living in families with incomes below poverty level were reported to have ADHD--the highest of any group.
I Two to three times more boys than girls are diagnosed with ADHD.35
Part 4: Emerging Issues
97
References 1.
J. R. D. Guimaraes, J. Ikingura and H. Akagi.
2000.
Methyl mercury production and distribution in river water-sediment systems investigated through radiochemical techniques.
Water, Air, and Soil Pollution 124 (1-2):113-124.
2.
C. Y.
Chen, R. S. Stemberger, B. Klaue, J. D. Blum, P. C. Pickhardt and C. L. Folt. 2000.
Accumulation of heavy metals in food web components across a gradient of lakes.
Limnolog y and Oceanography 45 (7):1525-1536.
3.
R. P. Mason, J. R. Reinfelder and F. M. M. Morel.
1995.
Bioaccumulation of mercury and methylmercury.
Water, Air, and Soil Pollution 80:915-921.
4.
R. Dietz, F. Riget, M. Cleemann, A. Aarkrog, P. Johansen and J. C. Hansen.
2000.
Comparison of contaminants from different trophic levels and ecosystems.
Science of the Total Environment 245 (1-3):221-231.
5.
C. C. Gilmour and G. S. Riedel.
2000.
A survey of size-specific mercury concentrations in game fish from Maryland fresh and estuarine waters.
Archives of Environmental Contamination and Toxicolog y 39 (1):53-59.
6.
R. M. Neumann and S. M. Ward.
1999.
Bioaccumulation and biomagnification of mercury in two warmwater fish communities.
Journal of Freshwater Ecolog y 14 (4):487-498.
7.
P. Grandjean, P. Weihe, P. J. Jorgensen, T. Clarkson, E. Cernichiari and T. Videro.
1992.
Impact of maternal seafood diet on fetal exposure to mercury, selenium, and lead.
Archives of Environmental Health 47 (3):185-195.
8.
G. J. Myers and P. W. Davidson.
2000.
Does methylmercury have a role in causing developmental disabilities in children? Environmental Health Perspectives 108 (Suppl.
3):413-20.
9.
H. Galal-Gorchev.
1993.
Dietary intake, levels in food and estimated intake of lead, cadmium, and mercury.
Food Additives and Contaminants 10 (1):115-28.
10.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
2001.
Integrated Risk Information System (IRIS) Risk Information for Methylmercury (MeHg).
Washington, DC: National Center for Environmental Assessment.
http://www.epa.gov/iris/subst/0073.htm.
11.
P. Grandjean, R. F. White, A. Nielsen, D. Cleary and E. C. de Oliveira Santos.
1999.
Methylmercury neurotoxicity in Amazonian children downstream from gold mining.
Environmental Health Perspectives 107 (7):587-91.
12.
P. Grandjean, P. Weihe, R. F. White and F. Debes.
1998.
Cognitive performance of children prenatally exposed to "safe" levels of methylmercury.
Environmental Research 77 (2):165-72.
13.
P. Grandjean, P. Weihe, R. F. White, F. Debes, S. Araki, K. Yokoyama, K. Murata, N. Sorensen, R. Dahl and P. J. Jorgensen.
1997.
Cognitive deficit in 7-year-old children with prenatal exposure to methylmercury.
Neurotoxicolog y and Teratolog y 19 (6):417-28.
14.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
1996.
Mercury Study Report to Congress, Volumes I to VII.
Washington, DC: Office of Air Quality Planning and Standards.
http://www.epa.gov/oar/mercury.html.
15.
W. F. Fitzgerald, D. R. Engstrom, R. P. Mason and E. A. Nater.
1998.
The case for atmospheric mercury contamination in remote areas.
Environmental Science and Technolog y 32 (1):1-7.
16.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
2001.
EPA National Advice on Mercury in Freshwater Fish for Women Who Are or May Become Pregnant, Nursing Mothers, and Young Children.
EPA Office of Water.
http://www.epa.gov/ost/fishadvice/advice.html.
17.
American Psychiatric Association.
2000.
Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders, Fourth Edition Text Revision.
Washington D.C.: American Psychiatric Association.
18.
National Institute of Mental Health.
1994.
Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder.
96-3572.
http://www.nimh.nih.gov/publicat/adhd.cfm.
19.
National Institute of Mental Health.
2000.
Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder (ADHD) ­ Questions and Answers. http://www.nimh.nih.gov/publicat/adhdqa.cfm (cited October 15, 2001).
98
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
References 20.
A. Thapar, J. Holmes, K. Poulton and R. Harrington.
1999.
Genetic basis of attention deficit and hyperactivity.
British Journal of Psychiatry 174:105-11.
21.
Y.C. Ding, H.C. Chi, D.L. Grady, A. Morishima, J.R. Kidd, K.K. Kidd, P. Flodman, M.A. Spence, S. Schuck, J.M. Swanson, Y.P. Zhang and R.K. Moyzis.
2002.
Evidence of positive selection acting at the human dopamine receptor D4 gene locus.
Proceedings of the National Academy of Sciences 99(1):309-14.
22.
A. Kirley, Z. Hawi, G. Daly, M. McCarron, C. Mullins, N. Millar, I. Waldman, M. Fitzgerald and M. Gill.
2002.
Dopaminergic system genes in ADHD: toward a biological hypothesis.
Neuropsychopharmacolog y 27(4):607-19.
23.
J. Calderon, M. E. Navarro, M. E. Jimenez-Capdeville, M. A. Santos-Diaz, A. Golden, I. Rodriguez-Leyva, V. Borja-Aburto and F. Diaz-Barriga.
2001.
Exposure to arsenic and lead and neuropsychological development in Mexican children.
Environmental Research 85 (2):69-76.
24.
A. L. Mendelsohn, B. P. Dreyer, A. H. Fierman, C. M. Rosen, L. A. Legano, H. A. Kruger, S. W. Lim and C. D. Courtlandt.
1998.
Low-level lead exposure and behavior in early childhood.
Pediatrics 101 (3):E10.
25.
B. Minder, E. A. Das-Smaal, E. F. Brand and J. F. Orlebeke.
1994.
Exposure to lead and specific attentional problems in schoolchildren.
Journal of Learning Disabilities 27 (6):393-9.
26.
H. L. Needleman, A. Schell, D. C. Bellinger, A. Leviton and E. N. Allred.
1990.
The long term effects of exposure to low doses of lead in childhood, an 11-year follow-up report.
New England Journal of Medicine 322 (2):83-8.
27.
H. L. Needleman, J. A. Riess, M. J. Tobin, G. E. Biesecker and J. B. Greenhouse.
1996.
Bone lead levels and delinquent behavior.
Journal of the American Medical Association 275 (5):363-9.
28.
D. C. Rice.
1996.
Behavioral effects of lead: commonalities between experimental and epidemiologic data.
Environmental Health Perspectives 104 (Suppl.
2):337-51.
29.
J. L. Jacobson and S. W. Jacobson.
1996.
Intellectual impairment in children exposed to polychlorinated biphenyls in utero.
New England Journal of Medicine 335 (11):783-9.
30.
J. L. Jacobson and S. W. Jacobson.
1997.
Teratogen Update: Polychlorinated Biphenyls.
Teratolog y 55:338-347.
31.
S. Patandin, C. I. Lanting, P. G. Mulder, E. R. Boersma, P. J. Sauer and N. Weisglas-Kuperus.
1999.
Effects of environmental exposure to polychlorinated biphenyls and dioxins on cognitive abilities in Dutch children at 42 months of age.
Journal of Pediatrics 134 (1):33-41.
32.
P. Stewart, J. Reihman, E. Lonky, T. Darvill and J. Pagano.
2000.
Prenatal PCB exposure and neonatal behavioral assessment scale (NBAS) performance.
Neurotoxicolog y and Teratolog y 22 (1):21-9.
33.
D. C. Rice.
2000.
Parallels between Attention Deficit Hyperactivity Disorder and behavioral deficits produced by neurotoxic exposure in monkeys.
Environmental Health Perspectives 108 (Suppl.
3):405-408.
34.
National Center on Birth Defects and Developmental Disabilities, Centers for Disease Control and Prevention.
2002.
What is Attention-Deficit-Hyperactivity Disorder? http://www.cdc.gov/ncbddd/adhd/what.htm (Cited February 19, 2003).
35.
P. N. Pastor and C.A. Reuben.
2002.
Attention-deficit disorder and learning disability: United States, 1997-98.
National Center for Health Statistics.
Vital Health Statistics 10 (206). http://www.cdc.gov/nchs/data/series/sr_10/sr10_206.pdf.
Part 4: Emerging Issues
99
PART 5
Special Features
Special Features
Special T Features The
his Special Features section presents measures of environments and health disorders for which data are available only for individual states, not for the nation as a whole.
measures in this section address potential exposures to lead and pesticides at schools, an environment where children spend a significant portion of their time.
The data on lead in schools are from California; the data on pesticides in schools are from Minnesota.
The final measure in this section presents trends in birth defects, a collection of childhood conditions for which there is some suspected environmental influence, using data from California.
102
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Lead in California Schools Elevated levels of lead in blood remain an important childhood environmental health hazard in the United States.
Childhood exposure to lead contributes to learning problems such as reduced intelligence and cognitive development.1-3 Studies also have found that childhood exposure to lead contributes to attention-deficit/hyperactivity disorder4 and hyperactivity and distractibility;5-7 increases the likelihood of dropping out of high school, having a reading disability, lower vocabulary, and lower class standing in high school;8 and increases the risk for antisocial and delinquent behavior.9 There is no demonstrated safe concentration of lead in blood, and adverse health effects can occur at very low blood lead levels.2, 3, 10 Ingestion of dust and soil contaminated mainly by deteriorated lead-based paint and by past emissions of leaded gasoline deposited in the soil are the main sources of lead exposure.11-13 Direct ingestion of paint chips can be important in some cases.14 Other sources of lead exposure in the United States include drinking water, soil and dust, canned food and drink, lead-glazed ceramics, and industrial plant emissions.11, 15 In 1992, the California Legislature approved the Lead-Safe Schools Protection Act.
Following approval of this legislation, the California Department of Health Services conducted a study to determine the prevalence of lead and lead hazards in the state's public elementary schools, including elementary school buildings that house day care centers and preschools.
Measures S1-S3 present data from this hazard assessment.
Lead in California's Public Elementary Schools
Healthy People 2010:
Objective 8-11 of Healthy People 2010 aims to eliminate elevated blood lead levels in U.S. children.
See Appendix C for more information.
Part 5: Special Features
103
Lead in California Schools Deteriorated Lead-containing Paint in California's Public Elementary Schools The presence of lead-containing paint in environments where children reside or spend time--including homes, schools, and childcare facilities--does not always result in exposure.
However, it creates a potential for exposure, particularly if the paint is deteriorated and accessible to children.
Deteriorated paint is more prevalent in old and poorly maintained buildings.
According to the National Center for Education Statistics, 75 percent of all public elementary schools nationwide were built before 1970, and about 14 percent of these schools have never been renovated.16 Sixteen percent of these pre-1970 schools were renovated before 1980, the period preceding and immediately after the Consumer Product Safety Commission's 1978 rule limiting the amount of lead allowed in paint to 600 parts per million.16 Therefore, about one-third of the nation's oldest schools (those built before 1970) were never renovated or were renovated before limits were placed on the amount of lead in paint.
Recent housing survey estimates from the U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development (HUD) suggest that 25 percent of housing units with one or more children under the age of 6 have significant lead-based paint hazards.* 17, 18 Children under the age of six are particularly vulnerable to lead exposure and its adverse effects because of age-related risk factors such as hand-to-mouth behavior, pica (a tendency to mouth or attempt to consume non-food objects),19 small body mass, and a developing brain and nervous system.
Currently, 60 percent of children aged three to five are enrolled in day care or similar programs and more than 7.8 million children are enrolled in pre-kindergarten to first grade.20 Lead hazards within the school environment may be an important contributor to exposure.
In its study of the prevalence of lead and lead hazards in California public elementary schools, the California Department of Health Services collected a maximum of four interior and seven exterior paint chip samples from each of the 200 schools studied.
Where possible, paint chip samples were obtained from areas where the paint was visibly deteriorated.
* The Department of Housing and Urban Development defines a "significant lead-based paint hazard" as: a) deteriorated lead-based paint (paint containing 0.5 percent by weight or 1 milligram per square centimeter of lead) of more than 20 square feet (exterior) or two square feet (interior) on large-surfacearea components, or damage to more than 10 percent of the total surface area of interior small surface area components; or b) lead-contaminated dust on floors with 40 micrograms or greater of lead per square foot, dust on window sills with 250 micrograms or greater of lead per square foot; or c) bare leadcontaminated soil of more than 9 square feet with a soil lead concentration of 1,200 parts per million or greater, or 400 parts per million for bare soil in an area frequented by a child under the age of six.
104
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Lead in California Schools Measure S1
Percentage of California public elementary schools with lead paint and some deterioration of paint, 1994-1997 80% Any Detectable Lead 600 ppm 5,000 ppm
60%
40%
20%
0%
Schools Built Before 1940
Schools Built 1940-1959
Schools Built 1960-1979
Schools Built 1980-1995
All Schools
SOURCE: California Departm ent of Health Services, Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention Branch.
Lead Haza rds in California's Public Elementary Schools and Child Care Facilities.
Ap ril, 1998
I Thirty-seven percent of all public elementary schools surveyed in California had both lead-containing paint and some deterioration of paint.
Thirty-two percent of these schools had lead-based paint and some deterioration.
The term "lead-containing paint" refers to paint containing any detectable level of lead.
"Lead-based" paint refers to paint containing at least 5,000 parts per million of lead.
I Generally, paint and age of the California paint and the proportion of schools with lead-containing some deterioration of paint decreased as the schools decreased.
Most (72 percent) of the schools built before 1940 had lead-containing some deterioration, compared with only 3
percent of the schools built between 1980 and 1995.
A similar trend was observed for paint deterioration and lead in paint at or exceeding the Consumer Product Safety Commission and EPA/HUD standards (600 parts per million and 5,000 parts per million respectively).
I Ninety percent of all schools surveyed had lead-containing paint.
All pre-1980 schools and 45 percent of schools built between 1980 and 1995 had lead-containing paint.
(Data not shown.)
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Criteria Air Pollutants: lead (E1-E2) Drinking Water: lead (E6-E7)
Body Burdens Lead in Blood (B1-B3)
Childhood Illnesses Neurodevelopmental (D7)
Special Features Lead in Schools (S1-S3)
Part 5: Special Features
105
Lead in California Schools Lead-contaminated Soil Near California's Public Elementary Schools Lead-contaminated soil poses an exposure risk to children.
EPA's hazard standard for lead in soil is 400 parts per million by weight in play areas, and 1,200 parts per million in bare soil in the remainder of the yard.
EPA recommends measures to reduce exposure when lead in soil is at or above these hazard standards.21 Exposure to soil lead levels lower than the hazard standards also may pose some risk.
Current research shows there is no safe level of lead in blood.2, 3, 10 Deteriorated exterior lead-based paint and fallout from air-borne emissions may lead to contamination of soil in schoolyard areas.
Some of the widespread lead in U.S. soils, especially around busy roadways, is attributable to automobile emissions before leaded gasoline was phased out.22, 23
106
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Lead in California Schools
Measure S2
Percentage of California public elementary schools with lead in soils, 1994-1997 100% Schools with detectable lead in soils
80%
Schools with lead in soils
400 ppm
60%
40%
20%
0% Schools Built Schools Built Schools Built Before 1940 1940-1979 1980-1995 SOURCE: California Department of Health Services, Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention Branch.
Lead Hazards in California's Public Elementary Schools and Child Care Facilities.
April, 1998 All Schools
I Eighty-nine percent of all California schools in the study (public elementary schools) had detectable levels of lead in soils.
Only 7 percent of the schools had lead levels in soil at or exceeding the EPA hazard standard.
I All buildings built before 1940 had detectable levels of lead in soils, and 30 percent exceeded the EPA hazard standard.
I None of the schools built after 1980 had levels of lead in soils at or exceeding the EPA hazard standard.
I The typical lowest concentration of lead that the method could measure for the soil sample analysis was 20 parts per million, with a range of 3.7 parts per million to 151 parts per million.
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Criteria Air Pollutants: lead (E1-E2) Drinking Water: lead (E6-E7)
Body Burdens Lead in Blood (B1-B3)
Childhood Illnesses Neurodevelopmental (D7)
Special Features Lead in Schools (S1-S3)
Part 5: Special Features
107
Lead in California Schools Lead-contaminated Drinking Water in California's Public Elementary Schools Drinking water may be contaminated with lead through contact with lead pipes found in older buildings, brass faucets, and copper pipes with lead solder.
The use of pipes, plumbing fittings, fixtures, or flux that are not "lead-free" in the installation and repair of non-residential facilities was prohibited in June, 1986.24 EPA's action level for lead in drinking water is 15 parts per billion, and the Maximum Contaminant Level Goal (MCLG) is zero.25 The MCLG is the concentration in drinking water at which no known or anticipated adverse effect on the health of persons would occur and which allows an adequate margin of safety.
On average, lead in drinking water accounts for an estimated 10-20 percent of total lead exposure in young children.26 "First draw" water from pipes that have not been flushed tends to have higher lead content but are not representative of typical concentrations.26
108
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Lead in California Schools Measure S3
Percentage of California public elementary schools with lead in drinking water, 1994-1997 80% Schools with detectable lead in drinking water Schools with 15 ppb lead in drinking water Schools with 15 ppb lead in drinking water at 1st draw Schools with 15 ppb lead in drinking water at 2nd draw
60%
40%
20%
0%
Schools Built Before 1940
Schools Built 1940-1979
Schools Built 1980-1995
All Schools
SOURCE: California Department of Health Services, Childhood Lead Poisoning Prevention Branch.
Lead Hazards in California's Public Elementary Schools and Child Care Facilities.
April, 1998
I Detectable amounts of lead were reported in drinking water at 53 percent of all schools in the California study.
First draw samples from 15.5 percent of participating schools (31 out of 200 schools) exceeded the EPA hazard standard of 15 parts per billion.
Drinking water from approximately 6.5 percent of participating schools remained above the standard on the second draw.
Second-draw samples are more representative of the lead concentrations that children are exposed to during most of the day.
Data for first- and second-draw samples are available only for all schools combined, and not for schools grouped by year of construction.
I The percentage of schools with lead contamination exceeding the EPA standard decreased as the age of the schools decreased.
I The lowest concentration of lead measurable in the water analysis was 5 parts per billion.
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Criteria Air Pollutants: lead (E1-E2) Drinking Water: lead (E6-E7)
Body Burdens Lead in Blood (B1-B3)
Childhood Illnesses Neurodevelopmental (D7)
Special Features Lead in Schools (S1-S3)
Part 5: Special Features
109
110
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Pesticides in Minnesota Schools Children may be exposed to pesticides in their diets and through contact with pesticides used in homes, schools, and day care centers.
Children are particularly vulnerable to the effects of pesticides because of their unique susceptibilities and relatively high exposures compared with adults.27-30 Because children spend a significant portion of time at school, this setting may be an important contributor to overall exposure.
There is no federal statute requiring the collection of data on pesticide use in schools; thus there is no nationwide information on the amount of pesticides used in the nation's 110,000 schools.31 Few states require reporting of pesticide use.
For those states that do, the information collected generally is not adequate to assess exposure.
Some states have regulated and/or assessed the use of pesticides in schools.
In 1995, Louisiana passed a law requiring its school districts to report the amount of pesticides used annually.
In New York, commercial applicators are required by a 1996 law to report the amount of a specific pesticide used and the location where it was applied.
Six states--Arizona, California, Connecticut, Massachusetts, New Hampshire, and New Mexico--require commercial applicators to report the amount of specific pesticides used, but not the locations where the pesticides are applied.31 In recent years, EPA has recommended that schools undertake Integrated Pest Management (IPM) to reduce pesticide use.
An IPM program for schools may include redesigning and repairing structures, improving sanitation, employing pest-resistant varieties of plants, establishing watering and mowing practices that minimize the need for pesticides, and applying pesticides judiciously.
IPM programs frequently are more economical and less hazardous to people, the environment, and property than conventional approaches to pest control.32 Currently, approximately 10 states require the adoption of IPM in schools.33 In 1999 the state of Minnesota conducted a survey on pesticide use in schools.
The results presented here focus on indoor uses of pesticides, because pesticide residues can be persistent indoors,34-36 and because children spend most of their time indoors when they are at school.
Some pesticides have been detected at indoor concentrations potentially hazardous to children weeks and months after application.34, 37
Pesticide Use in Schools
Healthy People 2010:
Objective 8-24 of Healthy People 2010 aims to reduce exposure to pesticides.
See Appendix C for more information.
Part 5: Special Features 111
Pesticides in Minnesota Schools Pesticide Use in Minnesota's Public and Private Schools Legislation recommending the use of Integrated Pest Management (IPM) in schools was introduced in Minnesota in 1999 and again in 2000.
In response to increased awareness and concern about the issue of pesticides in schools, the state conducted a survey in 1999 on current pest management practices in kindergarten through secondary (K-12) schools.
This measure presents data from the survey on the frequency of pesticide use and some information about how these pesticides were used.
The measure is only a surrogate for exposure.
The frequency with which pesticides are used is an indicator of potential exposure because the risk of exposure increases with the frequency of pesticide use.
This measure does not provide information about the toxicity of pesticides used or details about how they were applied and thus cannot provide a complete representation of the risk of adverse effects following exposure.
112
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Pesticides in Minnesota Schools
Measure S4
Frequency of application of pesticides in Minnesota K-12 schools, 1999 50% Cafeteria and kitchen/food storage area Locker rooms and gymnasium Classrooms
40% Percentage of schools
30%
20%
10%
0%
Sprayed As Needed
Once per Month
1-4 Times per Year
Not Sprayed
No Answer / Other / Don't Know
SOURCE: C.J. Olson Market Research Inc. for Minnesota Department of Agriculture.
Quantitative Research Regarding Pest Management in Minnesota K-12 Schools.
1999
I Approximately 47 percent of responding school custodians reported that they sprayed pesticides "as needed" in the classroom.
A little over a third (34 percent) reported the same frequency of pesticide use in locker rooms and gymnasiums, cafeterias, kitchens, and food storage areas.
I Most (64 percent) responding custodians reported that their schools engaged the services of contractors to apply pesticides routinely, and that most of these contractors (90 percent) had applicator certification and licenses.
However, the survey reported that facility directors, custodial and maintenance staff, and teachers also were engaged in routine pesticide application in schools.
I The indoor pesticides reported as the most commonly used were Saga WP, Demand CS, Tempo WP (all pyrethroids), and Borid.
However, a variety of pesticides including the organophosphates Dursban (chlorpyrifos) and Diazinon were used indoors in some schools.
An agreement between EPA and registrants of Dursban cancelled the pesticide's use in schools, parks, and other settings where children may be exposed.
This phase-out resulted in the termination of retail sales by December, 2001.38 I Forty percent of the responding custodians reported that their schools provided no notification of pesticide use (such as notices in fumigated areas or pre- and postapplication letters to students and teachers).
Related Measures: Environmental Contaminants Pesticide Residues (E8)
Body Burdens
Childhood Illnesses
Special Features Pesticide Use in Schools (S4)
Part 5: Special Features
113
Birth Defects in California Birth Defects Birth defects are the leading cause of infant death in the first year of life, accounting for about 20 percent of infant deaths in 1999.39 The term "birth defects" covers a range of structural defects of the limbs or mouth, defects that affect development of the spinal cord, and defects of internal organs, such as the heart.
Infants who do not die from birth defects often have lifelong disabilities, such as mental retardation, heart problems, or difficulty in performing everyday activities such as walking.
Some birth defects are inherited.
Other risk factors for birth defects include prenatal exposure of the fetus to certain pharmaceuticals, such as Accutane; alcohol; and insufficient folate in a woman's diet.
The causes of a significant portion of birth defects are unknown, but research suggests that defects could be influenced by environmental factors.40 Several environmental contaminants cause birth defects when pregnant women are exposed to high concentrations.
Mercury poisoning in Minamata, Japan, resulted in birth defects such as deafness and blindness.41 Prenatal exposures to high concentrations of polychlorinated biphenyls (PCBs) have resulted in stained and acned skin and deformed nails in children.42 However, the relationship between exposure to lower concentrations of environmental contaminants and birth defects is less clear.
A number of epidemiological studies have evaluated the relationship between environmental and occupational exposures and birth defects.
A recent scientific review that evaluated multiple studies of women's occupational exposure to organic solvents found an increased risk for birth defects such as heart defects and oral cleft defects.43 Studies of fathers have found that certain occupations are associated with birth defects in their children.44-46 Studies evaluating the role of pesticides in birth defects have found an association between maternal and paternal exposure to pesticides and increased risk of offspring having or dying from birth defects.44-54 There currently is no national monitoring system for birth defects.
However, most states have some type of birth defects monitoring program.
At the end of 2000, 45 of the states, the District of Columbia, and Puerto Rico had some type of existing birth defects monitoring program.55 The type of tracking varies widely among the states.
A small portion of these states have the most complete type of tracking system, which includes actively researching medical records for birth defects and following children through the first year of life.
The remaining states have some type of monitoring program, but do not have all the aspects of a complete surveillance system.
California has monitored birth defects since 1983 and has a monitoring program that is considered most complete.
Data from California for several major defects are presented here.
114
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
Birth Defects in California
Measure S5
Number of birth defects in California per 1,000 live births and fetal deaths 2.5 1991 ­ 1993 1994 ­ 1996 1997 ­ 1999
2.0
1.5
1.0
0.5
0.0
Heart Defects
Oral Cleft Defects
Down Syndrome
Intestinal Defects
Limb Defects
SOURCE: California Birth Defects Monitoring Program
I Heart defects are the most common birth defect in California, with 1.8 cases per 1,000 live births and fetal deaths in 1997-99.
I The rates of birth defects in California generally remained constant during the 1990s.
I Other important defects not shown here are neural tube defects and defects of the reproductive system, such as hypospadias.
During the 1990s, there were six cases of neural tube defects per 10,000 (0.6 per 1,000) live births and fetal deaths.
There were insufficient data to determine a trend over the 1990s.
Data on hypospadias are not available from the state of California.
Part 5: Special Features
115
References 1.
D. Bellinger, A. Leviton and C. Waternaux.
1987.
Longitudinal analyses of prenatal and postnatal lead exposure and early cognitive development.
New England Journal of Medicine 316 (17):1037-43.
2.
A. J. McMichael, P. A. Baghurst, N. R. Wigg, G. V. Vimpani, E. F. Robertson and R. J. Roberts.
1988.
Port Pirie Cohort Study: environmental exposure to lead and children's abilities at the age of four years.
New England Journal of Medicine 319 (8):468-75.
3.
B. P. Lanphear, K. Dietrich, P. Auinger and C. Cox.
2000.
Cognitive deficits associated with blood lead concentrations 
Public Health Reports 115 (6):521-9.
4.
R. W. Tuthill.
1996.
Hair lead levels related to children's classroom attention-deficit behavior.
Archives of Environmental Health 51 (3):214-20.
5.
J. Calderon, M. E. Navarro, M. E. Jimenez-Capdeville, M. A. Santos-Diaz, A. Golden, I. Rodriguez-Leyva, V. Borja-Aburto and F. Diaz-Barriga.
2001.
Exposure to arsenic and lead and neuropsychological development in Mexican children.
Environmental Research 85 (2):69-76.
6.
A. L. Mendelsohn, B. P. Dreyer, A. H. Fierman, C. M. Rosen, L. A. Legano, H. A. Kruger, S. W. Lim and C. D. Courtlandt.
1998.
Low-level lead exposure and behavior in early childhood.
Pediatrics 101 (3):E10.
7.
B. Minder, E. A. Das-Smaal, E. F. Brand and J. F. Orlebeke.
1994.
Exposure to lead and specific attentional problems in schoolchildren.
Journal of Learning Disabilities 27 (6):393-9.
8.
H. L. Needleman, A. Schell, D. C. Bellinger, A. Leviton and E. N. Allred.
1990.
The long term effects of exposure to low doses of lead in childhood, an 11-year follow-up report.
New England Journal of Medicine 322 (2):83-8.
9.
H. L. Needleman, J. A. Riess, M. J. Tobin, G. E. Biesecker and J. B. Greenhouse.
1996.
Bone lead levels and delinquent behavior.
Journal of the American Medical Association 275 (5):363-9.
10.
E. K. Silbergeld.
1997.
Preventing lead poisoning in children.
Annual Review of Public Health 18:187-210.
11.
J. L. Pirkle, R. B. Kaufmann, D. J. Brody, T. Hickman, E. W. Gunter and D. C. Paschal.
1998.
Exposure of the U.S. population to lead, 1991-1994.
Environmental Health Perspectives 106 (11):745-50.
12.
B. P. Lanphear, T. D. Matte, J. Rogers, R. P. Clickner, B. Dietz, R. L. Bornschein, P. Succop, K. R. Mahaffey, S. Dixon, W. Galke, M. Rabinowitz, M. Farfel, C. Rohde, J. Schwartz, P. Ashley and D. E. Jacobs.
1998.
The contribution of lead-contaminated house dust and residential soil to children's blood lead levels.
A pooled analysis of 12 epidemiologic studies.
Environmental Research 79 (1):51-68.
13.
M. Weitzman, A. Aschengrau, D. Bellinger, R. Jones, J. S. Hamlin and A. Beiser.
1993.
Lead-contaminated soil abatement and urban children's blood lead levels.
Journal of the American Medical Association 269 (13):1647-54.
14.
M. D. McElvaine, E. G. DeUngria, T. D. Matte, C. G. Copley and S. Binder.
1992.
Prevalence of radiographic evidence of paint chip ingestion among children with moderate to severe lead poisoning, St Louis, Missouri, 1989 through 1990.
Pediatrics 89 (4 Pt 2):740-2.
15.
United States Environmental Protection Agency.
2001.
Lead Phase-out [Web site], 2001.
http://www.epa.gov/oia/tips/lead2.htm.
16.
C. Rowand.
1999.
How Old Are America's Public Schools? Washington, DC: Department of Education.
National Center for Education Statistics (NCES).
NCES 1999-048.
http://nces.ed.gov/pubs99/quarterlyapr/4-elementary/4-esq11-h.html.
17.
D. E. Jacobs, R. P. Clickner, J. Y.
Zhou, S. M. Viet, D. A. Marker, J. W. Rogers, D. C. Zeldin, P. Broene and W. Friedman.
2002.
The prevalence of lead-based paint hazards in U.S. housing.
Environmental Health Perspectives 110 (10):A599-606.
116
America's Children and the Environment: Measures of Contaminants, Body Burdens, and Illnesses
References 18.
U.S. Department of Housing and Urban Development.
2001.
National Survey of Lead and Allergens in Housing.
Final Report.
Volume 1: Analysis of Lead Hazards.
Washington, DC. http://www.hud.gov/lea/HUD_NSLAH_Vol1.pdf.
19.
United States Environmental Protection Agency.
1998.
Risk Analysis to Support Standards for Lead in Paint, Dust and Soil.
Washington, DC.
EPA 747-R-97-006. http://www.epa.gov/lead/403risk.htm.
20.
J. Wirt, S. Choy, D. Gerald, S. Provasnik, P. Rooney, S. Watanabe, R. Tobin and M. Glander.
2001.
The Condition of Education 2001.
Washington, DC: U.S. Department of Education.
National Center for Education Statistics.
NCES 2001-072.
http://nces.ed.gov/pubsearch/pubsinfo.asp?pubid=2001072.
21.
Lead-Based Paint Poisoning Prevention in Certain Residential Structures.
40 CFR§745.65( c). http://www.access.gpo.gov/nara/cfr/waisidx_01/40cfr745_01.html.
22.
H. W. Mielke.
1999.
Lead in the inner cities.
American Scientist 87:62-73.
23.
H. Mielke and P. Reagan.
1998.
Soil is an important pathway of human lead exposure.
Environmental Health Perspectives 106 (Suppl.
1):217-229.
24.
Prohibition on Use of Lead Pipes, Solder, and Flux. 42 U.S.C. 300g-6.
http://www4.law.cornell.edu/uscode/42/300g-1.html.
25.
National Primary Drinking Water Regulations.
40CFR1.141: http://www.access.gpo.gov/nara/cfr/waisidx_01/40cfr141_01.html.
26.
United States Environmental Protection Agency.
1993.
Lead in Your Drinking Water: Actions You can Take to Reduce Lead in Drinking Water.
Washington, DC.
EPA 810-F-93-001. http://www.epa.gov/safewater/Pubs/lead1.html.
27.
S. H. Zahm and S. S. Devesa.
1995.
Childhood cancer: overview of incidence trends and environmental carcinogens.
Environmental Health Perspectives 103 (Suppl.
6):177-184.
28.
L. R. Goldman.
1995.
Children--unique and vulnerable: environmental risks facing children and recommendations for response.
Environmental Health Perspectives 103 (Suppl.
6):13-18.
29.
B. Eskenazi, A. Bradman and R. Castorina.
1999.
Exposures of children to organophosphate pesticides and their potential adverse health effects.
Environmental Health Perspectives 107 (Suppl.
3):409-19.
30.
National Research Council.
Committee on Pesticides in the Diets of Infants and Children.
1993.
Pesticides in the Diets of Infants and Children.
Washington, DC: National Academy Press.
0309048753.
http://www.nap.edu/catalog/2126.html?se_side.
31.
U.S.
General Accounting Office (GAO).
1999.
Pesticides: Use, Effects, and Alternatives to Pesticides in Schools.
Washington, DC: GAO. GAO/RCED-00-17. http://www.gao.gov/new.items/rc00017.pdf.
32.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
1993.
Pest Control in the School Environment: Adopting Integrated Pest Management.
Washington, DC: United States Environmental Protection Agency.
EPA-735-F-93-012. http://www.epa.gov/pesticides/ipm/brochure/.
33.
K. Owens and J. Feldman.
2002.
The Schooling of State Pesticide Laws Regarding Schools, 2002 Update.
Pesticides and You 22 (1):14-17.
34.
S. Gurunathan, M. Robson, N. Freeman, B. Buckley, A. Roy, R. Meyer, J. Bukowski and P. J. Lioy. 1998.
Accumulation of chlorpyrifos on residential surfaces and toys accessible to children.
Environmental Health Perspectives 106 (1):9-16.
35.
J. C. Wallace, L. P. Brzuzy, S. L. Simonich, S. M. Visscher and R. A. Hites.
1996.
Case study of organochlorine pesticides in the indoor air of a home.
Environmental Science and Technolog y 30:2715-2718.
36.
R. W. Whitemore, F. W. Immerman, D. E. Camann, A. E. Bond, R. G. Lewis and J. L. Schaum.
1994.
Non-occupational exposures to pesticides for residents of two U.S. cities.
Archives of Environmental Contamination and Toxicolog y 26 (1):47-59.
Part 5: Special Features
117
References 37.
R. G. Lewis, C. R. Fortune, F. T. Blanchard and D. E. Camann.
2001.
Movement and deposition of two organophosphorus pesticides within a residence after interior and exterior applications.
Journal of the Air and Waste Management Association 51 (3):339-51.
38.
U.S. Environmental Protection Agency.
2000.
Chlorpyrifos Revised Risk Assessment and Agreement with Registrants.
Washington, DC: United States Environmental Protection Agency.
7506C. http://www.epa.gov/pesticides/op/chlorpyrifos/agreement.pdf.
39.
National Center for Health Statistics.
2001.
Health, United States, 2001 With Urban and Rural Health Chartbook.
Hyattsville, Maryland.
http://www.cdc.gov/nchs/data/hus/hus01.pdf.
40.
K. Nelson and L. B. Holmes.
1989.
Malformations due to presumed spontaneous mutations in newborn infants.
New England Journal of Medicine 320 (1):19-23.
41.
M. Harada, H. Akagi, T. Tsuda, T. Kizaki and H. Ohno. 1999.
Methylmercury level in umbilical cords from patients with congenital Minamata disease.
Science of the Total Environment 234 (1-3):59-62.
42.
W. J. Rogan.
1982.
PCBs and cola-colored babies: Japan, 1968, and Taiwan, 1979.
Teratolog y 26 (3):259-61.
43.
K. I. McMartin, M. Chu, E. Kopecky, T. R. Einarson and G. Koren.
1998.
Pregnancy outcome following maternal organic solvent exposure: a meta-analysis of epidemiologic studies.
American Journal of Industrial Medicine 34 (3):288-92.
44.
A. Irgens, K. Kruger, A. H. Skorve and L. M. Irgens.
2000.
Birth defects and paternal occupational exposure.
Hypotheses tested in a record linkage based dataset.
Acta Obstetricia et Gynecologica Scandinavica 79 (6):465-70.
45.
H. Dimich-Ward, C. Hertzman, K. Teschke, R. Hershler, S. A. Marion, A. Ostry and S. Kelly.
1996.
Reproductive effects of paternal exposure to chlorophenate wood preservatives in the sawmill industry.
Scandinavian Journal of Work Environment and Health 22 (4):267-73.
46.
B. M. Blatter and N. Roeleveld.
1996.
Spina bifida and parental occupation in a Swedish register-based study.
Scandinavian Journal of Work Environment and Health 22 (6):433-7.
47.
B. M. Blatter, R. Hermens, M. Bakker, N. Roeleveld, A. L. Verbeek and G. A. Zielhuis.
1997.
Paternal occupational exposure around conception and spina bifida in offspring.
American Journal of Industrial Medicine 32 (3):283-91.
48.
E. M. Bell, I. Hertz-Picciotto and J. J. Beaumont.
2001.
A case-control study of pesticides and fetal death due to congenital anomalies.
Epidemiolog y 12 (2):148-56.
49.
E. M. Bell, I. Hertz-Picciotto and J. J. Beaumont.
2001.
Pesticides and fetal death due to congenital anomalies: implications of an erratum.
Epidemiolog y 12 (5):595-6.
50.
G. M. Shaw, C. R. Wasserman, C. D. O'Ma
